between the European Union and the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia on the activities of the European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) in the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia
- the European Community Monitoring Mission (ECMM) has been active in the Western Balkans since 1991,
- the European Union and its Member States have offered to establish a European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) in the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia and that the Government of the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia has accepted this offer,
- the Council of the European Union, on 22 December 2000, adopted Joint Action 2000 / 811 / CFSP on the European Union Monitoring Mission converting the ECMM into the EUMM, as an instrument of the European Union <unk> s Common Foreign and Security Policy (CFSP) which, building on previous initiatives, should contribute to formulating an effective European Union policy for the Western Balkans,
( 1) Die Überwachungsmission der Europäischen Union, nachstehend <unk> EUMM <unk> genannt, die ursprünglich in der Region als Überwachungsmission der Europäischen Gemeinschaft (ECMM) errichtet wurde, hat ihr Hauptquartier derzeit in Sarajevo und wird ein Missionsbüro in Belgrad sowie auf Entscheidung des Missionsleiters nach Hearing und Zustimmung der Aufnahmepartei gegebenenfalls weitere Büro in der Bundesrepublik Jugoslawien einrichten, um dazu beizutragen, eine wirksame Politik der Europäischen Union für den Westlichen Balkan zu formulieren. The European Union Monitoring Mission, hereinafter referred to as the EUMM, which was originally established in the region as a European Community Monitoring Mission (ECMM), shall have its headquarters in Sarajevo and shall establish a mission office in Belgrade and, by decision of the Head of Mission after consultation and agreement of the host party, further offices in the Federal Republic of Jugoslavia,
( a) monitor political developments and developments in the security situation within their competence;
( b) pay particular attention to border control, issues affecting different ethnic groups and the return of refugees;
( c) submit analytical reports in accordance with the tasks assigned to it;
( d) contribute to the early warning of the Council and to confidence building within the framework of the stabilisation policies pursued by the European Union in the region.
( 2) Die Aufnahmepartei erteilt der EUMM alle Informationen und leistet jede Art von Zusammenarbeit, die zur Erreichung der Ziele der EUMM erforderlich sind. The host Party shall provide the EUMM with all information and shall cooperate in any manner necessary to achieve the objectives of the EUMM.
The host party may appoint a liaison officer to the EUMM.
( 1) Die Aufnahmepartei ergreift alle erforderlichen Maßnahmen für den Schutz und die Sicherheit der EUMM und ihrer Mitglieder. The host Party shall take all necessary measures for the protection and security of the EUMM and its members.
All relevant arrangements proposed by the host Party shall be agreed with the Head of Mission before they are implemented.
( 2) Zur Durchführung ihrer Tätigkeit genießen die EUMM und ihr Personal unter Einbeziehung ihrer Transportmittel und Ausrüstungen die Freiheit, die zur Erfuellung des Auftrags der Mission erforderlich ist. In order to carry out their activities, the EUMM and its staff shall enjoy the freedom of movement required for the purpose of carrying out the mission <unk> s mission, including their means of transport and equipment.
( 3) Das Personal der EUMM kann bei seiner Tätigkeit von einem Dolmetscher und, auf Anforderung der EUMM, von einem von der Aufnahmespartei benannten Begleitoffizier begleitoffizier escort werden. The staff of the EUMM may be accompanied in their activities by an interpreter and, at the request of the EUMM, by an escort officer designated by the host party.
( 4) Die EUMM kann auf ihrem Missionsbüro in Belgrad sowie an anderen Orten, über die der Missionsleiter befindet, die Flagge der Europäischen Union hoist. The EUMM may fly the flag of the European Union at its mission office in Belgrade and at any other location where the Head of Mission is located.
( 5) Fahrzeuge und andere Transportmittel der EUMM tragen ein Erkennungszeichen der Mission, über das die zuständigen Behörden unterrichtet werden. EUMM vehicles and other means of transport shall bear a mission identification badge which shall be communicated to the competent authorities.
( 1) Der Missionsleiter der EUMM wird vom Rat der Europäischen Union ernannt. The Head of Mission of the EUMM shall be appointed by the Council of the European Union.
( 2) Sonstiges EUMM -Personal shall be seconded by the Member States of the European Union.
Personnel shall be allocated to specific uses by the Head of Mission under the supervision of the Secretary-General / High Representative.
Norway and Slovakia, which participate in the EUMM at the time of this Agreement, may also designate EUMM staff, who shall then be seconding parties, as shall the European Union and its Member States.
( 3) Das Personal der EUMM trägt die Bezeichnung <unk> Beobachter <unk>. The staff of the EUMM shall bear the designation <unk> Observer <unk>.
( 4) Die Regierungen der Versandendeparteien benennen Beobachter für die EUMM. The governments of the sending parties shall designate observers for the EUMM.
( 5) Der Missionsleiter bestimmt nach Hearing und Zustimmung der Aufnahmespartei die Anzahl der Beobachter im Rahmen dieses Abkommens. The Head of Mission shall, after consultation and approval by the host party, determine the number of observers under this Agreement.
( 6) Die Beobachter unterlassen alle Handlungen oder Tätigkeiten, die mit der Unparteilichkeit ihrer Aufgaben unvereinbar sind. The observers shall refrain from any action or activity incompatible with the impartiality of their duties.
( 7) Die EUMM kann auf die Unterstützung durch Verwaltungs- und technisches Personal der Entsendeparteien fallgreifen. The EUMM may call upon the assistance of the administrative and technical staff of the posting parties.
The members of the administrative or technical staff of the EUMM shall enjoy, in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations, the same status as the administrative and technical staff of the posting parties in embassies.
( 8) Die EUMM kann vor Ort das erfordertigte Hilfspersonal eingestellt. The EUMM may appoint on site the auxiliary staff required.
At the request of the Head of Mission, the host Party shall facilitate the recruitment by the EUMM of qualified local staff.
The auxiliary staff of the EUMM shall enjoy the same status as the local staff in embassies, in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations.
( 1) Die Beobachter dürfen keine Waffen tragen. The observers shall not carry weapons.
( 2) Die Beobachter tragen Zivilkleidung mit einem EUMM-Erkennungszeichen. The observers shall wear civilian clothing bearing an EUMM identification mark.
( 1) Die EUMM in der Bundesrepublik Jugoslawien führt ihre Tätigkeit unter der Verantwortung des Missionsleiter aus. EUMM in the Federal Republic of Jugoslavia shall carry out its activities under the responsibility of the Head of Mission.
( 2) Der Missionsleiter bericht dem Rat der Europäischen Union durch den Generalsekretär/ Hohen Vertreter regelmäßig über die Tätigkeit und die Erkenntnisse der EUMM. The Head of Mission shall report regularly to the Council of the European Union, through the Secretary-General / High Representative, on the activities and findings of the EUMM.
( 3) Die Aufgaben der EUMM werden vom Generalsekretär/ Hohen Vertreter in enger Zusammenarbeit mit dem Vorsitz und in Einklang mit der vom Rat verabschiedeten Politik für den Westlichen Balkan festgelegt. The functions of the EUMM shall be determined by the Secretary-General / High Representative in close cooperation with the Presidency and in accordance with the policy for the Western Balkans adopted by the Council.
( 4) Der Missionsleiter unterrichtet die Aufnahmepartei regelmäßig über die Tätigkeit der EUMM. The Head of Mission shall regularly inform the host party of the activities of the EUMM.
( 1) Fahrzeuge und andere Transportmittel der EUMM unterliegen keine Zwangszulassung oder -genehmigung; alle Fahrzeuge sind bei Dritten versicherung. Vehicles and other means of transport of the EUMM shall not be subject to compulsory registration or approval; all vehicles shall be insured with third parties.
( 2) Die EUMM kann Roads, Bridges, Canals und andere Wasserstraße, Hafenanlagen und Flugplätze ohne Zahlung von Gebühren, Maut oder anderen Abgaben benutzt. EUMM may use roads, bridges, canals and other waterways, port facilities and airports without payment of fees, tolls or other charges.
( 3) Die Aufnahmepartei erleichtert der EUMM den Betrieb ihrer eigenen Fahrzeuge und anderen Transportmittel. The host Party shall facilitate the operation of its own vehicles and other means of transport for the EUMM.
( 1) Das EUMM-Personal hat zum Zwecke der Ausübung seiner Tätigkeit zu geringsten Kosten Zugang zu angemessenen Telekommunikationseinrichtungen der Aufnahmepartei, auch zum Zwecke der Kommunikation mit diplomatischen oder konsularischen Vertretern der Entsendeparteien. For the purpose of carrying out its activities, the EUMM staff shall have, at the lowest cost, access to appropriate telecommunications facilities of the host Party, including for the purpose of communicating with diplomatic or consular representatives of the posting parties.
( 2) Die EUMM hat das Recht auf uneingeschränkte Kommunikation mit eigenen Funkgeräten (einschließlich Satelliten-, Mobil- und Handfunk geräte), Telefonen, Telegrafen, Faxgeräten oder anderen Mitteln. EUMM shall have the right to communicate without restriction by means of its own radios (including satellite, mobile and hand-held radios), telephones, telegraphs, fax machines or other means.
The host Party shall provide, after signature of this Agreement, the frequencies on which radios may be operated.
( 1) Die EUMM erhält den Status einer diplomatischen Mission. The EUMM shall have the status of a diplomatic mission.
( 2) Die Beobachter genießen während ihrer Mission in Einklang mit dem Wiener Übereinkommen über diplomatische Beziehungen die Vorrechte und Immunitäten diplomatischer Bediensteter. The observers shall enjoy, during their mission in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations, the privileges and immunities of diplomatic officials.
( 3) Das Missionsbüro in Belgrad, andere Büro und alle Transportmittel der EUMM sind unverletzlich. The mission office in Belgrade, other offices and all means of transport of the EUMM shall be inviolable.
( 4) Die Vorrechte und Immunitäten nach diesem Artikel stehen den Beobachter während ihrer Mission zu und danach in Bezug auf Handlungen, die sie zuvor im Rahmen ihrer Mission ausgeführt haben. The privileges and immunities provided for in this Article shall apply to the observers during their mission and thereafter in respect of actions previously performed by them under their mission.
( 5) Die Aufnahmepartei erleichtert alle Bewegungsdes Missionsleiter und des Personals der EUMM. The host Party shall facilitate the movements of the Head of Mission and the staff of the EUMM.
The EUMM shall provide the host party with a list of the members of the EUMM and shall inform the host party in advance of the arrival or departure of EUMM staff.
The EUMM staff shall carry the national passport and an identity card of the EUMM.
( 6) Die Aufnahmepartei erkennt das Recht der Entsendeparteien und der EUMM an, zollfrei und ohne sonstige Beschränkungen die von der EUMM benötigten und zu ihrer ausschließlichen und offizielle Verwendung bestimmten Ausrüstungen, Vorräte, Lieferungen und anderen Güter einzuführen. The host Party shall recognise the right of the posting parties and of the EUMM to introduce, duty free and without other restrictions, the equipment, supplies and other goods required by the EUMM and intended for their exclusive and official use.
The receiving Party shall also recognise its right to buy such items in the territory of the receiving Party and to export or otherwise dispose of such imported or purchased equipment, stocks, supplies and other goods.
The host Party shall also recognise the right of the observers to buy and / or import items for personal use duty free and to export such items.
The Government of the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia declares its readiness to assist the EUMM, upon request, in the search for suitable office space and accommodation.
The participating Parties shall decide on other provisions concerning privileges and immunities, on practical arrangements, including emergency medical assistance and evacuation, and on requirements for travel documents.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon signature.
Its provisions shall be applied provisionally by the receiving Party of the EUMM from the date of initialling until its entry into force by signature.
The Agreement shall remain in force until one of the participating Parties notifies the other Party, within a period of two months, of its intention to request the cessation of such activities.
The Agreement shall replace the Arrangement of 13 July 1991.
PROTOCOL TO THE 1979 AGREEMENT ON FURTHER BORDER TRANSIT OF AIR PROTECTION IN HEAVY METALS
Determined to implement the Convention on long-range transboundary air pollution,
Concerned that emissions of certain heavy metals are carried across national borders and cause damage to ecosystems of environmental and economic importance and may have adverse effects on human health;
Considering that combustion and industrial processes are the primary anthropogenic sources of emissions of heavy metals into the atmosphere;
Aware that heavy metals are natural constituents of the earth <unk> s crust and that many heavy metals, in certain forms and in appropriate concentrations, are vital;
Taking into account existing scientific and technical data on emissions, geochemical processes, atmospheric transport and the effects of heavy metals on human health and the environment, as well as on mitigation procedures and costs;
Aware of the existence of techniques and procedures to reduce air pollution caused by emissions of heavy metals,
Aware that the economic conditions vary from country to country within the competence of the United Nations Economic Commission for Europe (UN-ECE) and that the economy of certain countries is in transition to a market economy;
Determined to take measures to prevent, prevent or minimise emissions of certain heavy metals and their corresponding compounds, taking into account the precautionary principle in accordance with principle 15 of the Rio Declaration on Environment and Development;
Reaffirming that States have the sovereign right, in accordance with the Charter of the United Nations and the principles of international law, to use their own natural resources in accordance with their own environmental and development policies, and the duty to ensure that activities carried out within or under their control do not harm the environment in other States or areas outside their national jurisdictions;
Aware that measures to limit emissions of heavy metals would also contribute to the protection of the environment and human health in areas beyond the competence of UN-ECE, including the Arctic and international waters;
RECOGNISING that the reduction of emissions of certain heavy metals may bring additional benefits to the reduction of emissions of other pollutants;
Aware that further and more effective measures may be needed to limit and reduce emissions of certain heavy metals and that, for example, impact studies may provide a basis for further action;
Considering the important contribution of the private and non-governmental sectors to knowledge of the impacts associated with heavy metals, existing alternatives and abatement techniques and their role in reducing emissions of heavy metals,
Conscious of the measures taken at national level and in international fora to control heavy metals,
<unk> Convention <unk> the Convention on long-range transboundary air pollution adopted at Geneva on 13 November 1979;
<unk> EMEP <unk> the programme for cooperation in the measurement and evaluation of the long-range transmission of air pollutants in Europe;
<unk> executive body
<unk> Commission
<unk> Contracting Parties
6. <unk> geographical scope of EMEP
<unk> heavy metals
<unk> emission
9. <unk> stationary source
10. <unk> new stationary source
It is for the competent national authorities to decide whether a change is essential, taking into account such factors as the environmental benefits of the change;
<unk> Major stationary source category
The objective of this Protocol is to limit, in accordance with the following Articles, anthropogenic emissions of heavy metals which are widely transported across frontiers and which are likely to cause serious harm to human health or the environment.
( 1) Jede Vertragspartei verringert ihre jährlichen Gesamtemissionen aller der in Anhang I aufgeführten Schwermetalle in die Atmosphere vom Stand der Emissionen in einem nach diesem Anhang festgelegten Bezugsjahr durch wirksame Maßnahmen, die ihren besonderen Gegebenheiten angemessen sind. Each Party shall reduce its total annual emissions of all the heavy metals listed in Annex I into the atmosphere from the level of emissions in a reference year specified in this Annex by effective measures appropriate to its particular circumstances.
( 2) Jede Vertragspartei wendet spätestens nach Ablauf der in Anhang IV angegebenen Fristen Folgendes an: Each Contracting Party shall, not later than after the expiry of the periods specified in Annex IV, apply the following:
( a) which, having regard to Annex III, identifies the best available techniques for each new stationary source within a category of major stationary sources for which Annex III identifies the best available techniques;
( b) the limits set out in Annex V to each new stationary source within a category of major stationary sources.
As an alternative, either Party may adopt other emission abatement strategies leading to equivalent total emissions;
( c) which, having regard to Annex III, identifies the best available techniques for each existing stationary source within a category of major stationary sources for which Annex III identifies the best available techniques.
As an alternative, a Contracting Party may adopt other emission abatement strategies leading to equivalent total emission reductions;
( d) the limits set out in Annex V to any existing stationary source within a category of major stationary sources, where technically and economically feasible.
As an alternative, a Contracting Party may adopt other emission abatement strategies that result in equivalent total emission reductions.
( 3) Jede Vertragspartei wendet nach Maßgabe der in Anhang VI festgelegten Bedingungen und Fristen Produktkontrollmaßnahmen an. Each Party shall apply product control measures in accordance with the conditions and deadlines set out in Annex VI.
( 4) Jede Vertragspartei soll unter Berücksichtigung des Anhangs VII die Anwendung zusätzlicher Produktmanagementmaßnahmen erwägen. Each Contracting Party shall, taking into account Annex VII, consider the application of additional product management measures.
( 5) Jede Vertragspartei erstellt und unterhält Emissionsverzeichnisse für die in Anhang I aufgeführten Schwermetalle, wobei für die Vertragsparteien im geographischen Anwendungsbereich des EMEP als Minimum die vom Lenkungsorgan des EMEP festgelegten Methoden zur Anwendung kommen und für die Vertragsparteien außerhalb des geographischen Anwendungsbereichs des EMEP als Leittschnur die im Arbeitslan des Exekutivorgans Developed Methods Serve as a guideline for the Parties outside the geographical scope of EMEP as a minimum of the methods established by the steering body of EMEP.
( 6) Eine Vertragspartei, die nach Anwendung der Absätze 2 und 3 den Anforderungen des Absatzes 1 für ein in Anhang I aufgeführtes Schwermetall nicht entsprechen kann, wird für dieses Schwermetall von ihren Verpflichtungen nach Absatz 1 befreit. A Contracting Party which cannot meet the requirements of paragraph 1 for a heavy metal listed in Annex I after the application of paragraphs 2 and 3 shall be exempt from its obligations under paragraph 1 for this heavy metal.
( 7) Eine Vertragspartei, deren Gesamtfläche 6000000 km2 überschreitet, wird von ihren Verpflichtungen nach Absatz 2 Buchstaben b), c) und d) befreit, wenn sie nachweisen kann, daß sie nicht später als acht Jahre nach dem Inkrafttreten dieses Protokolls ihre jährlichen Gesamtemissionen jedes der in Anhang I aufgeführten Schwermetalle aus den in Anhang II aufgeführten Kategorien von Quellen um mindestens 50 percent gegenüber dem Emissionniveau dieser Kategorien in dem nach Anhang I festgelegten Bezugsjahr verringert haben. Eine Vertragspartei, die nach diesem Absatz handeln möchte, gibt dies bei der Unterzeichnung dieses Protokolls oder beim Beitritt zu diesem Protokoll an. A Party whose total area exceeds 6000000 km2 shall be exempt from its obligations under paragraph 2 (b), (c) and (d) if it can demonstrate that it will not have reduced its total annual
( 1) Die Vertragsparteien erleichtern in Übereinstimmung mit ihren Gesetzen, sonstigen Vorschriften und Gepflogenheiten den Austausch von Technologien und Techniken, die zur Verringerung der Emissionen von Schwermetallen ausgelegt sind, einschließlich - ohne darauf beschränkt zu sein - des Austauschs, mit dem die Entwicklung von Produktmanagementmaßnahmen und die Anwendung bester verfügbarer Techniken unterstützt wird, indem sie insbesondere folgendes fördern: The Parties shall, in accordance with their laws, regulations and practices, facilitate the exchange of technologies and techniques designed to reduce emissions of heavy metals, including, without limitation, exchanges that support the development of product management measures and the application of best available techniques, by promoting in particular the following:
( a) the commercial exchange of available technology;
( b) direct industrial contacts and cooperation, including joint ventures;
( c) the exchange of information and experience; and
( d) the provision of technical assistance.
( 2) Bei der Förderung der in Absatz 1 aufgeführten Tätigkeiten schaffen die Vertragsparteien günstige Bedingungen durch die Erleichterung von Kontakten und Zusammenarbeit zwischen geeigneten Organisationen und Einzelpersonen des privaten und öffentlichen Sektors, die in der Lage sind, Technologien, Konstruktions- und Ingenieurleistungen, Ausrüstungen oder Finanzmittel bereitzustellen. In promoting the activities listed in paragraph 1 of this Article, the Contracting Parties shall create favourable conditions by facilitating contacts and cooperation between appropriate organisations and individuals of the private and public sectors able to providing technology, design and engineering services, equipment or finance.
( 1) Jede Vertragspartei entwickelt unverzüglich Strategien, Politiken und Programme, um ihren Verpflichtungen aus diesem Protokoll nachzukommen. Each Contracting Party shall, without delay, develop strategies, policies and programmes to fulfil its obligations under this Protocol.
( 2) Eine Vertragspartei kann ebenfalls: A Contracting Party may also:
( a) use economic instruments to promote cost effective approaches to the reduction of heavy metal emissions;
( b) promote contracts between the State and industry and voluntary agreements;
( c) support the more efficient use of resources and raw materials;
( d) encourage the use of less polluting energy sources;
( e) take measures to develop and introduce transport systems with a lower environmental impact;
( f) take measures for the gradual replacement of certain heavy metal releasing processes where applicable substitutes are available on an industrial scale;
( g) take measures to develop and use clean processes for the prevention and control of environmental pollution.
( 3) Die Vertragsparteien können strengere als die in diesem Protokoll geforderten Maßnahmen ergreifen. The Contracting Parties may take more stringent measures than those required by this Protocol.
The Parties shall, with an emphasis on the heavy metals listed in Annex I, promote research, development, monitoring and cooperation, inter alia, with respect to:
( a) emissions, long range transport, deposition and modelling thereof, existing concentrations in the biotic and abiotic environment, the elaboration of procedures for the harmonisation of relevant methods;
( b) pollutant paths and inventories in representative ecosystems;
( c) relevant effects on human health and the environment, including the quantification of such effects;
( d) best available techniques and practices and emission limitation procedures currently in use or under development among the Parties;
( e) collection, recovery and, where necessary, disposal of products or waste containing one or more heavy metals;
( f) methods that allow the consideration of socioeconomic factors in the assessment of alternative mitigation strategies;
( g) an impact-based approach integrating relevant information, including information under subparagraphs (a) to (f), on measured or modelled environmental concentrations, transmission pathways and impacts on human health and the environment, for the purpose of formulating future best possible mitigation strategies that take into account economic and technological factors;
( h) alternatives to the use of heavy metals in the products listed in Annexes VI and VII;
( i) collection of information on concentrations of heavy metals in certain products, on the emission potential of such metals during production, processing, trade, use and disposal of the product, and on procedures to reduce such emissions.
( 1) In Übereinstimmung mit ihren Rechtsvorschriften über die Vertraulichkeit gewerblicher Informationen In accordance with their laws on the confidentiality of commercial information
( a) each Contracting Party shall provide to the executive body, through the Executive Secretary of the Commission, periodically, as determined by the Contracting Parties meeting in the executive body, information on the measures it has taken to implement this Protocol;
( b) each Contracting Party within the geographical scope of EMEP shall, through the Executive Secretary of the Commission, at regular intervals to be determined by the Steering Body of EMEP and approved by the Contracting Parties at a meeting of the Executive Body, provide it with information on the level of emissions of the heavy metals listed in Annex I, at least in accordance with the methods and temporal and spatial resolution established by the Steering Body of EMEP.
Parties outside the geographical scope of EMEP shall, upon request, provide similar information to the executive body.
In addition, each Contracting Party shall, where appropriate, collect and report relevant information on its emissions of other heavy metals, taking into account the methodological guidelines and the temporal and spatial resolution of the steering body of EMEP and of the executive body.
( 2) Die nach Absatz 1 Buchstabe a) vorzulegenden Informationen müssen im Einklang mit einem von den Vertragsparteien auf einer Tagung des Exekutivorgans gefassten Entscheidung über Form und Inhalt der Informationen stehen. The information to be submitted in accordance with paragraph 1 (a) of this Article shall be in accordance with a decision taken by the Parties at a meeting of the executive body on the form and content of the information.
The provisions of this Decision shall, if necessary, be reviewed in order to identify additional elements concerning the form or content of the information to be included in the report.
( 3) Rechtzeitig vor jeder Jahrestagung des Exekutivorgans legt das EMEP Informationen über den weiträumigen Transport und die Deposition von Schwermetallen vor. In good time before each annual meeting of the executive body, EMEP shall provide information on the long range transport and deposition of heavy metals.
EMEP shall provide the executive body with calculations of transboundary flows and depositions of heavy metals within the geographical scope of EMEP, using appropriate models and measurements and in good time before each annual meeting of the executive body.
Outside the geographical scope of EMEP, appropriate models shall be used to reflect the particular circumstances of the Contracting Parties to the Convention.
Compliance with the obligations of the Parties under this Protocol shall be regularly reviewed.
The Implementing Committee established by Decision 1997 / 2 of the executive body at its fifteenth session shall carry out such reviews and report to the Contracting Parties meeting in the executive body in accordance with the Annex to that Decision, including its amendments.
Review by the Contracting Parties at meetings of the executive body
( 1) Die Vertragsparteien überprüfen auf den Tagungen des Exekutivorgans nach Artikel 10 Absatz 2 Buchstabe a) des Übereinkommens die von den Vertragsparteien, dem EMEP und anderen Nebenorganen vorgelegten Informationen und die in Artikel 9 dieses Protokolls bezeichneten Berichte des Durchführungsausschuss. The Parties shall, at meetings of the executive body pursuant to Article 10 (2) (a) of the Convention, review the information provided by the Parties, EMEP and other subsidiary bodies and the reports of the Executive Committee referred to in Article 9 of this Protocol.
( 2) Die Vertragsparteien überprüfen auf den Tagungen des Exekutivorgans, welche Fortschritte auf dem Weg zur Erfuellung der Verpflichtungen aus diesem Protokoll gemacht worden sind. The Contracting Parties shall, at the meetings of the executive body, review the progress made towards the fulfilment of the obligations under this Protocol.
( 3) Die Vertragsparteien überprüfen auf den Tagungen des Exekutivorgans, ob die in diesem Protokoll festgelegten Verpflichtungen ausreichend und wirksam sind. The Contracting Parties shall, at meetings of the executive body, verify whether the obligations set out in this Protocol are adequate and effective.
( a) such reviews shall take into account the best available scientific information on the effects of the deposition of heavy metals, assessments of technological developments and changing economic conditions;
( b) such reviews shall be conducted in the light of research, development, monitoring and cooperation under this Protocol;
( i) assess progress towards attaining the objective of this Protocol;
( ii) assess whether additional emission reductions in excess of the levels required by this Protocol are justified in order to further reduce adverse effects on human health or the environment; and
( iii) take into account the extent to which there is a satisfactory basis for the application of an impact approach;
( c) the procedures, methods and timetable for such reviews shall be determined by the Parties at a meeting of the executive body.
( 4) Die Vertragsparteien erstellen anhand der Schlufolgerungen aus den in Absatz 3 bezeichneten Überprüfungen so bald wie möglich nach Abschluss der Überprüfung einen Arbeitlan über weitere Schritte zur Verringerung der Emissionen der in Anhang I aufgeführten Schwermetalle in die Atmosphalle. The Parties shall draw up, on the basis of the conclusions of the reviews referred to in paragraph 3 of this Article, a work plan on further steps to reduce the emissions of the heavy metals listed in Annex I into the atmosphere as soon as possible after the review has been completed.
( 1) Im Fall einer Streitigkeit zwischen zwei oder mehr Vertragsparteien über die Auslegung oder Anwendung dieses Protokolls bemühen sich die betroffenen Vertragsparteien um eine Beilegung der Streitigkeit durch Verhandlungen oder andere friedliche Mittel ihrer Wahl. In the event of a dispute between two or more Contracting Parties concerning the interpretation or application of this Protocol, the Contracting Parties concerned shall seek a settlement of the dispute by negotiation or other peaceful means of their choice.
The parties to the dispute shall inform the executive body of their dispute.
( 2) Bei der Ratifikation, der Annahme oder der Genehmigung dieses Protokolls oder beim Beitritt zu diesem Protokoll oder jederzeit danach kann eine Vertragspartei, die keine Organisation der regionalen Wirtschaftsintegration ist, in einer dem Verwahrer vorgelegten schriftlichen Urkunde erklären, daß sie in Bezug auf jede Streitigkeit über die Auslegung oder Anwendung des Protokolls eines oder beide der folgenden Mittel der Streitbeilegung gegenüber jeder Vertragspartei, welche dieselbe Verpflichtung übernimmt, von Rechts wegen und ohne besondere Übereinkunft als obligatorisch anerkennt: In the event of ratification, acceptance or approval of this Protocol or of accession to this Protocol or at any time thereafter, a Party which is not a regional economic integration organisation may declare in a written instrument submitted to the depositary that, in respect of any dispute concerning the interpretation or application of the Protocol, it recognises one or both of the following means of
( a) submission of the dispute to the International Court of Justice;
( b) arbitration in accordance with procedures decided by the Contracting Parties as soon as possible at a session of the executive body in an Annex concerning arbitration.
A Contracting Party which is a regional economic integration organisation may make a declaration having equivalent effect in respect of arbitration under the procedure provided for in subparagraph (b) of this Article.
( 3) Eine nach Absatz 2 abgegebene Erklärung bleibt in Kraft, bis sie gemäß den darin enthaltenen Bestimmungen erlischt, oder bis zum Ablauf von drei Monaten nach Hinterlegung einer schriftlichen Rücknahmenotifikation beim Verwahrer. A declaration made in accordance with paragraph 2 of this Article shall remain in force until it expires in accordance with the provisions contained therein, or until the expiry of three months after the deposit of a notification of written withdrawal with the depositary.
( 4) Eine neue Erklärung, eine Rücknahmenotifikation oder das Erlöschen einer Erklärung berührt nicht die beim Internationalen Gerichtshof oder bei dem Schiedsgericht anpending Verfahren, sofern die Streitparteien nichts anderes vereinbaren. A new declaration, notification of withdrawal or the lapse of a declaration shall not affect proceedings before the International Court of Justice or the arbitral tribunal, unless the parties to the dispute agree otherwise.
( 5) Vorbehaltlich der Einigung der Streitparteien auf die Mittel der Streitbeilegung nach Absatz 2 wird die Streitigkeit auf Ersuchen einer der Streitparteien einem Vergleichsverfahren unterworfen, wenn nach Ablauf von zwölf Monaten, nachdem eine Vertragspartei einer anderen notifiziert hat, daß eine Streitigkeit zwischen ihnen besteht, die betreffenden Vertragsparteien ihre Streitigkeit nicht durch die in Absatz 1 genannten Mittel beilegen konnten. Subject to the agreement of the parties to the dispute on the means of dispute settlement referred to in paragraph 2, the dispute shall, at the request of either of the parties to the dispute, be subject to conciliation if, at the end of 12 months after one Party has notified another that a dispute exists between them, the Parties concerned were unable to settle their dispute through the means referred to in paragraph 1 of this Article.
( 6) Für die Zwecke des Absatzes 5 wird eine Vergleichskommission gebildet. For the purposes of paragraph 5, a Comparative Commission shall be established.
The Commission shall be composed of an equal number of members appointed by the parties concerned or, in the case of several parties to the conciliation procedure, by the entirety of those parties, and a chairman elected jointly by the members so appointed.
The Commission shall render a recommendative award which the Parties shall examine in good faith.
in the form of an exchange of letters between the European Community and the Argentine Republic under Article XXVIII of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) 1994 amending the concessions concerning garlic provided for in the CXL list annexed to GATT
Convention for the Unification of Certain Rules relating to International Carriage by Air
RECOGNIZING the important contribution made by the Agreement on the Unification of Rules for International Carriage (hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Warsaw Agreement <unk>) signed in Warsaw on 12 October 1929 and other related agreements for the harmonisation of private international air transport law;
RECOGNISING the need to modernise and bring together the Warsaw Convention and related instruments,
ACKNOWLEDGING the importance of the protection of consumer interests in respect of international air transport and of reasonable levels of compensation <unk> (1) in accordance with the principle of full compensation;
AFFIRMING the desire for the orderly development of international air traffic and the smooth carriage of passengers, luggage and goods in accordance with the principles and objectives of the Agreement on International Civil Aviation concluded at Chicago on 7 December 1944,
CONVINCED that joint action by States to further harmonize and codify certain rules relating to international carriage by air by means of a new Agreement is the best means of achieving a fair balance of interests,
( 1) Dieses Übereinkommen gilt für jede internationale Beförderung von Personen, ReisegeLuck oder Gütern, die durch Luftfahrzeuge gegen Entgelt erfolgt. This Convention shall apply to any international carriage of persons, luggage or goods carried by aircraft against payment.
It shall also apply to carriage free of charge by aircraft carried out by an air carrier.
( 2) Als <unk> internationale Beförderung <unk> im Sinne dieses Übereinkommens ist jede Beförderung anzusehen, bei der nach den Vereinbarungen der Parteien der Abgangsort und der Bestimmungsort, gleichviel ob eine Unterbrechung der Beförderung oder ein Fahrzeugwechsel stattfinden oder nicht, in den Hoheitsgebieten von zwei Vertragsstaaten liegen oder, wenn diese Orte zwar im Hoheitsgebiet nur eines Vertragsstaats liegen, aber eine Zwischenlandung in dem Hoheitsgebiet eines anderen Staates vorgesehen ist, selbst wenn dieser Staat kein Vertragsstaat ist. <unk> international transport
Carriage between two locations within the territory of only one State Party without a stopover in the territory of another State shall not be considered as international carriage within the meaning of this Agreement.
( 3) Ist eine Beförderung von mehreren consecufolgenden Luftfrachtführern auszuführen, so gilt sie, gleichviel ob der Beförderungsvertrag in der Form eines einzigen Vertrags oder einer Reihe von Verträgen geschlossen worden ist, bei der Anwendung dieses Übereinkommens als eine einzige Beförderung, sofern sie von den Parteien als eintliche Leistung vereinbart worden ist; eine solche Beförderung verlieren ihre Eigenschaft als internationale Beförderung nicht dadurch, daß ein Vertrag oder eine Reihe von Verträgen ausschließlich im Hoheitsgebiet desselben Staates zu erfuellen ist. If carriage is to be carried out by several successive carriers, it shall be considered, irrespective of whether the contract of carriage has been concluded in the form of a single contract or a series of treaties, as a single carriage in the application of this Agreement, provided that it has been agreed by the Parties as a single service; such carriage shall not lose its status as international carriage by
( 4) Dieses Übereinkommen gilt auch für Beförderungen nach Kapitel V vorbehaltlich<unk> 2) der darin enthaltenen Bedingungen. This Agreement shall also apply to promotions provided for in Chapter V (2) of the conditions contained therein.
State transport and carriage of mail
( 1) Dieses Übereinkommen gilt auch für die Beförderungen, die der Staat oder eine andere juristische Person des öffentlichen Rechts ausführt, wenn die Voraussetzungen des Artikels 1 vorliegen. This Convention shall also apply to promotions carried out by the State or any other legal entity governed by public law, if the conditions laid down in Article 1 are met.
( 2) Bei der Befuhr von Postsendungen haftet der Luftfrachtführer nur gegenüber der zuständigen Postverwaltung nach Maßgabe der auf die Beziehungen zwischen Luftfrachtführern und Postverwaltungen anwendbaren Vorschriften. In the case of the carriage of postal consignments, the air carrier shall be liable only to the competent postal administration in accordance with the rules applicable to relations between air carriers and postal administrations.
( 3) Mit Ausnahme des Absatzes 2 gilt dieses Übereinkommen nicht für die Beförderung von Postsendungen. With the exception of paragraph 2 of this Article, the provisions of this Convention shall not apply to the carriage of mail.
PRODUCTS AND PROVIDERS OF THE PARTIES REFERRED THE PRODUCTION OF TRAVELLING, JOURNEY PACKAGES AND GOODS
( 1) Bei der Beförderung von Reisenden ist ein Einzel- oder Sammelbeförderungsschein auszuhändigen; er muss enthalten: In the case of passenger transport, a single or collective transport document shall be issued and shall contain:
( a) indication of the place of departure and destination;
( b) if the place of departure and destination is in the territory of the same State Party but one or more stopovers are provided in the territory of another State, the indication of at least one of these stopovers.
( 2) Jede andere Aufzeichnung, welche die in Absatz 1 genannten Angaben enthält, kann anstelle des in jenem Absatz genannten Beförderungsscheins verwendet werden. Any other record containing the information referred to in paragraph 1 of this Article may be used instead of the transport document referred to in that paragraph.
Where such other records are used, the carrier shall offer to provide the passenger with a written declaration of the information contained therein.
( 3) Der Luftfrachtführer hat dem Reisenden für jedes aufgegebene Baggage stück einen Beleg zur Baggage identifizierung auszuhändigen. The air carrier shall hand over to the passenger a voucher for luggage identification for each item of checked baggage.
( 4) Der Wanderer ist schriftlich darauf Hinweisen, daß dieses Übereinkommen, soweit es Anwendung findet, die Haftung des Luftfrachtführers für Tod oder Körperverletzung, für Zerstörung, Verlust oder Beschädigung von Baggage sowie für verzötung regelt und beschränken kann. The Traveller shall be notified in writing that this Convention, to the extent applicable, governs and may limit the air carrier <unk> s liability for death or bodily injury, for the destruction, loss or damage of luggage, and for delay.
( 5) Die Nichtsehtung der Absätze 1 bis 4 berührt weder den Bestand noch die Wirksamkeit des Beförderungsvertrags; dieser unterliegt gleichwohl den Vorschriften dieses Übereinkommens einschließlich derjenigen über die Haftungsbeschränkung. Failure to comply with paragraphs 1 to 4 of this Article shall not affect the existence or effectiveness of the Contract of Carriage, which shall nonetheless be subject to the provisions of this Convention, including those relating to the limitation of liability.
( 1) Bei der Beförderung von Gütern ist ein Luftwachtbrief auszuhändigen. A consignment note shall be issued for the carriage of goods.
( 2) Anstelle eines Luftwachtbriefs kann jede andere Aufzeichnung verwendet werden, welche die Angaben über die auszuführende Beförderung enthält. In lieu of an air waybill, any other record containing the information on the transport to be carried may be used.
Where such other records are used, the air carrier shall, at the sender <unk> s request, provide the sender with an acknowledgement of receipt of the goods, which shall enable the consignment to be identified and the information contained in such other records to be used.
The bill of lading and the acknowledgement of receipt of goods shall contain:
( a) indication of the place of departure and destination;
( b) if the place of departure and destination is in the territory of the same State Party but one or more stopovers are provided in the territory of another State, the indication of at least one of these stopovers;
( c) indication of the weight of the consignment.
Where necessary, the sender may be required to issue a document indicating the nature of the goods in order to comply with the requirements of customs, police or other authorities.
This provision shall not give rise to any obligation, liability or liability on the part of the carrier.
( 1) Der Luftwachtbrief wird vom Absender in drei Ausfertigungen ausgestellt. The consignment note shall be issued by the sender in three copies.
( 2) Die erste Ausfertigung trägt den Vermerk <unk> für den Luftfrachtführer <unk>; sie wird vom Absender unterzeichnet. The first copy shall bear the mark <unk> for the carrier <unk> and shall be signed by the sender.
The second copy shall bear the <unk> note for the consignee <unk> and shall be signed by the sender and the carrier.
The third copy shall be signed by the carrier and, upon receipt of the goods, handed over to the sender.
( 3) Die Unterschrift des Luftfrachtführer und diejenige des Absenders können gedruckt oder durch einen Stempel ersetzt werden. The signature of the carrier and that of the sender may be printed or stamped.
( 4) Wird der Luftfrachtbrief auf Verlangen des Absenders vom Luftfrachtführer ausgestellt, so wird bis zum Beweis des Gegenteils suspects, daß der Luftfrachtführer im Namen des Absenders gehandelt hat. If the air bill of lading is issued by the air carrier on the sender <unk> s request, it shall be assumed, pending evidence of the contrary, that the air carrier has acted on the sender <unk> s behalf.
( a) the carrier may require the sender to issue individual air waybills;
( b) the sender may require the carrier to hand over individual acknowledgements of receipt if other records are used within the meaning of Article 4 (2).
Failure to comply with Articles 4 to 8 shall not prejudice the existence or effectiveness of the Contract of Carriage, which is nevertheless subject to the provisions of this Convention, including those relating to the limitation of liability.
( 1) Der Absender haftet für die Richtigkeit der Angaben und Erklärungen über die Güter, die von ihm oder in seinem Namen in den Luftfrachtbrief eingetragen werden, sowie der von ihm oder in seinem Namen dem Luftfrachtführer gegemacht Angaben oder Erklärungen zur Aufnahme in die Empfangsbescheintigung über die Güter oder in die anderen Aufzeichnungen im Sinne des Artikels 4 Absatz 2. Dies gilt auch, wenn die für den Absender handelnde Person gleichzeitig der Beauftragte des Luftfrachtführers ist. The sender shall be liable for the correctness of the information and declarations concerning the goods entered by him or in his name in the air carriage letter, and of the information or declarations made by him or in his name to the air cargo carrier for inclusion in the receipt of the goods or other records referred to in Article 4 (2).
( 2) Der Absender hat dem Luftfrachtführer den Schaden zu ersetzen, den dieser oder ein Dritte, dem der Luftfrachtführer haftet, dadurch erleiden, daß die von dem Absender oder in seiner Namen gegemacht Angaben und Erklärungen unrichtig, ungenau oder invollständig sind. The sender shall compensate the air carrier for any damage incurred by the latter or any third party to which the air carrier is liable as a result of incorrect, inaccurate or incomplete information and declarations provided by the sender or on his behalf.
( 3) Vorbehaltlich<unk> 3) der Absätze 1 und 2 hat der Luftfrachtführer dem Absender den Schaden zu ersetzen, den dieser oder ein Dritte, dem der Absender haftet, dadurch erleiden, daß die Angaben und Erklärungen, die vom Luftfrachtführer oder in seinem Namen in die Empfangsbescheintigung über die Güter oder in die anderen Aufzeichnungen im Sinne des Artikels 4 Absatz 2 aufgenommen wurden, unrichtig, ingenau oder invollständig sind. Subject to the provisions of paragraphs 1 and 2 of this Article, the air carrier shall compensate the sender for the damage incurred by the sender or by a third party to whom the sender is liable by the information and declarations entered by the air carrier or on its behalf in the receipt of the goods or other records referred to in Article 4 (2) being incorrect, inaccurate or incomplete.
( 1) Der Luftfrachtbrief und die Empfangsbescheintigung über die Güter begründen die widerlegbare Vermutung für den Abschluss des Vertrags, die Annahme der Güter und die Beförderungsbedingungen, die darin niedergelegt sind. The air bill of lading and the receipt of the goods shall give rise to the refutable presumption of the conclusion of the contract, the acceptance of the goods and the conditions of carriage laid down therein.
( 2) Die Angaben in dem Luftfrachtbrief und der Empfangsbescheintigung über die Güter zu gewicht, Maßen und Verpackung sowie zu der Anzahl der Frachtstücke begründen die widerlegbare Vermutung ihrer Richtigkeit; die Angaben über Menge, Rauminhalt und Zustand der Güter begründen diese Vermutung gegenüber dem Luftfrachtführer nur insoweit, als er diese Angaben in Gegenwart des Absenders nachgeprüft hat und dies auf dem Luftfrachtbrief oder der Empfangsbescheintigung vermerkt ist, oder wenn es sich um Angaben handelt, die sich auf den äußerlich erkennbaren Zustand der Güter beziehen. The particulars in the air bill and the acknowledgement of receipt of the weight, dimensions and packaging of the goods and the number of the pieces of freight shall give rise to the disproving presumption of their correctness; the quantity, volume and condition of the goods shall
( 1) Der Absender ist unter der Eindingung, daß er alle Verpflichtungen aus dem Frachtvertrag erfuellt, berechtigt, über die Güter in der Weise zu verfügen, daß er sie am Abgangs- oder Bestimmungsflughafen sich zurückgeben, unterwegs während einer Landhalt, am Bestimmungsort oder unterwegs an eine andere Person als den ursprünglich bezeichneten Empfänger abliefern oder zum Abgangsflughafen zurückbringen lässt. The sender shall be entitled to dispose of the goods in such a way as to return them at the airport of departure or destination, to stop on the way during a landing, to deliver them to a person other than the original designated consignee or to return them to the airport of departure, provided that he fulfils all the obligations under the freight contract.
This right may be exercised only to the extent that it does not prejudice the air carrier or the other senders, and the sender is obliged to reimburse the costs incurred in exercising that right.
( 2) Ist die Ausführung der Weisungen des Absenders impossible, so hat der Luftfrachtführer ihn unverzüglich zu verständigen. If it is impossible to carry out the instructions of the sender, the air carrier shall notify him immediately.
( 3) Kommt der Luftfrachtführer den Weisungen des Absenders nach, ohne die Vorlage der diesem übergebenen Ausfertigung des Luftfrachtbriefs oder der Empfangsbescheintigung über die Güter zu verlangen, so haftet er unbeschadet seines Rückgriffsanspruchs gegen den Absender dem rechtmäßigen Besitz des Luftfrachtbriefs oder der Empfangsbescheintigung über die Güter für den daraus entstehenden Schaden. If the air carrier complies with the sender <unk> s instructions without requesting the presentation of the copy of the air bill of lading or the acknowledgement of receipt of the goods, it shall, without prejudice to its claim of recourse against the sender, be liable to the rightful owner of the air bill of lading or the acknowledgement of receipt of the goods for the resulting damage.
( 4) Das Recht des Absenders erlischt mit dem Zeitpunkt, in dem das Recht des Empfängers nach Artikel 13 entstehen. The right of the sender shall cease when the right of the recipient arises in accordance with Article 13.
However, it revives when the consignee refuses to accept the goods or when it cannot be reached.
( 1) Sofern der Absender nicht von seinem Recht nach Artikel 12 Gebrauch gemacht hat, ist der Empfänger berechtigt, nach Eintreffen der Güter am Destmungsort vom Luftfrachtführer die Ablieferung der Güter gegen Zahlung der geschuldeten Beträge und gegen Erfuellung der Beförderungsbedingungen zu verlangen. Unless the sender has exercised his right under Article 12, the consignee shall be entitled, upon the arrival of the goods at the destination, to request from the air carrier the delivery of the goods against payment of the sums due and against fulfilment of the conditions of carriage.
( 2) Sofern nichts anderes vereinbart ist, hat der Luftfrachtführer dem Empfänger das Eintreffen der Güter unverzüglich anzuanzeigen. Unless otherwise agreed, the carrier shall notify the consignee immediately of the arrival of the goods.
( 3) Hat der Luftfrachtführer den Verlust der Güter anerkannt oder sind die Güter nach Ablauf von sieben Tagen seit dem Tag, an dem sie should eintreffen, nicht eingetroffen, so kann der Empfänger die Rechte aus dem Frachtvertrag gegen den Luftfrachtführer geltend machen. If the air carrier has acknowledged the loss of the goods or if the goods have not arrived after seven days from the date on which they should have arrived, the consignee may claim the rights under the freight contract against the air carrier.
The sender and the consignee may, whether acting on their own account or on behalf of others, assert on their own behalf the rights to which they are entitled under Articles 12 and 13, provided that they fulfil their obligations under the freight contract.
Relationships between sender and consignee or third parties
( 1) Die RechtsBeziehungen zwischen dem Absender und dem Empfänger sowie die RechtsBeziehungen Dritter, die ihre Rechte vom Absender oder vom Empfänger herleiten, werden durch die Artikel 12, 13 und 14 nicht berührt. The legal relations between the sender and the recipient and the legal relations of third parties deriving their rights from the sender or the recipient shall not be affected by Articles 12, 13 and 14.
( 2) Jede von den Artikeln 12, 13 und 14 abweichende Vereinbarung muss auf dem Luftwachtbrief oder auf der Empfangsbescheintigung über die Güter vermerkt werden. Any arrangement deviating from Articles 12, 13 and 14 shall be noted on the air waybill or on the acknowledgement of receipt of the goods.
Rules of customs, police and other authorities
( 1) Der Absender ist verpflichtet, alle Auskünfte zu erteilen und alle Urkunden zur Verfügung zu stellen, die vor Aushändigung der Güter an den Empfänger zur Erfuellung der Vorschriften der Zoll-, der Polizei- und anderer Behörden erforderlich sind. The sender shall be obliged to provide all information and documents required before the goods are handed over to the consignee to satisfy the requirements of customs, police and other authorities.
The sender shall be liable to the air carrier for any damage caused by the absence, incompleteness or inaccuracy of such information and documents, unless the air carrier or its persons are at fault.
( 2) Der Luftfrachtführer ist nicht verpflichtet, diese Auskünfte und Urkunden auf ihre Richtigkeit und Vollständigkeit zu prüfen. The air carrier shall not be obliged to verify the correctness and completeness of such information and documents.
LIABILITY OF THE AIR LANGUAGE AND THE ENVIRONMENT OF THE REPLACEMENT OF DAMAGE (4)
Death and bodily injury of travellers - damage to luggage
( 1) Der Luftfrachtführer hat den Schaden zu ersetzen, der dadurch entstehen, daß ein Reisender getötet oder bodily hurt wird, jedoch nur, wenn sich der Unfall, durch den der Tod oder die Körperverletzung verursacht wurde, an Bord des Luftfahrzeugs oder beim Ein- oder Aussteigen ereignet hat. The air carrier shall replace the damage caused by the death or bodily injury of a passenger, but only if the accident causing death or bodily injury occurred on board the aircraft or when boarding or disembarking.
( 2) Der Luftfrachtführer hat den Schaden zu ersetzen, der durch Zerstörung, Verlust oder Beschädigung von aufgegebenem Reisegeluggck entstehen, jedoch nur, wenn das Event, durch das die die Zerstörung, der Verlust oder die Beschädigung verursacht wurde, an Bord des Luftfahrzeugs oder während eines Zeitraums eingetreten ist, in dem sich das aufgegebene Reisegepäck in der Obhut des Luftfrachtführers befindet. The air carrier shall replace any damage caused by the destruction, loss or damage of checked luggage, but only if the event causing the destruction, loss or damage occurred on board the aircraft or during a period in which the checked luggage was in the care of the air carrier.
However, the carrier shall not be liable if and to the extent that the damage is due to the nature of the baggage or to an inherent defect.
In the case of unchecked luggage, including personal belongings, the carrier shall be liable if the damage is due to its own fault or the fault of its people.
( 3) Hat der Luftfrachtführer den Verlust des aufgegebenen Reisegeluggcks anerkannt oder ist das aufgegebene Reisegeluggck nach Ablauf von undzwanzig Tage seit dem Tag, an dem es should have eintreffen, nicht eingetroffen, so kann der Wanderer die Rechte aus dem Beförderungsvertrag gegen den Luftfrachtführer geltend machen. If the air carrier has acknowledged the loss of the checked baggage or if the checked baggage has not arrived after twenty one days from the date on which it should have arrived, the passenger may claim the rights under the Contract of Carriage against the air carrier.
( 4) Vorbehaltlich<unk> 5) gegenstehender Bestimmungen bedeutet in diesem Übereinkommen der Begriff <unk> Reisegepäck <unk> sowohl aufgegebenes sowie nicht aufgegebenes Reisegepäck. 5) contrary provisions in this Agreement, the term <unk> luggage
( 1) Der Luftfrachtführer hat den Schaden zu ersetzen, der durch Zerstörung, Verlust oder Beschädigung von Gütern entstehen, jedoch nur, wenn das Event, durch das der Schaden verursacht wurde, während der Luftbeförderung eingetreten ist. The air carrier shall replace any damage caused by the destruction, loss or damage to goods, but only if the event causing the damage occurred during the air carriage.
( 2) Der Luftfrachtführer haftet jedoch nicht, wenn und soweit er nachweist, daß die Zerstörung, der Verlust oder die Beschädigung der Güter durch einen oder mehrere der folgenden Umstände verursacht wurde: However, the air carrier shall not be liable if and to the extent that it can prove that the destruction, loss or damage to the goods was caused by one or more of the following circumstances:
( a) the nature of the goods or any defect inherent in them;
( b) faulty packaging of the goods by a person other than the carrier or his staff;
( c) an act of war or armed conflict;
( d) sovereign action in connection with the import, export or transit of the goods.
( 3) Die Luftbeförderung im Sinne des Absatzes 1 umfasst den Zeitraum, während dessen die Güter sich in der Obhut des Luftfrachtführer befinden. Air carriage as defined in paragraph 1 shall cover the period during which the goods are in the care of the air carrier.
( 4) Der Zeitraum der Luftbeförderung umfasst nicht die Beförderung zu Land, zur See oder auf Binnengewässern außerhalb eines Flughafen. The period of air transport shall not include land, sea or inland transport outside an airport.
However, where such carriage is carried out for the purpose of loading, delivery or transhipment in the course of the performance of the contract of carriage by air, it shall be presumed, pending evidence to the contrary, that the damage was caused by an event occurring during the carriage by air.
If, without the consent of the sender, an air carrier replaces, in whole or in part, the air carriage agreed by the Parties by another type of carriage, this shall be considered to have been carried out within the period of carriage.
The carrier shall compensate for any damage caused by a delay in the carriage by air of passengers, luggage or goods.
However, he shall not be liable for the damage caused by the delay if he can prove that he and his people have taken all reasonable measures to avoid the damage or that he or she has not been able to take such measures.
If the air carrier proves that the person claiming the claim for damages (6), or its predecessor in law, caused or contributed to the damage by an unlawful act or omission, whether or not it was negligent, the air carrier shall be fully or partly exempt from its liability to that person to the extent that that act or omission caused or contributed to the damage.
7), the air carrier shall be fully or partially exempt from its liability to the extent that it can prove that the damage was caused or contributed to by an unlawful act or omission on the part of the passenger, whether or not it was negligent.
This Article shall apply to all liability provisions of this Convention, including paragraph 1 of Article 21.
8) In the event of death or bodily injury of a passenger
( 1) Für Schäden nach Artikel 17 Absatz 1, die 100000 Sonderziehungsrechte je Reisenden nicht übersteigen, kann die Haftung des Luftfrachtführers nicht ausgeschlossen oder beschränkt werden. For damage not exceeding 100000 Special Drawing Rights per passenger in accordance with Article 17 (1), the liability of the air carrier shall not be excluded or restricted.
( 2) Der Luftfrachtführer haftet nicht für Schäden nach Artikel 17 Absatz 1, soweit sie 100000 Sonderziehungsrechte je Reisenden übersteigen, wenn er nachweist, daß The air carrier shall not be liable for any damage in accordance with Article 17 (1) to the extent that it exceeds 100000 Special Drawing Rights per passenger if it can prove that:
( a) such damage is not the result of an unlawful act or omission on the part of the air carrier or its persons, whether or not it was caused by negligence; or
( b) such damage is solely the result of an unlawful act or omission by a third party, whether or not it was committed through negligence.
Maximum liability in the event of delay and for baggage and goods
( 1) Für DeltungsSchäden im Sinne des Artikels 19 haftet der Luftfrachtführer bei der Befuhr von Personen nur bis einem Betrag von 4150 Sonderziehungsrechte je Reisenden. The air carrier shall be liable for any delay in the carriage of persons within the meaning of Article 19 only up to an amount of 4150 Special Drawing Rights per passenger.
( 2) Bei der Befuhr von Reisegeluggck haftet der Luftfrachtführer für Zerstörung, Verlust, Beschädigung oder delay nur bis einem Betrag von 1000 Sonderziehungsrechte je Reisenden; diese Beschränkung gilt nicht, wenn der Wanderer bei der Handgabe des aufgegebenen Reisegeluggcks an den Luftfrachtführer das Interesse an der Ablieferung am Destmungsort betragsmäßig angegeben und den verlangten Zuschlag entrichtet hat. In the case of the carriage of luggage, the air carrier shall be liable for destruction, loss, damage or delay not exceeding 1000 Special Drawing Rights per passenger, except where the passenger has indicated, on a fixed date, and paid the requested supplement, the interest in the delivery to the destination of the checked luggage to the air carrier.
In this case, the air carrier shall provide compensation up to the amount of the specified amount, unless it can prove that it is in excess of the passenger <unk> s actual interest in the delivery at the destination.
( 3) Bei der Befuhr von Gütern haftet der Luftfrachtführer für Zerstörung, Verlust, Beschädigung oder delay nur bis einem Betrag von 17 Sonderziehungsrechte für das Kilograms; diese Beschränkung gilt nicht, wenn der Absender bei der Handgabe des Frachtstücks an den Luftfrachtführer das Interesse an der Ablieferung am Destmungsort betragsmäßig angegeben und den verlangten Zuschlag entrichtet hat. In the case of the carriage of goods, the air carrier shall be liable for destruction, loss, damage or delay only up to an amount of 17 Special Drawing Rights for the kilogram; this limitation shall not apply if the sender, at the time of handover of the piece of cargo to the air carrier, has indicated betragsmäßig interest in the delivery to the destination and has paid the requested supplement.
In this case, the air carrier shall provide compensation up to the amount of the specified amount, unless it can prove that it is in excess of the sender <unk> s actual interest in the place of destination.
( 4) Im Fall der Zerstörung, des Verlust, der Beschädigung oder der spätung eines Teiles der Güter oder irgendeines darin enthaltenen gegenstands ist für die Feststellung, bis zu welcher Betrag der Luftfrachtführer haftet, nur das Gesamtgewicht der betroffenen Freichtstücke berechgebend. In the event of the destruction, loss, damage or delay of any part of the goods or of any item contained therein, only the total weight of the pieces of freight concerned shall be relevant for the determination of the amount to which the carrier is liable.
However, where the destruction, loss, damage or delay of any part of the goods or of any item contained therein adversely affects the value of other pieces of freight listed in the same air waybill or acknowledgement of receipt or, if not issued, in the other records referred to in Article 4 (2), the total weight of such pieces of freight shall be decisive in determining the amount to which the carrier is liable.
( 5) Die Absätze 1 und 2 finden keine Anwendung, wenn proved wird, daß der Schaden durch eine Handlung oder Unterlassung des Luftfrachtführers oder seiner Menschen verursacht worden ist, die entweder in der Absicht, Schaden herbeizuführen, oder frichtfertig und in dem Bewusstsein begangen wurde, daß probably ein Schaden eintreten wird; im Fall einer Handlung oder Unterlassung der Menschen ist Außerdem nachweisen, daß diese in Ausführung ihrer Verrichtungen gehandelt haben. The provisions of paragraphs 1 and 2 of this Article shall not apply where it is established that the damage has been caused by an act or omission by the air carrier or its people, either with the intention of causing harm, or recklessly and with the awareness that it is likely to cause harm; in the case of an act or omission by the people concerned, it shall also be demonstrated that they have acted in accordance with their instructions.
( 6) Die in Artikel 21 und in diesem Artikel festgesetzten Haftungsbeschränkungen nicht hindern das Gericht, zusätzlich nach seinem Recht einen Betrag zuzusprechen, der ganz oder teilweise den vom Kläger aufgewendeten Gerichtskosten und sonstigen Ausgaben für den Rechtsstreit, einschließlich Zinsen, entspricht. The limitations on liability set out in Article 21 and in this Article shall not prevent the Court from making, in addition, under its own laws, an additional contribution equivalent in whole or in part to the court costs and other expenses incurred by the plaintiff in the dispute, including interest.
This shall not apply if the amount of the damages awarded (9) does not exceed the amount offered by the carrier to the plaintiff in writing, within a period of six months from the date of the event causing the damage, or, if the action has been brought after that period has expired, before its collection, without taking into account the court costs and other expenses of the dispute.
( 1) Die in diesem Übereinkommen angegebenen Beträge von Sonderziehungsrechte beziehen sich auf das vom Internationalen Währung festgelegte Sonderziehungsrecht. The amounts of Special Drawing Rights specified in this Agreement relate to the Special Drawing Right established by the International Monetary Fund.
Such amounts shall be converted into local currencies in the event of judicial proceedings based on the value of such currencies in the Special Drawing Rights at the time of the decision.
The value, expressed in Special Drawing Rights, of the national currency of a Contracting State that is a member of the International Monetary Fund shall be calculated in accordance with the assessment method applied by the International Monetary Fund, which shall apply to its operations and transactions at the time of the decision.
The value, expressed in Special Drawing Rights, of the national currency of a Contracting State which is not a member of the International Monetary Fund shall be calculated in a manner determined by that State.
( 2) Dessen ungeachtet können Staaten, die nicht Mitglieder des Internationalen Währung sind und deren Recht die Anwendung des Absatzes 1 nicht zulst, bei der Ratifikation oder dem Beitritt oder jederzeit danach erklären, daß die Haftung des Luftfrachtführer in gerichtlichen Verfahren in ihrem Hoheitsgebiet im Fall des Artikels 21 auf 1500000 Rechnungseinheiten je Reisenden Limited ist, im Fall des Artikels 22 Absatz 1 auf 62500 Rechnungseinheiten je Reisenden, im Fall des Artikels 22 Absatz 2 auf 15000 Rechnungseinheiten je Reisenden und im Fall des Artikels 22 Absatz 3 auf 250 Rechnungseinheiten für das Kilogramm. Notwithstanding this, States which are not members of the International Monetary Fund and whose laws do not permit the application of paragraph 1 may, at ratification or accession, or at any time thereafter, declare that the air carrier <unk> s liability in judicial proceedings in their territory
One unit of account corresponds to 65 1 / 2 milligrams of gold of 900 / 1000 purity.
These amounts may be converted into a rounded amount of the local currency.
Amounts shall be converted into the local currency in accordance with the laws of the State concerned.
( 3) Die Berechnung nach Absatz 1 Satz 4 und die Umrechnung nach Absatz 2 ist so vorzunehmen, daß soweit wie möglich die Beträge in den Artikeln 21 und 22 dem selben Realwert in der LandesWährung des Vertragsstaats entsprechen, wie er sich aus der Anwendung des Absatzes 1 Satz 1 bis 3 ergeben würde. The calculation in accordance with paragraph 1, sentence 4, and the conversion in accordance with paragraph 2 shall be carried out in such a way as to ensure that, as far as possible, the amounts referred to in Articles 21 and 22 of this Article correspond to the same real value in the national currency of the Contracting State as would result from the application of paragraph 1, sentences 1 to 3.
The Contracting States shall, at the time of deposit of the instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession, inform the depositary of the method of calculation referred to in paragraph 1 of this Article or the result of the conversion referred to in paragraph 2 of this Article and of any amendment thereto.
( 1) Unbeschadet des Artikels 25 und vorbehaltlich<unk> 11) des Absatzes 2 werden die Hafungshöchstbeträge nach den Artikeln 21, 22 und 23 vom Depositar<unk> 12) nach jeweils fünf Jahren überprüft; die erste Überprüfung ist am Ende des 5. Jahres vorzunehmen, das nach das Inkrafttreten dieses Übereinkommens folgt, oder, wenn das Übereinkommen nicht innerhalb von fünf Jahren ab dem Tag, an es ersten zur Unterlag aufliegt, in Kraft tritt, innerhalb des ersten Jahres nach Inkrafttreten; der Überprüfung ist ein Inflationsfaktor zugrunde zu legen, der der der der kumulierten Inflationsrate seit der früheren Überprüfung oder, beim ersten Mal, seit Inkrafttreten des Übereinkommens entspricht. Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 25 and 11) of paragraph 2, the maximum amounts of liability referred to in Articles 21, 22 and 23
The inflation rate to be used in determining the inflation factor shall be the weighted average of the annual growth or decline rates of the consumer price indices of the States whose currencies constitute the Special Drawing Right referred to in Article 23 (1).
( 2) Ergibt die in Absatz 1 genannte Überprüfung, daß der Inflationsfaktor 10 Prozent<unk> 13) übersteigt, so notifiziert der Depositar<unk> 14) den Vertragsstaaten die angeebenen Hafungshöchstbeträge. Where the verification referred to in paragraph 1 of this Article indicates that the inflationary factor exceeds 10% (13), the depositary shall notify the States Parties of the adjusted maximum amounts of liability.
Each adaptation shall enter into force six months after its notification to the States Parties.
If, within three months of notification to States Parties, a majority of States Parties notifies them of their rejection, the adjustment shall not enter into force, in which case the depositary shall submit the matter to a meeting of States Parties.
The depositary (16) shall immediately notify all States Parties of the entry into force of any adjustment.
( 3) Unbeschadet des Absatzes 1 ist das in Absatz 2 genannte Verfahren auf Verlangen eines Drittels der Vertragsstaaten jederzeit anzuwenden, wenn der in Absatz 1 genannte Inflationsfaktor seit der vorherige Überprüfung oder, wenn eine solche nicht erfolgt ist, seit Inkrafttreten des Übereinkommens, 30 Prozent<unk> 17) überstieg hat. Without prejudice to paragraph 1, the procedure referred to in paragraph 2 shall be applied at any time at the request of one third of the States Parties if the inflation factor referred to in paragraph 1 has exceeded the previous review or, if such review has not taken place, since the entry into force of the Convention, 30%.
Further reviews in accordance with the procedure described in paragraph 1 of this Article shall be carried out after five years, for the first time at the end of the fifth year following a review under this paragraph.
An air carrier may, under the Contract of Carriage, submit to liability ceilings greater than those provided for in this Convention or waive liability ceilings.
Any provision of the Contract of Carriage intended to exclude the liability of the carrier or to reduce the maximum liability laid down in this Agreement shall be null and void and shall not invalidate the whole of the Agreement, which shall nonetheless be subject to this Agreement.
Nothing in this Agreement shall preclude the air carrier from refusing to enter into a contract of carriage, from waiving any objection at its disposal under this Agreement, or from laying down contractual conditions which do not conflict with this Agreement.
If air accidents result in the death or bodily injury of a passenger, the air carrier, if required to do so under national law, shall promptly make advance payments to persons entitled to compensation for damages (18) for the satisfaction of their immediate economic needs.
Such advance payments shall not constitute an acknowledgement of liability and may be offset against any subsequent performance of damages <unk> 19) by the carrier.
For the carriage of passengers, luggage and goods, any claim for damages <unk> 20), on whatever legal ground it may be based, be it this Agreement, a contract, an unlawful act or any other legal ground, may be asserted only under the conditions and subject to the restrictions provided for in this Agreement, without prejudice to the question of which persons are entitled to sue and the rights to which they are entitled.
Any such action shall preclude any form of punitive, aggravated or other non-compensatory damages.
( 1) Wird einer der Leute des Luftfrachtführers wegen eines Schadens in Anspruch genommen, der unter dieses Übereinkommen fällt, so kann er sich auf die Haftungsbedingsetzungen und -beschränkungen berufen, die nach diesem Übereinkommen für den Luftfrachtführer gelten, sofern er nachweist, daß er in Ausführung seiner Verrichtungen gehandelt hat. If any of the persons in the Air Carrier is claimed for damage covered by this Agreement, he may invoke the liability requirements and limitations applicable to the Air Carrier under this Agreement, provided that he demonstrates that he has acted in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement.
( 2) Der Betrag, der in diesem Fall von dem Luftfrachtführer und seinen Menschen als Ersatz insgesamt zu leisten ist, darf die genannten Haftungsgrenzen nicht übersteigen. The sum to be paid in total in this case by the air carrier and its persons as a substitute shall not exceed the limits of liability referred to above.
( 3) Die Absätze 1 und 2 finden, außer bei der Befuhr von Gütern, keine Anwendung, wenn festgestellt wird, daß der Schaden durch eine Handlung oder Unterlassung der Menschen des Luftfrachtführers verursacht worden ist, die entweder in der Absicht, Schaden herbeizuführen, oder frichtfertig und in dem Bewusstsein begangen wurde, daß wahrscheinlich ein Schaden eintreten wird. The provisions of paragraphs 1 and 2 of this Article shall not apply, except in the case of the carriage of goods, where it is established that the damage has been caused by an act or omission by the persons of the air carrier, either with the intention of causing harm or recklessly and in the knowledge that such damage is likely to occur.
( 1) Nimmt der Empfänger aufgegebenes Reisegeluggck oder Güter vorbehaltlos an, so begründet dies die widerlegbare Vermutung, daß sie unbeschädigt und entsprechend dem Beförderungsschein oder den anderen Aufzeichnungen im Sinne des Artikels 3 Absatz 2 und Artikels 4 Absatz 2 abgegeliefert worden sind. If the consignee accepts checked baggage or goods without reservation, this shall give rise to the refutable presumption that they have been delivered undamaged and in accordance with the terms of Article 3 (2) and Article 4 (2).
( 2) Im Fall einer Beschädigung muss der Empfänger unverzüglich nach Entdeckung des Schadens, bei aufgegebenem ReisegeLuck Anyway binnen sieben und bei Gütern binnen vierzehn Tage nach der Annahme, dem Luftfrachtführer Anzeige erstatten. In the event of damage, the consignee shall notify the carrier immediately after the damage has been discovered, within seven days in the case of checked luggage and fourteen days in the case of goods after acceptance.
In the event of a delay, notification shall be made within twenty one days after the baggage or goods have been placed at the disposal of the addressee.
( 3) Jede Beanstandung Must be declared in writing and delivered or sent within the time limit provided for.
( 4) Wird die Anzeigefrist versäumt, so ist jede Klage gegen den Luftfrachtführer ausgeschlossen, es sei sei, daß dieser fraustig gehandelt hat. If the period of notice is missed, any claim against the air carrier shall be excluded unless the latter has acted fraudulently.
If the person liable for such damages dies (23), the claim for such damages (24) under this Agreement may be made against his successors in title.
( 1) Die Klage auf Schadensatz<unk> 25) muss im Hoheitsgebiet eines der Vertragsstaaten erhoben werden, und zwar nach Wahl des Klägers entweder bei dem Gericht des Ort, an dem sich der Wohnsitz des Luftfrachtführers, seine Hauptniederlassung oder seine Geschäftsstelle befindet, durch die der Vertrag geschlossen worden ist, oder bei dem Gericht des Bestimmungsorts. The claim for damages (25) must be brought in the territory of one of the States Parties, at the plaintiff <unk> s discretion, either before the court of the place of residence of the air carrier, its headquarters or its office through which the contract has been concluded, or before the court of destination.
( 2) Die Klage auf Ersatz des Schadens, der durch Tod oder Körperverletzung eines Reisenden entstanden ist, kann bei einem der in Absatz 1 genannten Gerichte oder im Hoheitsgebiet eines Vertragsstaats erhoben werden, in dem der Traveller im Zeitpunkt des Unfalls seinen ständigen Wohnsitz hatten und in das oder aus dem der Luftfrachtführer Reisende im Luftverkehr gewerbsmäßig befördert, und zwar entweder mit seinen eigenen Luftfahrzeugen oder aufgrund einer Geschäftsftlichen Vereinbarung mit Luftfahrzeugen eines anderen Luftfrachtführers, und in dem der Luftfrachtführer sein Gewerbe von Geschäftsräumen aus betreibt, deren tenant oder Besitz er selbst oder ein anderer Luftfrachtführer ist, mit dem er eine Geschäftsftliche Vereinbarung geschlossen hat. The claim for compensation of damage caused by the death or bodily injury of a passenger may be brought before one of the courts referred to in paragraph 1 of this Article or in the territory of a Contracting
( 3) Im Sinne des Absatzes 2 bedeutet Within the meaning of paragraph 2:
( a) a commercial arrangement establishing a contract between carriers for the provision of joint air transport services to passengers other than commercial agents <unk> 26);
( b) permanent residence and habitual residence of the Traveller at the time of the accident.
The nationality of the traveller is not decisive in this respect.
( 4) Das Verfahren richten sich nach dem Recht des angerufenen Gerichts. The procedure shall be governed by the law of the court being called.
( 1) Die Parteien des Vertrags über die Befuhr von Gütern können nach Maßgabe dieses Artikels vereinbaren, daß Streitigkeiten über die Haftung des Luftfrachtführers nach diesem Übereinkommen in einem Schiedsverfahren beigelegt werden. The Parties to the Treaty on the carriage of goods may agree, in accordance with the provisions of this Article, that disputes concerning the air carrier <unk> s liability under this Agreement shall be settled in arbitration.
( 2) Das Schiedsverfahren wird nach Wahl des Anspruchstellers an einem der in Artikel 33 genannten Gerichtsstände durchgeführt. Arbitration shall be conducted at the discretion of the claimant at one of the courts referred to in Article 33.
( 3) Der Schiedsrichter oder das Schiedsgericht hat dieses Übereinkommen anzuwenden. The arbitrator or tribunal shall apply this Convention.
( 4) Die Absätze 2 und 3 gelten als Bestandteil jeder Schiedsklausel oder -vereinbarung; abweichende Bestimmungen sind nichtig. Paragraphs 2 and 3 of this Article shall form an integral part of any arbitration clause or agreement and any deviating provisions shall be null and void.
( 1) Die Klage auf Schadensatz<unk> 27) kann nur binnen einer Ausschlußfrist von zwei Jahren erhoben werden; die Frist beginnt mit dem Tag, an dem das Luftfahrzeug am Bestimmungsort gekommen ist oder an dem es Should have ankommen oder an dem die Beförderung abgebrochen worden ist. The claim for damages (27) may only be brought within a period of exclusion of two years commencing on the date on which the aircraft arrived at its destination or on which it should have arrived or on which the carriage has been cancelled.
( 2) Die Berechnung der Frist richten sich nach dem Recht des angerufenen Gerichts. The time limit shall be calculated in accordance with the law of the court being called.
( 1) Jeder Luftfrachtführer, der Reisende, Reisegeluggck oder Güter annimmt, ist bei Beförderungen im Sinne des Artikels 1 Absatz 3, die nacheinander durch mehrere Luftfrachtführer ausgeführt werden, den Vorschriften dieses Übereinkommens unterworfen; er gilt für den Teil der Beförderung, der unter seiner Leitung ausführt wird, als Partei des Beförderungsvertrags. Any air carrier that accepts passengers, luggage or goods shall be subject to the provisions of this Agreement for carriage within the meaning of Article 1 (3), carried out in succession by several air carriers, and shall be considered as a Party to the contract of carriage.
( 2) Bei einer solchen Beförderung kann der Wanderer oder die sonst anspruchsberechtigt Person nur den Luftfrachtführer in Anspruch nehmen, der die Beförderung ausgeführt hat, in deren Verlauf der Unfall oder die Deltung eingetreten ist, es sei sei, daß der erste Luftfrachtführer durch ausdrückliche Vereinbarung die Haftung für die ganze Reise übernommen hat. In the event of such carriage, the passenger or the person otherwise entitled to claim may only claim the air carrier which carried out the carriage in which the accident or delay occurred, unless the first air carrier has assumed liability for the whole journey by express agreement.
( 3) Bei ReisegeLuck oder Gütern kann der Wanderer oder der Absender den ersten, der Wanderer oder der Empfänger, der die Auslieferung verlangen kann, den letzten, und jeder von ihnen denjenigen Luftfrachtführer in Anspruch nehmen, der die Beförderung ausführt hat, in deren Verlauf die Zerstörung, der Verlust oder die Beschädigung erfolgt oder die Delayed eingetreten ist. In the case of luggage or goods, the traveller or the sender may claim the first, the traveller or the consignee who may request the delivery, the last and any of them may claim the air carrier which carried out the carriage during which the destruction, loss or damage or delay has occurred.
Such carriers shall be jointly and severally liable to the traveller, sender or consignee.
This Agreement shall not affect the question of whether the person liable for damages under its provisions (<unk> 28) may have recourse against another person.
( 1) Bei gemischter Beförderung, die Teil durch Luftfahrzeuge, Teil durch andere Verkehrsmittel ausführt wird, gilt dieses Übereinkommen vorbehaltlich<unk> 29) des Artikels 18 Absatz 4 nur für die Luftbeförderung im Sinne des Artikels 1. In the case of mixed transport carried out in part by aircraft and in part by other means of transport, this Agreement shall apply, subject to the conditions laid down in Article 18 (4), only to air transport as defined in Article 1.
( 2) Bei gemischter Beförderung sind die Parteien durch dieses Übereinkommen nicht gehindert, Bedingungen für die Beförderung durch andere Verkehrsmittel in den Luftbeförderungsvertrag aufzunehmen, sofern hinsichtlich der Luftbeförderung dieses Übereinkommen beachtet wird. In the case of mixed transport, the Parties shall not be prevented by this Agreement from including conditions for transport by other means of transport in the Agreement, provided that this Agreement is observed with respect to air transport.
AIR PROVISION BY ANY OTHER THAN THE CONTRACTED AIR PROVIDER
This Chapter shall apply when a person (hereinafter referred to as <unk> the Contractual Air Carrier <unk>) has concluded a Contract of Carriage subject to this Agreement with a traveller or sender or a person acting on behalf of the traveller or sender and another person (hereinafter referred to as <unk> the executing Air Carrier <unk>) is entitled, pursuant to an agreement with the Contractual Air Carrier, to perform the carriage in whole or in part, without, in respect of this Part, being a successive carriage within the meaning of this Agreement.
The entitlement shall be assumed until such time as evidence to the contrary is provided.
If an exporting air carrier carries out in whole or in part a carriage governed by the Contract of Carriage referred to in Article 39 of this Agreement, both the contractual air carrier and the exporting air carrier shall be subject, unless otherwise provided in this Chapter, to the provisions of this Agreement, the former for all carriage provided for in the Treaty, the latter only for the carriage which it carries out.
( 1) Die Handlungen und Unterlassungen des ausführenden Luftfrachtführers und seiner Menschen, soweit diese in Ausführung ihrer Verrichtungen handeln, gelten bezüglich der von dem ausführenden Luftfrachtführer ausgeführten Beförderung auch als solche des Vertragsglichen Luftfrachtführers. The acts and omissions of the exporting air carrier and its persons, to the extent that they are acting in the execution of their directions, shall also be considered as such of the contractual air carrier with respect to the carriage carried out by the exporting air carrier.
( 2) Die Handlungen und Unterlassungen des vertraglichen Luftfrachtführers und seiner Menschen, soweit diese in Ausführung ihrer Verrichtungen handeln, gelten bezüglich der von dem ausführenden Luftfrachtführer ausgeführten Beförderung auch als solche des ausführenden Luftfrachtführers. The actions and omissions of the contractual air carrier and its persons, to the extent that they are acting in the execution of their directions, shall also be considered as such of the exporting air carrier with respect to the carriage carried out by the exporting air carrier.
However, such acts or omissions shall not make the actual carrier liable beyond the amounts referred to in Articles 21, 22, 23 and 24.
A special arrangement whereby the contractual air carrier shall enter into obligations not imposed by this Agreement, or waiver of rights or objections under this Agreement, or a declaration of interest in the delivery in accordance with Article 22, shall be effective in respect of the exporting air carrier only with the latter <unk> s consent.
Complaints or instructions to be made to the carrier pursuant to this Agreement shall take effect, whether addressed to the contractual carrier or to the exporting carrier.
However, the instructions under Article 12 shall only take effect if they are addressed to the contractual carrier.
In so far as the exporting air carrier has carried out the carriage, both his and the persons of the contractual air carrier, provided that they demonstrate that they have acted in accordance with their obligations, may invoke the conditions and limitations of liability applicable under this Agreement to the air carrier to which they belong, except where evidence is furnished that they have acted in a manner which precludes recourse to the limitations of liability under this Agreement.
In so far as the exporting air carrier has carried out the carriage, the amount to be paid by that air carrier, the contractual air carrier and their agents, provided that they have acted in accordance with their obligations, as compensation for damages (31), shall not exceed the maximum amount which may be claimed under this Agreement by the contractual air carrier or the exporting air carrier as compensation (32); however, none of the abovementioned persons shall be liable beyond the maximum amount applicable to them.
In so far as the executing air carrier has carried out the carriage, action for damages (33) may be brought, at the applicant <unk> s discretion, against that air carrier, the contractual air carrier or both, jointly or separately.
Where the action is brought only against one of those carriers, the latter shall have the right to require the other carrier to participate in the dispute and the effects and proceedings shall be governed by the law of the court before it.
An action for damages (34) under Article 45 may be brought only in the territory of one of the Contracting States, at the discretion of the plaintiff, either before one of the courts before which an action may be brought against the contractual carrier in accordance with Article 33, or before the court of the place of residence or principal place of business of the exporting carrier.
Any contractual provision which shall exclude the liability of the contractual or exporting carrier under this Chapter, or which shall reduce the maximum authoritative amount of liability, shall be null and void and shall not result in the annulment of the entire Agreement, which shall continue to be governed by the provisions of this Chapter.
This Chapter, with the exception of Article 45, shall not affect the rights and obligations of carriers among themselves, including rights of recourse or damages (35).
All provisions of the Contract of Carriage and any special arrangements made prior to the occurrence of the damage with which the Parties derogate from this Convention by determining the law to be applied or by amending the rules on jurisdiction shall be null and void.
States Parties shall oblige their air carriers to insure themselves adequately to meet their liability under this Convention.
The Contracting State to which the carriage is carried out by an air carrier may require proof of adequate insurance coverage to cover liability under this Convention.
The provisions of Articles 3 to 5, 7 and 8 on instruments of carriage shall not apply to carriage carried out in exceptional circumstances and not within the framework of ordinary air transport.
The term <unk> days <unk> for the purposes of this Convention means calendar days, not working days.
( 1) Dieses Übereinkommen liegt am 28. Mai 1999 in Montreal für die Staaten zur Unterzeichnung auf, die an der Internationalen Konferenz über Luftrecht vom 10. bis zum 28. Mai 1999 in Montreal teilgenommen haben. This Convention shall be open for signature in Montreal on 28 May 1999 by those States which have participated in the International Conference on Air Treaty held in Montreal from 10 to 28 May 1999.
After 28 May 1999, the Convention shall be open for signature by all States at the headquarters of the International Civil Aviation Organisation in Montreal until it enters into force in accordance with paragraph 6 of this Article.
( 2) Dieses Übereinkommen liegt ebenfalls für Organisationen der regionalen Wirtschaftsintegration zur Unterzeichnung auf. This Agreement shall also be open for signature by regional economic integration organisations.
For the purposes of this Agreement, a <unk> regional economic integration organisation <unk> means an organisation constituted by sovereign States of a particular region which is competent for certain items governed by this Agreement and has the due authority to sign and ratify, accept, approve or accede to this Agreement.
A reference to a <unk> State Party <unk> or <unk> Contracting States <unk> in this Agreement, with the exception of Article 1 (2), Article 3 (1) (b), Article 5 (b), Articles 23, 33 and 46 and Article 57 (b), shall apply equally to a regional economic integration organisation.
The references in Article 24 to <unk> a majority of States Parties <unk> and <unk> a third of States Parties <unk> shall not apply to any regional economic integration organisation.
( 3) Dieses Übereinkommen bedarf der Ratifikation durch die Staaten und Organisationen der regionalen Wirtschaftsintegration, die es unterzeichnet haben. This Agreement shall be subject to ratification by the States and regional economic integration organisations which have signed it.
( 4) Staaten oder Organisationen der regionalen Wirtschaftsintegration, die dieses Übereinkommen nicht unterzeichnen, können es jederzeit annehmen oder genehmigen oder ihm beitreten. States or regional economic integration organisations which do not sign this Agreement may at any time accept or approve it or accede to it.
( 5) Die Ratifikations-, Annahme-, Genehmigungs- oder Beitrittsurkunden werden bei der Internationalen Zivilluftfahrt-Organisation hinterlegt; diese wird hiermit zum Depositar<unk> 36) bestimmt. Instruments of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession shall be deposited with the International Civil Aviation Organization, which shall hereby become depositary (36).
( 6) Dieses Übereinkommen tritt am sechzigsten Tag nach Hinterlegung der dreißigsten Ratifikations-, Annahme-, Genehmigungs- oder Beitrittsurkunde beim Depositar<unk> 37) zwischen den Staaten in Kraft, die eine solche Urkunde hinterlegt haben. This Convention shall enter into force on the sixtieth day following the deposit of the thirtieth instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession with the depositary (37) between the States which have deposited such an instrument.
An instrument deposited by a regional economic integration organization shall not be counted to that extent.
( 7) Für andere Staaten und für andere Organisationen der regionalen Wirtschaftsintegration tritt dieses Übereinkommen sechzig Tage nach Hinterlegung der Ratifikations-, Annahme-, Genehmigungs- oder Beitrittsurkunde in Kraft. For other States and for other regional economic integration organisations, this Agreement shall enter into force sixty days after the date of deposit of the instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession.
( 8) Der Depositar<unk> 38) notifiziert allen Unterzeichnern und Vertragsstaaten umgehend
( a) any signature of this Convention and the date thereof;
( b) any deposit of an instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession and the date of such deposit;
( c) the date of entry into force of this Agreement;
( d) the date on which an adjustment of the maximum liability amounts made under this Convention enters into force;
( e) Any denunciation under Article 54.
( 1) Jeder Vertragsstaat kann dieses Übereinkommen durch eine an den Depositar<unk> 39) gerichtete schriftliche Notifikation kündigen. Any State Party may terminate this Agreement by notifying the depositary in writing.
( 2) Die Kündigung wird einhundertachtzig Tage nach Eingang der Notifikation beim Depositar<unk> 40) wirksam. Termination shall become effective one hundred and eighty days after the date of receipt of the notification by the depositary.
Relationship with other agreements related to the Warsaw Agreement
This Agreement shall take precedence over all the provisions applicable to international carriage by air.
1. between States Parties to this Agreement on the basis of the fact that these States are jointly Parties to the following Agreements:
( a) Agreement for the Unification of Rules relating to International Carriage by Air, signed in Warsaw on 12 October 1929 (hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Warsaw Agreement <unk>);
( b) the Protocol amending the Agreement on the Unification of Rules for International Carriage by Air, signed at Warsaw on 12 October 1929 and adopted at The Hague on 28 September 1955 (hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Hague Protocol <unk>);
( c) Additional Agreement to the Warsaw Convention for the Unification of Rules relating to International Carriage by Air carried out by a Carrier other than the Contracting Carrier, signed in Guadalajara on 18 September 1961 (hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Guadalajara Agreement <unk>);
( d) Protocol amending the Agreement on the Unification of Rules for International Carriage by Air, signed in Warsaw on 12 October 1929, as amended by the Hague Protocol of 28 September 1955, signed in Guatemala City on 8 March 1971 (hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Protocol of Guatemala City <unk>);
( e) Additional Protocols 1 to 3 and the Montreal Protocol 4 amending the Warsaw Convention as amended by the Hague Protocol or the Warsaw Convention as amended by the Hague Protocol and the Guatemalan City Protocol, signed in Montreal on 25 September 1975 (hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Montreal Protocols <unk>), or
2. within the territory of an individual State Party to this Agreement by virtue of the fact that that State is party to one or more of the agreements referred to in subparagraphs (a) to (e) of paragraph 1.
( 1) Umfasst ein Staat zwei oder mehr Gebietseinheiten, in denen auf die durch dieses Übereinkommen geregelten Gegenstände unterschiedliche Rechtsordnungen angewendet werden, so kann er bei der Unterzeichnung, der Ratifikation, der Annahme, der Genehmigung oder dem Beitritt erklären, daß dieses Übereinkommen sich auf alle seine Gebietseinheiten oder nur auf eine oder mehrere der selben erstreckt; er kann seine Erklärung jederzeit durch eine neue Erklärung ersetzt. A State comprising two or more territorial units in which different legal systems are applied to items governed by this Agreement may, at the time of signature, ratification, acceptance, approval or accession, declare that this Agreement extends to all its territorial units or to only one or more of them; it may, at any time, replace its declaration by a new declaration.
( 2) Die Erklärungen werden dem Depositar<unk> 42) notifiziert und müssen ausdrücklich angeben, auf welche Gebietseinheiten sich das Übereinkommen erstreckt. Statements shall be notified to the depositary (42) and shall explicitly specify to which territorial units the Convention extends.
( 3) Hinsichtlich eines Vertragsstaats, der eine solche Erklärung abgegeben hat, With respect to any State Party which has made such a declaration:
( a) any reference to the <unk> national currency <unk> in Article 23 shall be construed as referring to the currency of the relevant territorial unit of that State; and
( b) the reference to <unk> national law <unk> in Article 28 shall be understood as referring to the law of the relevant territorial unit of that State.
No reservations may be made with respect to this Agreement, except that a State Party may at any time, by notification addressed to the depositary, declare that this Agreement does not apply to:
( a) international carriage by air, carried out and carried out directly by that State Party for non-commercial purposes with a view to its functions and obligations as a sovereign State;
( b) the carriage of persons, goods and luggage for its military services by aircraft registered or rented by it in that Contracting State, reserved exclusively for such services.
between the European Union and the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia on the activities of the European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia
On the other hand,
hereinafter referred to as <unk> Participating Parties
- the European Community and its Member States have offered to establish a European Community Monitoring Mission (ECMM) in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia, and that the host Party accepted this offer on a provisional basis on 24 March 1998,
- have been observers of the European Community / European Union in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia since 1998,
- the Council of the European Union, on 22 December 2000, adopted Joint Action 2000 / 811 / CFSP on the European Union Monitoring Mission converting the ECMM into the EUMM, as an instrument of the European Union <unk> s Common Foreign and Security Policy (CFSP) which, building on previous initiatives, should contribute to formulating an effective European Union policy for the Western Balkans,
- a Stabilisation and Association Agreement between the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia and the European Communities and their Member States was concluded in Luxembourg on 9 April 2001,
- recognising the independence, sovereignty and territorial integrity of the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia and the strong desire of the European Union to contribute to further strengthening of peace and stability in the region,
( 1) Die Überwachungsmission der Europäischen Union, nachstehend <unk> EUMM <unk> genannt, die ursprünglich in der Region als Überwachungsmission der Europäischen Gemeinschaft (ECMM) errichtet wurde, hat ihr Hauptquartier derzeit in Sarajevo und wird ein Missionsbüro in Skopje sowie auf Entscheidung des Missionsleiters nach Hearing und Zustimmung der Aufnahmepartei gegebenenfalls weitere Büro in der ehemaligen jugoslawischen Republik Mazedonien einrichten, um dazu zutzutzutragen, eine wirksame Politik der Europäischen Union für den Westlichen Balkan zu formulieren. The European Union Monitoring Mission, hereinafter referred to as the EUMM, which was originally established in the region as a European Community Monitoring Mission (ECMM), shall have its headquarters in Sarajevo and shall establish a mission office in Skopje and, by decision of the Head of Mission after consultation and agreement of the host party, further offices in the former
( a) monitor political developments and developments in the security situation within their competence;
( b) pay particular attention to border control, issues affecting different ethnic groups and the return of refugees;
( c) submit analytical reports in accordance with the tasks assigned to it;
( d) contribute to the early warning of the Council and to confidence building within the framework of the stabilisation policies pursued by the European Union in the region.
( e) keep the host Party regularly informed of the activities of the EUMM, including, where the assigned tasks so provide, humanitarian matters.
( 2) Die Aufnahmepartei erteilt der EUMM alle Informationen und leistet jede Art von Zusammenarbeit, die zur Erreichung der Ziele der EUMM erforderlich sind. The host Party shall provide the EUMM with all information and shall cooperate in any manner necessary to achieve the objectives of the EUMM.
The host party may appoint a liaison officer from the respective ministries to the EUMM.
( 1) Die Aufnahmepartei ergreift alle erforderlichen Maßnahmen für den Schutz und die Sicherheit der EUMM und ihrer Mitglieder. The host Party shall take all necessary measures for the protection and security of the EUMM and its members.
All relevant arrangements proposed by the host Party shall be agreed with the Head of Mission before they are implemented.
( 2) Zur Durchführung ihrer Tätigkeit genießen die EUMM und ihr Personal unter Einbeziehung ihrer Transportmittel und Ausrüstungen die Freiheit, die zur Erfuellung des Auftrags der Mission erforderlich ist. In order to carry out their activities, the EUMM and its staff shall enjoy the freedom of movement required for the purpose of carrying out the mission <unk> s mission, including their means of transport and equipment.
( 3) Das Personal der EUMM kann bei seiner Tätigkeit von einem Dolmetscher und, auf Anforderung der EUMM, von einem von der Aufnahmespartei benannten Begleitoffizier begleitoffizier escort werden. The staff of the EUMM may be accompanied in their activities by an interpreter and, at the request of the EUMM, by an escort officer designated by the host party.
( 4) Die EUMM kann auf ihrem Missionsbüro in Skopje sowie an anderen Orten, über die der Missionsleiter befindet, die Flagge der Europäischen Union hoist. The EUMM may fly the flag of the European Union at its mission office in Skopje and at other locations over which the Head of Mission is located.
( 5) Fahrzeuge und andere Transportmittel der EUMM tragen ein Erkennungszeichen der Mission, über das die zuständigen Behörden unterrichtet werden. EUMM vehicles and other means of transport shall bear a mission identification badge which shall be communicated to the competent authorities.
( 1) Der Missionsleiter der EUMM wurde vom Rat der Europäischen Union ernannt. The head of mission of the EUMM shall be appointed by the Council of the European Union.
Future Heads of Mission shall also be so appointed.
( 2) Sonstiges EUMM -Personal shall be seconded by the Member States of the European Union.
Personnel shall be allocated to specific uses by the Head of Mission under the supervision of the Secretary-General / High Representative.
Norway and Slovakia, which participate in the EUMM at the time of this Agreement, may also designate EUMM staff, who shall then be seconding parties, as shall the European Union and its Member States.
( 3) Das auswärtige Personal der EUMM trägt die Bezeichnung <unk> Beobachter <unk>. The foreign staff of the EUMM shall bear the designation <unk> Observer <unk>.
( 4) Die Regierungen der Versandendeparteien benennen Beobachter für die EUMM. The governments of the sending parties shall designate observers for the EUMM.
( 5) Der Missionsleiter bestimmt nach Hearing und Zustimmung der Aufnahmespartei die Anzahl der Beobachter im Rahmen dieses Abkommens. The Head of Mission shall, after consultation and approval by the host party, determine the number of observers under this Agreement.
( 6) Die Beobachter unterlassen alle Handlungen oder Tätigkeiten, die mit der Unparteilichkeit ihrer Aufgaben unvereinbar sind; unbeschadet der Bestimmungen des Artikels VIII beachten sie die Rechtsvorschriften des Aufnahmeestaats. The observers shall refrain from any action or activity which is incompatible with the impartiality of their duties, without prejudice to the provisions of Article VIII, and shall observe the laws of the host State.
( 7) Die EUMM kann auf die Unterstützung durch Verwaltungs- und technisches Personal der Entsendeparteien fallgreifen. The EUMM may call upon the assistance of the administrative and technical staff of the posting parties.
The members of the administrative or technical staff of the EUMM shall enjoy, in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations, the same status as the administrative and technical staff of the posting parties in embassies.
( 8) Die EUMM kann vor Ort das erfordertigte Hilfspersonal eingestellt. The EUMM may appoint on site the auxiliary staff required.
At the request of the Head of Mission, the host Party shall facilitate the recruitment by the EUMM of qualified local staff.
The auxiliary staff of the EUMM shall enjoy the same status as the local staff in embassies, in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations.
( 1) Die Beobachter dürfen keine Waffen tragen. The observers shall not carry weapons.
( 2) Die Beobachter tragen weiß Zivilkleidung mit einem EUMM-Erkennungszeichen. The observers shall wear white civilian clothing bearing an EUMM identification mark.
( 1) Die EUMM in der ehemaligen jugoslawischen Republik Mazedonien führt ihre Tätigkeit unter der Verantwortung des Missionsleiter aus. The EUMM in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia shall carry out its activities under the responsibility of the Head of Mission.
( 2) Der Missionsleiter bericht dem Rat der Europäischen Union durch den Generalsekretär/ Hohen Vertreter regelmäßig über die Tätigkeit und die Erkenntnisse der EUMM. The Head of Mission shall report regularly to the Council of the European Union, through the Secretary-General / High Representative, on the activities and findings of the EUMM.
( 3) Im Rahmen des Mandats gemäß Artikel I Absatz 1 werden die Aufgaben der EUMM vom Generalsekretär/ Hohen Vertreter in enger Zusammenarbeit mit dem Vorsitz und in Einklang mit der vom Rat verabschiedeten Politik für den Westlichen Balkan festgelegt. The functions of the EUMM shall be determined by the Secretary-General / High Representative in close cooperation with the Presidency and in accordance with the policy for the Western Balkans adopted by the Council.
( 4) Der Missionsleiter unterrichtet die Aufnahmepartei regelmäßig über die Tätigkeit der EUMM. The Head of Mission shall regularly inform the host party of the activities of the EUMM.
( 1) Fahrzeuge und andere Transportmittel der EUMM unterliegen keine Zwangszulassung oder -genehmigung; alle Fahrzeuge sind bei Dritten versicherung. Vehicles and other means of transport of the EUMM shall not be subject to compulsory registration or approval; all vehicles shall be insured with third parties.
( 2) Die EUMM kann Straßen, Flugplätze und andere Einrichtungen ohne Zahlung von Gebühren, Maut oder anderen Abgaben benutzt. EUMM may use roads, airports and other facilities without the payment of fees, tolls or other charges.
( 3) Die Aufnahmepartei erleichtert der EUMM den Betrieb ihrer eigenen Fahrzeuge und anderen Transportmittel. The host Party shall facilitate the operation of its own vehicles and other means of transport for the EUMM.
( 1) Das EUMM-Personal hat zum Zwecke der Ausübung seiner Tätigkeit zu den üblichen Kosten Zugang zu angemessenen Telekommunikationseinrichtungen der Aufnahmepartei, auch zum Zwecke der Kommunikation mit diplomatischen oder konsularischen Vertretern der Entsendeparteien. For the purpose of carrying out its activities, the EUMM staff shall have, at the usual cost, access to appropriate telecommunications facilities of the host Party, including for the purpose of communicating with diplomatic or consular representatives of the posting parties.
( 2) Die EUMM hat das Recht auf uneingeschränkte Kommunikation mit eigenen Funkgeräten (einschließlich Satelliten-, Mobil- und Handfunk geräte), Telefonen, Telegrafen, Faxgeräten oder anderen Mitteln. EUMM shall have the right to communicate without restriction by means of its own radios (including satellite, mobile and hand-held radios), telephones, telegraphs, fax machines or other means.
The host Party shall provide, after signature of this Agreement, the frequencies on which radios may be operated.
( 1) Die EUMM erhält den Status einer diplomatischen Mission. The EUMM shall have the status of a diplomatic mission.
( 2) Die Beobachter genießen während ihrer Mission in Einklang mit dem Wiener Übereinkommen über diplomatische Beziehungen die Vorrechte und Immunitäten diplomatischer Bediensteter. The observers shall enjoy, during their mission in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations, the privileges and immunities of diplomatic officials.
( 3) Das Missionsbüro in Skopje, andere Büro und alle Transportmittel der EUMM sind unverletzlich. The mission office in Skopje, other offices and all means of transport of the EUMM shall be inviolable.
( 4) Die Vorrechte und Immunitäten nach diesem Artikel stehen den Beobachter während ihrer Mission zu und danach in Bezug auf Handlungen, die sie zuvor im Rahmen ihrer Mission ausgeführt haben. The privileges and immunities provided for in this Article shall apply to the observers during their mission and thereafter in respect of actions previously performed by them under their mission.
( 5) Die Aufnahmepartei erleichtert alle Bewegungsdes Missionsleiter und des Personals der EUMM. The host Party shall facilitate the movements of the Head of Mission and the staff of the EUMM.
The EUMM shall provide the host party with a list of the members of the EUMM and shall inform the host party in advance of the arrival or departure of EUMM staff.
The EUMM staff shall carry the national passport and an identity card of the EUMM.
( 6) Die Aufnahmepartei erkennt das Recht der Entsendeparteien und der EUMM an, zollfrei und ohne sonstige Beschränkungen die von der EUMM benötigten und zu ihrer ausschließlichen und offizielle Verwendung bestimmten Ausrüstungen, Vorräte, Lieferungen und anderen Güter einzuführen. The host Party shall recognise the right of the posting parties and of the EUMM to introduce, duty free and without other restrictions, the equipment, supplies and other goods required by the EUMM and intended for their exclusive and official use.
The receiving Party shall also recognise its right to buy such items in the territory of the receiving Party and to export or otherwise dispose of such imported or purchased equipment, stocks, supplies and other goods.
The host Party shall also recognise the right of the observers to buy and / or import items for personal use duty free and to export such items.
The Government of the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia declares its readiness to assist the EUMM, upon request, in the search for suitable office space and accommodation.
The participating Parties shall decide on other provisions concerning privileges and immunities, on practical arrangements, including emergency medical assistance and evacuation, and on requirements for travel documents.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon signature.
Its provisions shall be applied provisionally by the receiving Party of the EUMM from the date of initialling until its entry into force by signature.
The Agreement shall remain in force until one of the participating Parties notifies the other Party, within a period of two months, of its intention to request the cessation of such activities.
Approval of the administrative budget and fixing of contributions
Convention of 2001 on the Statutes of the International Jute Study Group
Recognizing the importance of jute and jute products to the economies of a number of countries,
Considering that close international cooperation in solving problems related to this commodity will promote the economic development of exporting countries and strengthen cooperation between exporting and importing countries,
Considering also that the International Agreements on Jute and Jute Products of 1982 and 1989 have contributed to cooperation between exporting and importing countries and that it is desirable to enhance the effectiveness of such cooperation in the future,
Recalling the need to promote and implement projects and activities that increase the revenue of jute producing developing countries based on jute and thereby contribute to the alleviation of poverty in those countries,
1. Die Internationale Jute-Studiengruppe, hereinafter referred to as <unk> Gruppe <unk>, wird hermit errichtet, um die Bestimmungen dieser Satzung auszuführen und ihre Anwendung zu überwachen. The International Jute Study Group, hereinafter referred to as <unk> Group
As soon as these Statutes enter into force, the Group shall be considered as the successor, legally, administratively, financially and practically, to the International Jute Organization, which was initially established under the International Agreement on Jute and Jute Products of 1982 and continued to exist under the International Agreement on Jute and Jute Products of 1989.
2. Für die Zwecke dieser Statzung For the purposes of this Statute
( a) <unk> jute <unk> means raw jute, kenaf and other related fibres including urea lobata, abutilon avicennae and cephalonema polyandrum;
( b) <unk> jute product
( c) <unk> member
( d) <unk> associated member
( e) <unk> special vote
( f) <unk> simple majority voting
( g) <unk> financial year <unk> means the period from 1 July to 30 June inclusive;
( h) <unk> jute year
( i) <unk> Statute
3. the objectives of the Group shall be to:
( a) to provide Members with an effective framework for international cooperation, consultation and the development of their policies in respect of all aspects relating to the world jute economy;
( b) promote the expansion of international trade in jute and jute products through the conservation of existing and the opening up of new markets, including the introduction of new jute products and the development of new end uses;
( c) to establish a forum for the active participation of the private sector in the development of the jute sector;
( d) address in the jute sector issues of poverty alleviation, employment and human resource development, with particular emphasis on women;
( e) facilitate the improvement of the structural characteristics of the jute sector by enhancing productivity and quality and encouraging the use of new techniques and technologies;
( f) Raise awareness of the benefits of using jute as an environmentally friendly, renewable and biodegradable natural fibre;
( g) improve market information in cooperation with other organizations, including the Food and Agriculture Organization of the United Nations (FAO), with a view to ensuring greater transparency of the international jute market.
4. In pursuit of its objectives, the Group shall perform the following functions:
( a) developing an appropriate strategy for improving the world jute economy, with particular emphasis on the promotion of jute and jute products in general;
( b) consultations and exchanges of information on the international jute economy;
( c) stimulate, encourage, supervise, control and accelerate projects and similar projects aimed at improving the structural conditions of the world jute economy and the overall economic well-being of its employees.
In exceptional cases, the participation of the Group in the implementation of projects shall be approved by the Council on condition that such participation does not impose an additional burden on the Group <unk> s administrative budget;
( d) provide and improve statistical information and market information on jute and jute dependent products in consultation with the Food and Agriculture Organization of the United Nations and other appropriate fora;
( e) conducting studies on various aspects of the world jute economy and related topics;
( f) addressing any problems or difficulties which may arise in the international jute economy.
In carrying out these functions, the Group shall take into account the activities of other relevant international organizations, including the Food and Agriculture Organization of the United Nations (FAO).
5. Mitglieder der Gruppe können alle Staaten sowie die Europäische Gemeinschaft werden, die an der Produktion, am Verbrauch oder am internationalen Handel mit Jute und Jute-Erzeugnissen interessiert sind und, mit Zustimmung des Rates, alle zwischenstaatlichen Organisationen, die für das Aushandeln, den Abschluss und die Anwendung internationaler Übereinkommen, insbesondere von Rohstoffübereinkommen, zuständig sind. Members of the Group may include any State or the European Community interested in the production, consumption or international trade in jute and jute products and, with the consent of the Council, any intergovernmental organisation responsible for the negotiation, conclusion and application of international agreements, in particular those relating to raw materials.
6. assoziierte Mitglieder der Gruppe können mit Zustimmung des Rates solche Organisationen und Rechtsträger werden, die nach Absatz 5 nicht berechtigt sind, Vollmitglieder zu werden. Associated members of the Group may, with the consent of the Council, become such organisations and entities as are not entitled to become full members under paragraph 5 of this Article.
The Council shall lay down rules concerning the circle of associated members and their rights and obligations.
7. a) The highest decision-making body of the group established in accordance with this Statute shall be the Council, in which all members are represented.
The Council shall meet at least once a year.
( b) The Council shall exercise all its powers and shall take all measures or shall take all measures necessary to implement and ensure the application of the provisions of this Statute.
( c) The Council shall, by special vote, adopt rules which are necessary for the performance of the Group <unk> s functions and which are subject to, and may not be incompatible with, these statutes.
These rules shall include (i) the rules of procedure, (ii) the financial rules and regulations relating to projects, (iii) the rules of service and (iv) the rules relating to the staff support fund.
( d) The Council shall not be empowered, and shall not be deemed to be empowered by its members, to assume obligations beyond the scope of this Statute or the provisions referred to in subparagraph (c) of this Article.
( e) In order to achieve the objectives set out in paragraph 3, the Council shall approve a work programme which shall be reviewed regularly.
8. Der Sitz der Gruppe befindet sich in Dhaka, Bangladesh, sofern der Rat nicht im Wege der besonderen Abstimmung etwas anderes beschließt. The headquarters of the Group shall be in Dhaka, Bangladesh, unless the Council, by special vote, decides otherwise.
The Council shall conclude a Headquarters Agreement with the host government as soon as practicable after the entry into force of this Statute.
9. a) Unless otherwise specified, and subject to subparagraph (d), the Council, the project committee referred to in paragraph 10, and any committees or subordinate bodies which may be set up, shall, as far as possible, take decisions by consensus.
If consensus cannot be reached, any member may request that such a decision be taken by a simple majority, unless a special vote is required.
( b) Each Member shall be entitled to the number of votes allotted to it in accordance with subparagraph (c) of this Article.
When voting, the European Community and members which are intergovernmental organisations shall cast the number of votes equal to the total number of votes accorded to their Member States.
( c) All members shall have a total of 2000 votes.
50% of the votes of all members shall be distributed evenly among all members, subject to subparagraph (b).
The remaining 50% of the total number of votes shall be divided among each member pro rata on the basis of a factor related to its importance in the jute economy (COJI) as specified in subparagraph (d).
The total number of basic votes and votes related to COJI of each member shall be rounded in an appropriate manner so as not to give rise to partial votes and so as not to exceed the total number of votes of members in 2000, subject, however, to subparagraph (e) of this Article.
( d) Für die Zwecke dieser Statzung gilt als <unk> Faktor bezogen auf die Bedeutung in der Jutewirtschaft <unk> (COJI) eines Mitglieds sein Anteil am Gesamtwert, der alle Mitgliedländer zugerechnet nach den folgenden Formuleln zugerechnet wird: For the purposes of this Statute, the <unk> factor relating to the importance in the jute economy <unk> (COJI) of a member shall be its share of the total value attributed to all member countries in accordance with the following formulas:
( i) for jute producers, the weighted average production volume of 40% and the average net trade volume of 60% of jute and jute products during the last three year period for which relevant statistics are available;
( ii) for non-jute producers and net jute importing countries, the average volume of net imports of jute and jute products during the last three year period for which relevant statistics are available.
( e) No member representing a single country shall receive more than 450 votes.
Votes exceeding this number by the method of calculation prescribed in subparagraphs (c) and (d) and in accordance with subparagraph (i) of this Article shall be distributed among all Members on the same basis as is provided for therein.
( f) Should, for any reason, difficulties arise in the calculation of votes in accordance with the method prescribed in subparagraphs (c), (d) and (e) of this Article, the Group may, by special vote, adopt another method for the distribution of votes.
( g) A Council meeting may commence only in the presence of members representing a total of 1000 votes.
A decision by the Council shall require the presence of members with a total of 1200 votes.
( h) The Council shall distribute the votes for each financial year at the beginning of the last session of the preceding year in accordance with this paragraph.
The distribution shall remain effective for the entire jute year, unless otherwise provided in subparagraph (i).
( i) The Council shall redistribute the votes of all members in accordance with this paragraph as soon as membership of the Group changes, or as soon as a member <unk> s right to vote is suspended or restricted by virtue of a provision of the rules of procedure.
The Council shall determine the date on which the redistribution of votes shall take effect.
( j) A member authorised by another member to cast the votes accorded to the authorising member in accordance with this paragraph shall cast such votes in accordance with the instructions of the authorising member.
10. a) The Council shall establish a project committee (COP) open to all members.
The Committee may invite associated members and other interested parties to participate in its work.
( b) The Project Committee shall advise the Council on all matters relating to projects and similar activities in accordance with the rules laid down by the Council.
( c) The Council may, under certain circumstances, delegate its powers with respect to the approval of projects and similar activities to the Project Committee.
The Council shall lay down rules for the delegation of powers to the Project Committee.
11. a) Um das Zusammenwirken mit der Privatwirtschaft zu erleichtern, errichtet der Rat einen Beirat der Privatwirtschaft (hereinafter referred to as <unk> Advisory Board <unk>). In order to facilitate cooperation with the private sector, the Council shall establish a Private Sector Advisory Board (hereinafter referred to as <unk> Advisory Board <unk>).
The Advisory Board shall be an advisory body which may make recommendations to the Council in matters relating to this Statute.
( b) The Advisory Board shall consist of associated members.
Other private sector entities expressing an interest may participate upon invitation.
( c) The Advisory Board shall submit periodic reports to the Council.
( d) The Advisory Board shall adopt its own rules of procedure in accordance with these statutes.
12. Besides the Project Committee and the Advisory Board of the Private Sector, the Council may establish further committees or other subordinate bodies under conditions to be determined by it.
13. a) Die Gruppe hat ein Sekretariat, das aus dem Generalsekretär und dem erforderlichen Personal besteht. The Group shall have a secretariat composed of the Secretary-General and the necessary staff.
( b) The Council shall appoint the Secretary-General by special vote.
With the exception of the appointment of the first Secretary-General, the procedure for the appointment of the Secretary-General shall be in accordance with the rules of procedure for the appointment.
( c) The Secretary-General shall be the chief administrative officer of the Group and shall be responsible to it for the application and implementation of these Statutes in accordance with the decisions of the Council.
( d) The Secretary-General shall appoint the staff in accordance with the rules laid down by the Council.
The staff shall be responsible to the Secretary-General.
14. a) The Group may, as necessary, arrange for consultations or cooperation with the United Nations, its organs or specialized agencies and other intergovernmental agencies.
( b) The Group may also make the arrangements it considers appropriate for maintaining contacts with interested governments of non-Member States, with national and international non-governmental institutions, and with non-associated private sector organizations and research entities.
( c) Observers may be invited to meetings of the Council or of its subordinate bodies on conditions to be determined by the Council or the bodies concerned.
15. Die Gruppe kann Antrag, nach Artikel 7 Absatz 9 des Übereinkommens zur Gründung des Gemeinsamen Fonds für Rohstoffe zum internationalen Rohstoffgremium (ICB) bestimmt zu werden, um im Einklang mit dieser Satzung Projekte für Jute und Jute-Erzeugnisse zu fördern, die der Fonds finanziert. The Group may request to be designated to the International Commodity Board (ICB) pursuant to Article 7 (9) of the Convention establishing the Common Fund for Commodities in order to promote, in accordance with this Statute, projects for jute and jute products financed by the Fund.
Decisions concerning the funding of such projects shall as a rule be taken by consensus.
If consensus is not reached, decisions shall be taken by special vote.
No member shall be liable, on the basis of its membership of the Council, for any liabilities arising from the borrowing or granting of loans in connection with projects by another member or entity.
The Secretary-General shall be empowered to conclude agreements with the Fund on approved projects.
16. a) The Group shall have international legal personality.
In particular, but subject to paragraph 7 (b) of this Article, it shall have the capacity to conclude contracts, to acquire and dispose of movable and immovable property, and to initiate judicial proceedings in the territory of each Member, subject to domestic law.
( b) The position of the Group in the territory of the host country shall be governed by the Headquarters Agreement between the host government and the Council referred to in paragraph 8 of this Article.
( c) As the legal successor of the International Jute Organization, all assets and liabilities of the Organization shall be transferred to the Group.
17. a) For the purposes of this Statute, the Group shall establish the following accounts:
( b) Each member shall, in accordance with the rules of procedure, contribute to the administrative account within the framework of an annual administrative budget approved by the Council.
The amount of the contribution of the members shall be directly proportional to the votes allotted to them in accordance with paragraph 9.
Payment of each member <unk> s contribution shall be made in accordance with the respective constitutional procedures.
( c) In addition to contributions to the administrative account under the annual administrative budget, the Group may accept contributions to the special account.
The special account shall be set up to finance projects, project planning and other activities.
Potential sources of financing for the Special Account may include:
( i) voluntary contributions from members, associated members and other sources; and
( ii) regional and international financial institutions, including the Common Fund for Commodities, the United Nations Development Programme, the World Bank, the Asian Development Bank, the International Fund for Agricultural Development, the Inter-American Development Bank and the African Development Bank.
18. a) Die Gruppe Analyse und verarbeitet Informationen und Statistiken zum Jute-Handel, die sie von der Ernährungs- und Landwirtschaftsorganisation der Vereinten Nationen (FAO), anderen internationalen und nationalen Einrichtungen und der Privatwirtschaft erhalten. The Group shall analyse and process information and statistics on jute trade received from the Food and Agriculture Organisation of the United Nations (FAO), other international and national institutions and the private sector.
The Group shall provide market forecasts and information on the market, including information on stocks and consumption by specific markets and industrial end users, to Members, associated Members and other interested parties.
The Group also invites national bodies in producing countries to improve data collection in the jute sector and to share the results with all interested parties.
Wherever possible, every effort shall be made to minimise duplication.
( b) The Group shall, in so far as the Council agrees, carry out studies on the international jute economy.
( c) The Group shall endeavour to ensure that the information it provides does not prejudice the confidentiality of the operations of governments, persons or undertakings producing, processing, marketing or consuming jute.
19. a) Die Gruppe übernimmt aufgrund der von den Mitgliedern übermittelten Informationen, augmented by information from all other relevant sources and including regular evaluation reports from donors, an annual assessment of the situation of the world jute economy and related affairs.
The annual assessment shall include an overview of the prospective production capacity of jute in the coming years and the outlook for jute production, consumption and trade in the following calendar year for the purpose of assisting members in their own assessment of the further development of the international jute economy.
( b) prepare a report on the results of the annual evaluation and circulate it to the members.
Where the Group considers it appropriate, this report and other reports and studies distributed to Members may be made available to other interested parties in accordance with the Rules of Procedure.
( c) The Group shall make periodic evaluations of its activities at least every two years and shall compare their consistency with the objectives and tasks of the Group in accordance with paragraphs 3 and 4 of this Article.
20. The Group shall, in consultation with members, associated members and other interested parties, identify obstacles and opportunities in the world market for jute and jute products with a view to taking appropriate action, in particular with a view to increasing demand and developing the market for jute and jute products and the diffusion and economic use of new technologies.
21. Die Mitglieder bemühen sich nach besten Kräften, zusammenarbeiten und sich für die Erreichung der Ziele der Gruppe eingesetzt, vor allem durch Übermittlung der in Absatz 19 Buchstabe a) bezeichneten Angaben. Members shall make every effort to cooperate and to contribute to the attainment of the Group <unk> s objectives, in particular by transmitting the information referred to in paragraph 19 (a).
22. Reservations to this Statute shall not be permitted.
23. a) Diese Satzung tritt in Kraft, wenn Staaten, die Europäische Gemeinschaft oder zwischenstaatliche Organisationen nach Absatz 5, auf die nach Anlage A dieser Satzung 60 v. H. des Handels (Einfuhr und Ausfuhr) mit Jute und Jute-Erzeugnissen entfallen, dem Generalsekretär der Vereinten Nationen (hereinafter referred to as <unk> Verwahrer <unk>) nach Buchstabe b) notifiziert haben, daß sie diese Satzung vorläufig anwenden oder endgültig annehmen. This Statute shall enter into force if States, the European Community or intergovernmental organizations referred to in paragraph 5 of this Article have notified the Secretary-General of the United Nations (hereinafter referred to as <unk> Depositary <unk>) in accordance with subparagraph (b) of Annex A to this Statute that they provisionally apply or definitively accept this Statute.
( b) A State, the European Community or intergovernmental organizations pursuant to paragraph 5 of this Article which wish to become members of the Group shall notify the Depositary that they have definitively accepted this Statute or are applying it provisionally pending the completion of their internal procedures.
States, the European Community or intergovernmental organisations which have notified that they are applying the Statute provisionally shall endeavour to complete their internal procedures as soon as possible and shall notify the depositary of the final adoption of the Statute.
( c) If the conditions for the entry into force of this Statute have not been fulfilled by 31 December 2001, the Secretary-General of the United Nations Conference on Trade and Development shall invite the States, the European Community and the intergovernmental organizations which have notified that they have accepted or are provisionally applying this Statute to decide whether they wish to implement this Statute among themselves.
( d) When these Statutes enter into force, the Secretary-General of the United Nations Conference on Trade and Development shall convene, as soon as possible, a founding session of the Council.
This shall, where possible, be notified to Members at least one month before the meeting.
24. Diese Statute kann vom Rat nur durch Konsens geändert werden. This Statute may be amended by the Council only by consensus.
The Secretary-General shall notify the depositary of any amendment adopted in accordance with this paragraph.
An amendment shall enter into force 90 days after the date on which notifications of acceptance by members representing at least 60% of the votes have been received by the depositary.
25. a) Die Gruppe bleibt für einen Zeitraum von acht Jahren bestehen, sofern der Rat nicht durch besondere Abstimmung beschließt, die Veltungsdauer dieser Satzung nach den Buchstaben b) und c) zu verlängern oder sie neu zu Verhandlungen oder sie nach Absatz 27 außer Kraft zu setzen. The Group shall remain in force for a period of eight years, unless the Council, by special vote, decides to extend or renegotiate the validity of this Statute in accordance with subparagraphs (b) and (c) of this Article or to suspend it in accordance with paragraph 27 of this Article.
( b) The Council may, by special vote, decide to extend the period of validity of this Statute not more than twice for two years each.
( c) The Council may, by special vote, decide to renegotiate these Statutes.
26. a) Ein Mitglied kann jederzeit durch eine an den Verwahrer und den Generalsekretär der Gruppe gerichtete schriftliche Rücktsanzeige aus der Gruppe ausstreten. A member may withdraw from the group at any time by giving written notice of withdrawal to the depositary and the Secretary-General of the group.
( b) Withdrawal shall not prejudice the financial obligations of the withdrawing member and shall not entitle the withdrawing member to a reduction in its contribution for the year in which the withdrawal is made.
( c) Withdrawal shall take effect 12 months after notification is received by the Depositary.
( d) The Secretary-General of the Group shall promptly notify each Member of the notifications received in accordance with this paragraph.
27. The Council may at any time, by special vote, decide to suspend these Statutes.
Such abrogation shall take effect on the date on which the Council decides.
The Secretary-General shall notify the Depositary of the decision taken in accordance with this paragraph.
28. Notwithstanding the lapse or withdrawal of this Statute, the Council shall remain in force for as long as is necessary for the dissolution of the Group, including the final settlement, but not more than 12 months.
between the European Community and Romania on the control of the carriage of goods by road and the promotion of combined transport
THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITY, hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Community <unk>, and
ROMANIA, hereinafter referred to as <unk> Romania
HAVING REGARD to the Europe Agreement establishing an association between the European Communities and their Member States, of the one part, and Romania, of the other part, of 1 February 1993, and in particular to Article 57 (3) thereof,
CONSIDERING that, with a view to the completion of the internal market and the implementation of the common transport policy, it is essential for the Community that the transit of goods through Romania can be completed as quickly and efficiently as possible and without obstacles or discrimination,
CONSIDERING that Romania has an interest in developing existing reciprocal rights and obligations with respect to access to the transport market and transit traffic as a first step towards a land transport agreement, as provided for in the Europe Agreement establishing an association between the European Communities and their Member States, of the one part, and Romania, of the other part, of 1 February 1993,
CONSIDERING that it is also necessary to ensure the coordinated development of transport between and through the territories of the Parties, in particular by introducing and developing a series of coordinated measures for road and combined transport which are competitive, promote environmentally friendly vehicles and are designed for sustainable mobility,
The objective of this Agreement is to strengthen cooperation between the Contracting Parties in the field of freight transport, and in particular road transit, and to ensure the coordinated development of traffic between and through the territories of the Contracting Parties.
( 1) Die Zusammenarbeit betrifft den Güterverkehr auf der Straße sowie den kombinierten Verkehr. Cooperation concerns road transport of goods and combined transport.
( 2) Dieses Abkommen regelt insbesondere folgende Punkte: This Agreement shall in particular govern the following points:
- access to the road freight transit market;
- accompanying legislative, regulatory and administrative measures, including economic, fiscal, social and technical provisions;
- cooperation in developing a transport system which also takes account of environmental protection requirements,
- the regular exchange of information on the development of the transport policies of the Parties.
For the purposes of this Agreement, the following definitions shall apply:
( a) <unk> transit traffic
( b) <unk> combined transport
- Hereby, the incoming or outgoing route shall include the route from the point at which the goods are loaded to the nearest loading bay for the incoming route and from the nearest suitable loading bay to the point at which the goods are unloaded, for the outgoing route, or
- a radius not exceeding 150 km as the crow flies around the inland or seaport of the transhipment;
( c) <unk> road vehicle
( d) <unk> user charges <unk> are special sums payable on a non-discriminatory basis for the use of an infrastructure by a motor vehicle for a fixed period of time;
( e) <unk> tolls
( f) <unk> Territory of Party
- as regards the European Community, the territory in which the Treaty establishing the European Economic Community is applied under the conditions laid down in that Treaty, and
- as regards Romania, the territory of Romania.
The Contracting Parties shall adopt by mutual agreement the measures necessary for the development and promotion of combined transport to ensure that a large part of transboundary transport is carried out under more environmentally friendly conditions.
The Parties shall take all necessary measures to improve the competitiveness of combined transport (CT), in particular:
( a) encourage transport users and consignors to use combined transport by:
- improving the competitiveness of all types of combined transport in relation to road transport by providing financial support to new CT projects in the Community or Romania,
- the promotion of unaccompanied combined transport, particularly over long distances, and in particular the use of swap bodies, containers and semitrailers;
- the abolition, within the appropriate framework, of quota and licence systems for the inflow and / or outflow routes which form an integral part of the CV service;
- the consideration of a tax reduction for road vehicles used in combined transport,
- reducing journey times and improving the reliability of combined transport, in particular by:
( i) measures are taken to increase the frequency of the transport of CV services in accordance with the needs of the senders and users;
( ii) measures are taken to reduce waiting times at terminals and increase their productivity;
( iii) simplification of frontier checks in the case of combined transport, with checks on all goods, except in cases requiring veterinary and phytosanitary inspection, being carried out as soon as possible in the CV terminals themselves;
( iv) improve the safety of the goods, the transport unit and the loading unit in the combined transport chain.
- ensuring non-discriminatory access to terminals financed or supported by public funds,
- to the extent possible, the priority award of road transit licences issued pursuant to Article 6 (2) by the competent authorities of the Contracting Parties to road haulage undertakings which make high use of combined transport in accordance with the statistical data available to each Contracting Party;
- where necessary for the uniformity of rail dimensions, for the control of the weight, dimensions and technical characteristics of specific CV equipment and for the consideration of the coordinated ordering and commissioning of such equipment where the volume of traffic so requires;
( b) provide, on request, information on new CV actions, including technology research projects, which are co-financed by the Contracting Party (s), in the form of a summary report listing the content, results and impact of the action or technology project;
- in accordance with the relevant provisions of the European Agreement on Important Transboundary Compounds and Equipment (AGTC) of 1 February 1991;
- by eliminating bottlenecks on the feeder routes to the CV terminals in order to encourage the use of combined transport,
- examination of the possibility of approving 44 tonne hexagonal vehicles on the routes used in combined transport;
- derogations from the prohibition on driving on weekends and public holidays on routes used in and out of combined transport;
- reciprocal approval of CT operators for rail transport under a new Agreement.
( 1) Die Vertragsparteien kommen hinsichtlich des beiderseitigen Zugangs zum Verkehrsmarkt überein, unbeschadet des Absatzes 2 zunächst die aufgrund bilateraler Abkommen oder sonstiger zwischen Mitgliedstaaten der Gemeinschaft und Romania geschlossener bilateraler Vereinbarungen bestehenden Regelungen beizubehalten. The Contracting Parties agree, without prejudice to paragraph 2 of this Article, to maintain in the first instance the existing arrangements based on bilateral agreements or other arrangements concluded between Member States of the Community and Romania.
However, pending the conclusion of an Agreement between the Contracting Parties on market access in the road haulage sector in accordance with Article 7, Romania shall, together with the Member States of the Community, make any necessary amendments to those bilateral agreements and / or arrangements with a view to bringing them into conformity with this Agreement.
( 2) Die Vertragsparteien kommen überein, mit Inkrafttreten dieses Abkommens zusätzlich zu den Lizenzen gemäß der in Absatz 1 genannten Regelung für jedes Kalenderjahr folgende Lizenzen für den Transitverkehr von Lastkraftfahrzeugen durch die Gebiete der Mitgliedstaaten der Gemeinschaft und Romania zu gewähren: The Contracting Parties agree, upon the entry into force of this Agreement, to grant, in addition to the licences referred to in paragraph 1 of this Article, for each calendar year the following licences for the transit of heavy goods vehicles through the territories of the Member States of the Community and Romania:
7000 licences valid in the Member States of the Community whose trademarks are glued into the licence.
3000 trademarks for each Member State of the Community.
( d) For the licences referred to in subparagraphs (a) and (b) above, the models in Annex 1a and 1b respectively shall be used.
( e) For the marks referred to in subparagraph (c), the model in Annex 1c shall be used.
( f) The certificates referred to in subparagraphs (a) and (b) shall be issued by the competent authorities of Romania and the competent authorities of the Member States of the Community, respectively, from the services of the Commission.
The competent authorities shall fill out the licence with the exception of the points <unk> number plate of the motor vehicle <unk>, <unk> outbound <unk> and <unk> return <unk> and send it to the transport undertakings for a fee which shall cover only reasonable administrative expenses.
( g) The trademarks referred to in subparagraph (c) shall be provided to the competent authorities of Romania by the services of the Commission.
The marks shall be affixed to them before the use of the licence, indicating which Member States of the Community the licence is valid for.
( h) The Contracting Parties agree that no tax or similar charge shall be levied on the use of the licences referred to in subparagraphs (a) and (b).
( i) The licences and trademarks shall be valid for one calendar year from 1 January to 31 January of the following year and may be used only for one return journey.
( 3) Die in Absatz 2 genannten Lizenzen können nur für Fahrzeuge verwendet werden, die mindestens die EURO-1 -Normen oder die in Anhang 4 aufgenommenen Bedingungen für die Bescheinigung <unk> umweltfreundlicher Lastkraftwagen <unk> erfuellen. The licences referred to in paragraph 2 of this Article may only be used for vehicles meeting at least the EURO1 standards or the conditions for certification of environmentally friendly lorries listed in Annex 4.
Evidence of compliance with these conditions shall always be carried in the vehicle.
( 4) Ist das Datum des Inkrafttretens dieses Abkommens gemäß Artikel 19 nicht der 1. Januar, so wird die Zahl der Lizenzen und Marken nach Absatz 2 in dem Kalenderjahr des Inkrafttretens des Abkommens entsprechend verringert. If the date of entry into force of this Agreement pursuant to Article 19 is not 1 January, the number of licences and trademarks in accordance with paragraph 2 of this Article shall be reduced accordingly in the calendar year in which the entry into force of this Agreement takes place.
( 5) Die zuständigen Behörden der Vertragsparteien erteilen gemäß diesem Abkommen nur solchen Verkehrsunternehmen Lzenzen für die Güterbeförderung, die im Land dieser Vertragspartei berechtigt sind, grenzüberschreitende Beförderungen auf der Straße vorzunehmen. The competent authorities of the Contracting Parties shall, in accordance with this Agreement, issue only to such transport undertakings licences for the carriage of goods authorised in the country of that Contracting Party to carry out frontier operations by road.
The licence shall be carried in the vehicle.
In the case of vehicle combinations, it shall be carried in the vehicle.
The licence shall apply to the whole combination of vehicles, even if the trailer or semitrailer is not registered in the name of the licence holder or if it is registered in another State.
( 6) Die Vertragsparteien unterlassen jegliche einseitigen Maßnahmen, die zur Diskriminierung von Verkehrsunternehmen oder fahrzeuge aus der Gemeinschaft bzw. Rumniens führen könnten. The Contracting Parties shall refrain from any unilateral measures that could lead to discrimination against transport undertakings or vehicles from the Community or Romania.
Each Contracting Party shall take the necessary measures to facilitate the road traffic covered by this Agreement in or through its territory.
The Contracting Parties undertake to develop, as a matter of priority and taking into account the fact that Romania will adopt the fiscal, social and technical provisions of the Community, a common system of the Contracting Parties for future access to the road transport market.
For carriage under this Agreement:
1. Die Vertragsparteien stellen sicher, daß bei der Kraftfahrzeugbesteuererung, bei der Steuerload, Maut und sonstigen Formen von Benutzungsgebühren nicht nach Nationgehörigkeit oder Niederlassungsort diskriminiert wird. The Contracting Parties shall ensure that no discrimination is made on the basis of nationality or place of establishment in respect of vehicle taxation, taxation, toll and other forms of user charges.
2. Straßenfahrzeuge, die bei einer Vertragspartei gemeldet sind, werden von sämtlichen Fahrzeugsteuer und Gebühren, die auf die Benutzung oder den Besitz von fahrzeuge erhoben werden, sowie von sämtlichen Sondersteuer und -abgaben, die auf Beförderungen auf dem Gebiet der anderen Vertragspartei erhoben werden. Road vehicles registered with either Party shall be exempt from all vehicle taxes and charges levied on the use or possession of vehicles and from any special taxes and charges levied on the other Party <unk> s territory.
Road vehicles shall not be exempt from the payment of taxes and charges on fuel, tolls and other user charges.
3. Die Vertragsparteien stellen sicher, daß für die Benutzung eines Straßenabschnitts nicht Simultaneously Mautgebühren und sonstige Benutzungsgebühren erhoben werden. The Contracting Parties shall ensure that tolls and other charges are not levied at the same time for the use of a road section.
However, the Contracting Parties may charge a toll for the use of bridges, tunnels and passes in transport networks where user charges are already levied.
4. folgende Stoffe und Gegenstände sind von Zollgebühren und sämtlichen Steuern und Gebühren frei: The following substances and items shall be exempt from customs duties and all taxes and fees:
( a) fuel in the tanks of road vehicles entering the territory of the other Contracting Party, when the tanks concerned are those provided by the manufacturer for the type of vehicle concerned;
( b) fuel in the tanks of trailers and semitrailers used for cooling systems of refrigeration systems;
( c) lubricants for use during the journey in appropriate quantities;
( d) spare parts and tools for the repair of a vehicle in the event of a breakdown during an international road transport operation; the parts to be replaced should be re-exported or destroyed under the supervision of the competent customs authority of the other Contracting Party.
5. Unbeschadet von Absatz 2 Unterabsatz 2 müssen für ein Fahrzeug, dessen Gewicht, Abmessungen oder Achslast die im Gebiet Romniens gültigen Grenzwerte überten, das jedoch den Bestimmungen der Richtlinie 96 / 53 / EG des Rates<unk> 1) über Gewicht und Abmessungen entspricht, keine Sonderabgaben gezahlt werden, sofern es den in Anhang 5 festgelegten Vorschriften entspricht. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph 2 (2) of this Article, no special charge shall be paid for a vehicle whose weight, dimensions or axle load exceeds the limits in force in the territory of Romania which complies with the provisions of Council Directive 96 / 53 / EC (1) on weights and dimensions, provided that it complies with the provisions laid down in Annex 5.
The Contracting Parties to this Agreement shall implement, or apply provisions consistent with Council Regulations (EEC) No 3820 / 85 (2) and (3) as amended, the European Agreement on the Work of Manpower Employed in International Road Traffic (AETR) of 1 July 1970, as amended at the time of the entry into force of this Agreement.
( 1) Romania verabschiedet bei Inkrafttreten dieses Abkommens Maßnahmen, die den in Anhang 2 genannten Rechtsvorschriften gleichwertig sind, und innerhalb von zwei Jahren nach Inkrafttreten dieses Abkommens Maßnahmen, die den in Anhang 3 genannten Rechtsvorschriften gleichwertig sind. Romania shall adopt measures equivalent to those referred to in Annex 2 and, within two years of the entry into force of this Agreement, measures equivalent to those referred to in Annex 3.
( 2) Die Vertragsparteien dieses Abkommens setzen das Europäische Übereinkommen über die internationale Beförderung gefährlicher Güter auf der Straße (ADR) vom 30. September 1957 in der bei Inkrafttreten dieses Abkommens gültigen Fassung um. The Contracting Parties to this Agreement shall implement the European Agreement on the International Carriage of Hazardous Goods by Road (ADR) of 30 September 1957 as it stands at the time of the entry into force of this Agreement.
( 3) Rumänien bemüht sich um die Anpassung seiner Vorschriften über die Befuhr verderblicher Güter, lebender Tiere und gefährlichen Güter an die der Gemeinschaft. Romania shall endeavour to adapt its rules on the carriage of perishable goods, live animals and dangerous goods to those of the Community.
( 4) Die Vertragsparteien tauschen Erfahrungen und Informationen über ihre Vorschriften aus, um den Verkehrsfluss und die Verkehrssicherheit in Spitzenverkehrszeiten (Weekends, Feiertage, Ferienzeiten) zu verbessern. The Contracting Parties shall exchange experience and information on their regulations to improve traffic flow and safety at peak times (weekends, holidays, holidays).
( 5) Die Vertragsparteien setzen sich gemeinsam für die Einführung, Weiterentwicklung und Koordinierung interoperabler Verkehrsinformationssysteme ein. The Parties shall jointly implement, develop and coordinate interoperable transport information systems.
( 6) Die Vertragsparteien bemühen sich um die Harmonisierung der technischen Hilfe für fahrer, die Verbreitung wichtiger Informationen über den Verkehr und die Emergency dienste, darunter den Krankenentransport, sowie anderer für den fahrer wichtigen Aspekte. The Contracting Parties shall endeavour to harmonize technical assistance for drivers, to disseminate important information on transport and emergency services, including ambulance transport, and other driver relevant aspects.
( 1) Die Vertragsparteien kommen überein, die Formalitäten für die Befuhr von Gütern im Rahmen dieses Abkommens zu vereinfachen. The Contracting Parties agree to simplify the formalities for the carriage of goods under this Agreement.
( 2) Die Vertragsparteien kommen überein, Verhandlungen über ein Abkommen über die Vereinfachung der Kontrollen und Förmlichkeiten im Güterverkehr aufzunehmen. The Contracting Parties agree to enter into negotiations on an Agreement on the simplification of controls and formalities in the transport of goods.
( 3) Die Vertragsparteien kommen überein, soweit erforderlich, weitere Vereinfachungsmaßnahmen gemeinsam anzustreben und zu fördern. The Contracting Parties agree, as far as necessary, to jointly seek and promote further simplification measures.
If, on the basis of experience gained with the application of this Agreement, one of the Contracting Parties concludes that other measures not covered by this Agreement are in the interest of a coordinated European transport policy and could, in particular, contribute to the solution of the transit problems, it shall make proposals in this respect to the other Contracting Party.
The body responsible for cooperation shall be a Joint Committee called the <unk> Transport Committee Community / Romania <unk>.
- be composed of representatives designated by the Community and Romania,
- meet alternately in the Community and in Romania at the request of either Contracting Party,
- ensure the smooth implementation of this Agreement, in particular:
( a) explore possibilities for cooperation and the promotion of combined transport and review progress made in this respect at least every two years;
( b) review the Annexes to this Agreement at least every two years;
( c) arbitrate any disputes arising out of the application and interpretation of this Agreement; in the event of differences of opinion, the decision shall be postponed until a later meeting of the Joint Committee, which shall take place within two months of the date of the postponement, in accordance with the procedure laid down in the rules of procedure;
( d) coordinate monitoring, forecasting and other statistical work in the field of international road and combined transport, and in particular road transport;
( e) take, where appropriate, measures to make technical adjustments to the provisions of this Agreement;
( f) develop, where necessary, recommendations for a possible increase in the number of licences / trademarks;
( g) discuss, where appropriate, other issues relevant to the implementation of this Agreement.
( 1) Verstößt ein Fahrzeug oder ein Fahrzeugführer gegen die Bestimmungen dieses Abkommens, so kann die zuständigen Behörde der Vertragspartei, in dessen Gebiet es zu diesem Verstoß gekommen ist, den Unfall der zuständigen Behörde der anderen Vertragspartei melden, die die gesetzlich vorgesehenen Maßnahmen ergreifen kann. If a vehicle or driver violates the provisions of this Agreement, the competent authority of the Contracting Party in whose territory it has come to this violation may report the incident to the competent authority of the other Contracting Party, which may take the measures provided for by law.
( 2) Die zuständigen Behörde, bei der eine solche Mitteilung eingeht, unterrichtet die zuständigen Behörde der anderen Vertragspartei umgehend von der getroffenen Maßnahme. The competent authority receiving such notification shall promptly inform the competent authority of the other Contracting Party of the measure taken.
( 3) Die Bestimmungen dieses Artikels haben keinen Auswirkungen auf rechtmäßige Sanktionen, die je nachdem, wo es zu dem Verstoß gekommen ist, von den Gerichten oder Strafverfolgungsbehörden des Mitgliedstaats der Europäischen Gemeinschaft oder Rumniens verhängt werden können. The provisions of this Article shall have no effect on lawful sanctions which may be imposed by the courts or criminal prosecution authorities of the Member State of the European Community or of Romania, depending on where the violation has occurred.
This Agreement shall be concluded for a period of five years.
It shall be renewed automatically for a further period of three years, unless either Party denounces the Agreement within a period of 12 months to the end of its term.
Either Party may denounce this Agreement by giving the other Party 12 months <unk> notice.
between the European Community and the United Nations Relief and Works Agency for Palestine Refugees in the Near East (UNRWA) on Aid to Refugees in the Middle East (2000 -2005)
The European Community (hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Community <unk>) shall conclude this Agreement with the United Nations Relief and Works Agency for Palestine Refugees in the Near East (hereinafter referred to as <unk> UNRWA <unk>) in order to reaffirm its commitment to financial support to UNRWA.
This financial support, which shall be provided over a period of four years (2002 -2005), shall take the form of contributions to the general budget of UNRWA.
Commitment shall be made in accordance with the budgetary resources available and in accordance with the Community financial perspective up to the year 2006.
( 1) Die Gemeinschaft zahlt dem UNRWA jährlich einen Barbeitrag zum GesamthHaushalt. The Community shall pay UNRWA annually a contribution to the budget as a whole.
Notwithstanding Article 3, this contribution shall not exceed EUR 55 million for 2002, EUR 57.75 million for 2003, EUR 606 637 500 for 2004 and EUR 636 669 375 for 2005.
( 2) Der Beitrag zum GesamthBudget wird auf der Grundlage von Zuschussvereinbarungen geleistet, die zwischen der Kommission der Europäischen Gemeinschaften und dem UNRWA für die Jahre 2002-2005 zu schließen sind. The contribution to the total budget shall be made on the basis of grant agreements to be concluded between the Commission of the European Communities and UNRWA for the years 2002 to 2005.
The Grant Arrangements shall be concluded in accordance with the Agreement between the United Nations and the European Community of 9 August 1999 on the principles governing the financing and cofinancing by the Community of programmes and projects managed by the United Nations.
( 3) Für den Beitrag sind die internen und externen Rechnungspaufungsverfahren nach den einschlägigen Finanzvorschriften, Regeln und Richtlinien des UNRWA berechgebend; das Ergebnis der Prüfungen wird der Kommission mitgeteilt. The contribution shall be governed by internal and external audit procedures in accordance with the relevant financial regulations, rules and guidelines of UNRWA; the result of such audits shall be communicated to the Commission.
Taking into account the annual needs of the refugee population, further Community resources may be made available to UNRWA <unk> s food aid programme to meet the specific needs of disadvantaged groups.
The quantity, amount, scope and characteristics of the products, cash and services provided and any other conditions relating to the support to the food aid programme shall be agreed separately on the basis of annual requests from UNRWA.
During the period of validity of this Agreement, the Contracting Parties may, if necessary, increase or reduce by mutual agreement, on the basis of an exchange of letters between the Community and UNRWA, the parts of the contributions otherwise established under this Agreement.
By the end of 2003, the Parties shall review the political developments concerning refugees and evaluate any plans drawn up and, where appropriate, implemented by UNRWA for the transfer of its functions to the Palestinian Authority and / or any other agency.
If, during the period of validity of this Agreement, the functions of UNRWA are transferred in whole or in part to the Palestinian Authority or any other body, the necessary adjustments to the corresponding parts of the Community contribution received by UNRWA under this Agreement shall be made on the basis of an exchange of letters between the Community and UNRWA.
( 1) Bei Streitigkeiten, Meinungsverschieheiten und Forderungen, die sich aus der Auslegung, Anwendung oder Erfuellung dieses Abkommens ergeben oder damit in Zusammenhang stehen, einschließlich Fragen in Bezug auf sein bestehen, seine Gültigkeit oder seine Beendigung, die von den Vertragsparteien nicht einvernehmlich geregelt werden können, wird ein Schiedsverfahren nach der Freiwilligen Schiedsgerichtsordnung des Ständigen Schiedshofs für internationale Organisationen und Staaten in der Zeitpunkt der Unterzeichnung dieses Abkommens geltenden Fassung eingeleitet. In the event of any dispute, disagreement or claim arising out of or relating to the interpretation, application or fulfilment of this Agreement, including any question relating to its existence, validity or termination which may not be mutually resolved by the Contracting Parties, arbitration shall be instituted in accordance with the volunteer rules of arbitration of the Permanent Court of Arbitration for International Organisations
( 2) Es wird ein Schiedsrichter ernannt. An arbitrator shall be appointed.
( 3) Verfahrenssprache ist Englisch. The language of the proceedings shall be English.
( 4) Kann sich die beiden Vertragsparteien nicht auf einen Schiedsrichter einigen, so wird dieser auf schriftliches Ersuchen einer Vertragspartei vom Präsident des Internationalen Gerichtshofs ernannt. If the two Contracting Parties are unable to agree on an arbitrator, the latter shall be appointed by the President of the International Court of Justice at the written request of either Contracting Party.
( 5) Der Schiedsrichter trifft seine Entscheidung unter Berücksichtigung der von den Staaten anerkannten allgemeinen Rechtsgrundsätze im Einklang mit den Bestimmungen dieses Abkommens. The arbitrator shall make his decision in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement, taking into account the general legal principles recognised by the States.
When the United Nations and the Commission have agreed in their discussions on a general arrangement for voluntary contributions, the relevant provisions of the Arrangement and this Agreement shall be reviewed without delay and the necessary amendments to the provisions of this Agreement agreed by UNRWA and the Commission shall be made.
This Agreement shall apply for a period of four calendar years (2002, 2003, 2004 and 2005).
This Agreement shall be approved by the Contracting Parties in accordance with their own procedures.
It shall enter into force on the first day of the month following the date on which the Contracting Parties have notified each other of the completion of the procedures referred to in paragraph 1.
This Agreement is drawn up in duplicate in the Danish, Dutch, English, Finnish, French, German, Greek, Italian, Portuguese, Spanish and Swedish languages, each text being equally authentic.
( UNRWA)
between the European Union and Bosnia and Herzegovina on the activities of the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Admission Party
hereinafter referred to as <unk> Participating Parties
- the United Nations International Police Intervention Force (IPTF) has been present in Bosnia and Herzegovina since 1996 and the European Union has offered to provide the follow-up mission to the IPTF mission in Bosnia and Herzegovina as from 1 January 2003,
- Bosnia and Herzegovina has accepted this offer,
- the Council of the European Union, on 11 March 2002, adopted Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP on the European Union Police Mission (EUPM), according to which EUPM should ensure that Bosnia and Herzegovina maintains its own sustainable policing arrangements in accordance with best European and international practice and thus raises the current policing standard in Bosnia and Herzegovina,
( 1) Die Polizeimission der Europäischen Union, nachstehend <unk> EUPM <unk> genannt, richten ihr Hauptquartier in Sarajewo ein. The Police Mission of the European Union, hereinafter referred to as <unk> EUPM <unk>, shall establish its headquarters in Sarajevo.
( 2) Die EUPM richten auf Entscheidung des Leiters der Mission/ Polizeizeichefs in Absprache mit der Aufnahmepartei darüber gegebenenfalls weitere Büro in Bosnia und Herzegovina ein. EUPM shall, by decision of the Head of the Mission / Police Chiefs, in consultation with the host Party, furthermore, as appropriate, establish further offices in Bosnia and Herzegovina.
To this end, EUPM shall establish an initial number of 24 observer teams, which shall be based in the various police structures of Bosnia and Herzegovina at the intermediate and higher levels, including the territorial units, public security centres, cantons, the State Intelligence Protection Agency, the State Border Services and the Brcko District.
( 3) Die mit den erforderlichen Beobachtungs-, Beratungs- und Überprüfungsbefugnissen ausgestattete EUPM sollte ihre Ziele bis Ende 2005 erreichen. The EUPM, equipped with the necessary powers of observation, consultation and verification, should achieve its objectives by the end of 2005.
( 4) Die EUPM handelt gemäß ihrem in Artikel 1 Absatz 2 der Gemeinsamen Aktion 2002/ 210 / CFSP festgelegten Auftrag. The EUPM shall act in accordance with its mandate set out in Article 1 (2) of the 2002 / 210 / CFSP Joint Action.
( 5) Die EUPM nimmt ihre Aufgaben im Rahmen dieses Abkommens unabhängig wahr. The EUPM shall independently perform its functions under this Agreement.
( 6) Die Aufnahmepartei erteilt der EUPM alle Informationen und leistet jede Art von Zusammenarbeit, die zur Erreichung der Ziele der EUPM erforderlich sind. The host Party shall provide the EUPM with all information and shall cooperate in any manner necessary to achieve the objectives of the EUPM.
The host Party may designate one of its police officers as a liaison officer with the EUPM.
( 1) Die EUPM setzt sich aus dem Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef und den sonstigen Angehörigen der EUPM zusammen. The EUPM shall consist of the head of the mission / police force and other members of the EUPM.
( 2) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM wird vom Rat der Europäischen Union ernannt. The head of the mission / police force of the EUPM shall be appointed by the Council of the European Union.
The other members of the EUPM shall be assigned by the Head of Mission to specific uses.
( 3) Die sonstigen Angehörigen der EUPM setzen sich zusammen aus Other members of the EUPM shall consist of:
( a) Police forces seconded by the Member States of the European Union.
Non-Member States of the EU may also designate EUPM police forces and shall then be seconding parties, as shall the European Union and its Member States;
( b) international civilian staff seconded by the sending parties or recruited by the EUPM, if necessary, on a contract basis;
( c) local staff who may be recruited by EUPM as necessary.
At the request of the Head of Mission / Police Chiefs, the host Party shall facilitate the recruitment by EUPM of qualified local staff.
( 4) Die Gesamtzahl der EUPM-Angehörigen wird vom Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef festgelegt. The total number of members of the EUPM shall be determined by the Chief of Mission / Police.
( 1) Die EUPM in Bosnia und Herzegovina führt ihre Tätigkeit unter der Verantwortung des Leiters der Mission/ Polizeizeichefs aus, der die EUPM leitet und die laufenden Geschäfte führt. The EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina shall carry out its activities under the responsibility of the Head of Mission / Police Chiefs, who shall direct the EUPM and shall conduct its current operations.
( 2) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef erstattet dem Generalsekretär/ Hohen Vertreter für die Gemeinsame Außen- und Sicherheitspolitik über den Sonderbeauftragten der Europäischen Union in Bosnia und Herzegovina (EUSR) Bericht. The Head of Mission / Police shall report to the Secretary-General / High Representative for the Common Foreign and Security Policy through the Special Representative of the European Union in Bosnia and Herzegovina (EUSR).
( 3) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef unterrichtet die Aufnahmepartei regelmäßig über die Tätigkeit der EUPM. The head of the mission / police chief shall regularly inform the host party of the activities of the EUPM.
( 1) Die EUPM erhält einen Status, der dem einer diplomatischen Mission entspricht. The EUPM shall have a status equivalent to that of a diplomatic mission.
( 2) Das Hauptquartier in Sarajewo, andere Büro und alle Transportmittel der EUPM sind inverletzlich. The headquarters in Sarajevo, other offices and all means of transport of EUPM shall be inviolable.
( 3) Das EUPM-Personal genießen sämtliche Vorrechte und Immunitäten, wie sie diplomatischen Bediensteten gemäß dem Wiener Übereinkommen vom 18. April 1961 über diplomatische Beziehungen gewährt werden, nach dessen Maßgabe die vorrangige gerichtliche Zuständigkeit bei den EU-Mitgliedstaaten und sonstigen Entsendeparteien liegt. The EUPM-staff shall enjoy all privileges and immunities accorded to diplomatic officials in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations of 18 April 1961, under whose conditions priority jurisdiction shall lie with the Member States of the EU and other sending parties.
Such privileges and immunities shall be accorded to EUPM staff during and after their mission in respect of acts previously performed within the framework of their mission.
( 4) Das Verwaltungs- und technische Personal der EUPM genießt in Einklang mit dem Wiener Übereinkommen über diplomatische Beziehungen den gleichen Status wie das Verwaltungs- und technische Personal der Entsendeparteien in Embassies. The administrative and technical staff of EUPM shall enjoy the same status in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations as the administrative and technical staff of the sending parties to embassies.
Such privileges and immunities shall be accorded to the administrative and technical staff of EUPM during and after their mission in respect of acts previously performed within the framework of their mission.
( 5) Das vor Ort eingestellte Hilfspersonal der EUPM genießen im Einklang mit dem Wiener Übereinkommen über diplomatische Beziehungen den gleichen Status wie das örtliche Personal in Embassies. The on-site staff of the EUPM shall enjoy the same status as the local staff in embassies in accordance with the provisions of the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations.
( 6) Die Aufnahmepartei erleichtert alle Ein- und Ausreisen des Leiters der Mission/ Polizeizeichefs und der EUPM-Angehörigen in das bzw. aus dem Hoheitsgebiet von Bosnia und Herzegovina. The host Party shall facilitate all entry and exit of the Head of the Mission / Police Chiefs and of the EUPM personnel to and from the territory of Bosnia and Herzegovina.
The EUPM shall provide the host party with a list of the nationals of the EUPM and shall inform the host party in advance of the first arrival and final departure of EUPM staff.
( 7) Die Aufnahmepartei erkennt das Recht der Entsendeparteien und der EUPM an, zollfrei und ohne sonstige Beschränkungen die von der EUPM benötigten und zu ihrer ausschließlichen und offizielle Verwendung bestimmten Ausrüstungen, Vorräte, Lieferungen und anderen Güter einzuführen. The host Party shall recognise the right of the posting parties and of the EUPM to introduce, duty free and without other restrictions, the equipment, supplies, supplies and other goods required by the EUPM and intended for their exclusive and official use.
The receiving Party shall also recognise its right to buy such items in the territory of the receiving Party and to export or otherwise dispose of such imported or purchased equipment, stocks, supplies and other goods.
( 8) Die Aufnahmepartei erkennt ferner das Recht des EUPM-Personals sowie des Verwaltungs- und technischen Personals der EUPM an, Gegenstände für den Personal Bedarf zu kaufen und/ oder zollfrei und ohne sonstige Beschränkungen einzuführen und diese Gegenstände auszuführen. The host Party shall also recognise the right of EUPM staff and EUPM administrative and technical staff to purchase and / or import, duty free and without any other restrictions, items for personal use and to execute such items.
( 1) Die Mitglieder der EUPM tragen keine Waffen. The members of the EUPM shall not carry weapons.
( 2) Die Mitglieder der EUPM können ihre nationale Uniform oder Zivilkleidung mit einem EUPM-Erkennungszeichen tragen. The members of the EUPM may wear their national uniform or civilian clothing bearing a EUPM badge.
They shall carry the national passport and an identity card of the EUPM.
( 1) Die Aufnahmepartei ergreift alle erforderlichen Maßnahmen für den Schutz und die Sicherheit der EUPM und ihrer Mitglieder. The host Party shall take all necessary measures for the protection and security of EUPM and its members.
All relevant arrangements proposed by the host party shall be agreed with the head of mission / police before they are implemented.
( 2) Die EUPM-Angehörigen unterlassen alle Handlungen oder Tätigkeiten, die mit der Unparteilichkeit ihrer Aufgaben unvereinbar sind. The members of the EUPMshall refrain from any action or activity incompatible with the impartiality of their duties.
( 3) Die EUPM und ihre Angehörigen genießen unter Einbeziehung ihrer Transportmittel und Ausrüstungen die Freiheit, die zur Erfuellung des Auftrags der Mission erforderlich ist. The EUPM and its nationals shall enjoy, including their means of transport and equipment, the freedom of movement required to fulfil the mission <unk> s mandate.
( 4) Die EUPM-Angehörigen können bei ihrer Tätigkeit von einem Dolmetscher und, auf Anforderung der EUPM, von einer von der Aufnahmepartei benannten offizielle Begleitperson begleitperson begleiten werden. EUPM nationals may be accompanied in their activities by an interpreter and, at the request of the EUPM, by an official escort designated by the host party.
( 5) Die EUPM kann an ihrem Hauptquartier in Sarajewo sowie an anderen Orten, über die Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef befindet, die Flagge der Europäischen Union hoist. The EUPM may fly the flag of the European Union at its headquarters in Sarajevo and at any other location where the Head of Mission / Police is located.
( 6) Fahrzeuge und andere Transportmittel der EUPM tragen ein Erkennungszeichen der Mission, über das die zuständigen Behörden unterrichtet werden. EUPM vehicles and other means of transport shall bear a mission identification badge which shall be communicated to the competent authorities.
( 1) Fahrzeuge und andere Transportmittel der EUPM unterliegen keine Zwangszulassung oder -genehmigung; alle Fahrzeuge sind bei Dritten versicherung. EUPM vehicles and other means of transport shall not be subject to compulsory registration or approval; all vehicles shall be insured with third parties.
( 2) Die EUPM kann Streets, Bridges, Canals und andere Wasserstraße, Hafenanlagen und Flugplätze ohne Zahlung von Gebühren, Maut oder anderen Abgaben benutzt. EUPM may use roads, bridges, canals and other waterways, port facilities and airports without payment of fees, tolls or other charges.
( 3) Die Aufnahmespartei erleichtert der EUPM den Betrieb ihrer eigenen Fahrzeuge und anderen Transportmittel. The host Party shall facilitate for EUPM the operation of its own vehicles and other means of transport.
( 1) Die EUPM und ihre Angehörigen haben zum Zweck der Ausübung ihrer Tätigkeit zu geringsten Kosten Zugang zu angemessenen Telekommunikationseinrichtungen, die der Aufnahmepartei gehören oder von ihr kontrolliwerden, auch zum Zweck der Kommunikation mit diplomatischen oder konsularischen Vertretern der Entsendeparteien. For the purpose of exercising their activities, the EUPM and its affiliates shall, at the lowest cost, have access to appropriate telecommunications facilities belonging to or controlled by the host party, including for the purpose of communicating with diplomatic or consular representatives of the posting parties.
( 2) Die EUPM und ihre Angehörigen haben das Recht auf unbeschränkte Kommunikation mit eigenen Funkgeräten (einschließlich Satelliten-, Mobil- und Handfunk geräte), Telefonen, Telegrafen, Faxgeräten oder anderen Mitteln. EUPM and its members shall have the right to communicate without restriction by means of their own radios (including satellite, mobile and hand-held radios), telephones, telegraphs, fax machines or other means.
The host Party shall provide, after signature of this Agreement, the frequencies on which radios may be operated.
( 1) Die Regierung von Bosnia und Herzegovina erklärt sich bereit, der EUPM auf Antrag bei der Suche nach geeigneten Bürorräumen und Unterkünfte behilflich zu sein. The Government of Bosnia and Herzegovina declares its readiness to assist EUPM, upon request, in the search for suitable offices and accommodation.
( 2) Soweit erforderlich, vereinbaren die teilnehmenden Parteien weitere Bestimmungen betreffend Vorrechte und Immunitäten sowie praktische Vorkehrungen, einschließlich notfallmedizinischer Versorgung und Emerfallevakuierung, der Benennung officieller Vertreter als Kontaktpartner sowie Anforderungen für Reisedokumente. Where necessary, the participating Parties shall agree on further provisions concerning privileges and immunities and practical arrangements, including emergency medical care and evacuation, the designation of official representatives as contact persons and requirements for travel documents.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon its signature.
It shall apply for the duration of the mandate of EUPM.
concerning the occasional international carriage of passengers by bus and coach
Aiming to promote the development of transboundary traffic in Europe and, in particular, to facilitate its organisation and implementation,
Seeking to facilitate tourism and cultural exchanges between the Parties,
The Convention on the International Occasional Carriage of Passengers by Bus and Coach (ASOR), signed in Dublin on 26 May 1982, does not contain any provisions for the accession of further Parties.
The experience gained with the abovementioned Agreement and the liberalization achieved should be preserved.
It is desirable to ensure harmonised liberalisation of certain occasional cross-border services by bus and coach and the associated transit services.
It is desirable to provide for certain harmonized procedural rules for non-liberalized occasional cross-border trade, which will continue to be subject to authorisation.
In the interests of road safety and environmental protection, it is necessary to provide for far-reaching harmonisation of the technical requirements imposed on vehicles engaged in occasional cross-border bus and coach traffic between the Contracting Parties.
It is necessary for the Contracting Parties to apply uniform rules with respect to the work of international road transport drivers of buses and coaches.
It is desirable to harmonize the conditions of access to the craft of passenger transport by road,
The principle of non-discrimination on the basis of nationality or place of business of the haulier and the country of origin or destination of the bus and coach shall be regarded as a basic requirement for the provision of transboundary services.
In order to facilitate and simplify control procedures it is necessary to provide for uniform models for accompanying documents such as the liberalised occasional trade control document and the authorisation and application form for non-liberalised trade.
Certain harmonized measures shall be provided for in order to enforce this Agreement, in particular as regards control procedures, penal provisions and mutual assistance.
In order to ensure the proper implementation of this Agreement and to permit some technical adjustment of the Annexes, it is appropriate to establish certain procedures for the management of the Agreement.
Accession to this Agreement should be open to all future Member States of the European Conference of Ministers of Transport and certain other European countries,
HAVE DECIDED to establish uniform rules for the occasional international carriage of passengers by bus and coach, and
( 1) Dieses Übereinkommen gilt für This Convention shall apply to:
( a) the international carriage by road of passengers of any nationality, on an occasional basis;
- between the territories of two Contracting Parties or to and from the territory of the same Contracting Party and, where necessary in the course of such operations, in transit through the territory of another Contracting Party or the territory of a State not party to this Agreement;
- transport operators operating on a rental or remuneration basis established in one of the Contracting Parties under its laws and authorised to carry occasional international coach and coach passengers;
- buses and coaches registered in the Contracting Party on whose territory the haulier is established;
( b) empty journeys of the buses and coaches used for such operations.
( 2) Keine der Bestimmungen dieses Übereinkommens darf dahin auszugelegt werden, daß sie den im Gebiet einer der Vertragsparteien niedergelassenen Transportunternehmern die Möglichkeit gewähren würde, nationale Casegenheitsverkehre im Hoheitsgebiet einer anderen Vertragspartei durchzuführen. None of the provisions of this Agreement may be interpreted as meaning that it would provide hauliers established in the territory of one of the Parties with the opportunity to conduct national occasional operations in the territory of another Party.
( 3) Die Verwendung von nach ihrer Bauart für den Pasentransport bestimmten Omnibussen für die Befuhr von Gütern für gewerbliche Zwecke ist vom Geltungsbereich dieses Übereinkommens ausgeschlossen. The use of buses designed for passenger transport for the transport of goods for commercial purposes is excluded from the scope of this Convention.
( 4) Dieses Übereinkommen betrifft nicht auf eigene Rechnung durchgeführte Casegenheitsverkehre. This Agreement does not relate to occasional traffic carried out for one <unk> s own account.
The Contracting Parties shall be obliged to ensure compliance with the principle of prohibition of any discrimination based on the nationality or place of business of the haulier or the country of origin or destination of the bus, in particular with respect to the fiscal provisions of Section VI and the control and penal provisions of Section IX.
For the purposes of this Agreement the following definitions shall apply:
1. <unk> buses <unk> shall mean motor vehicles suitable for their design and equipment and intended to carry more than nine persons including the driver.
2. <unk> Intra-frontier occasional services
The journeys made in the course of such traffic may be carried out with a certain frequency, without thereby losing the character of occasional traffic.
3. <unk> Liner Verkehr <unk> means the regular transport of persons on a particular transport connection, in which passengers may be picked up or dropped off at previously fixed stops.
Regular services may be subject to the obligation to follow timetables and fares fixed in advance.
4. als <unk> Sonderform des Linienverkehrs <unk> gilt - unabhängig davon, wer den Ablauf der Fahrt bestimmt - die Beförderung bestimmter Kategorien von Personen unter Ausschluss anderer Passagiere, soweit die in Nummer 3 genannten Merkmale gegeben sind. <unk> special form of regular services
- the transport of workers between home and place of work;
- the transport of pupils and students between their homes and educational establishments.
The regularity of such journeys and their classification as regular services shall not be affected by the adaptation of the itinerary to the needs of the users.
<unk> Shuttle transport <unk> means transport of persons previously grouped together on a number of return journeys between the same departure point and the same destination.
Each group of travellers, i.e. the persons who have made the outbound journey together, shall, on a later journey, be returned to their point of departure by the same haulier.
<unk> Place of departure <unk> and <unk> destination <unk> shall mean the places where the journey begins or ends, including their surroundings, within a radius of 50 km.
2. In the case of commuting, passengers shall not be accepted or dropped off en route.
3. Die erste Rückfahrt und die letzte Hinfahrt einer Reihe von Pendelfahrten sind Empty trips. The first return journey and the last outward journey of a series of shuttle journeys shall be empty journeys.
4. Die Einordnung eines Verkehrs als Pendelverkehr wird jedoch nicht berührt, daß mit Zustimmung der zuständigen Behörden in der betreffenden Vertragspartei oder in den betreffenden Vertragsparteien The classification of a traffic as a shuttle service shall not, however, be affected by the fact that, with the consent of the competent authorities in the Contracting Party concerned or in the Contracting Parties concerned,
- by way of derogation from paragraph 1, to make the return journey with another group of travellers or with another haulier;
- be taken in or dropped off en route in derogation from paragraph 2;
- by way of derogation from paragraph 3, the first return journey of a series of shuttle journeys shall be empty journeys.
<unk> Contracting Parties
This Agreement shall apply to the territories in which the Treaty establishing the European Community is applied and under the conditions laid down in that Treaty, and also to BOSNIA, HERZEGOVINA, BULGARIA, ESTONIA, CROATIA, LATVIA, LITHUANIA, the REPUBLIC OF MOLDAU, POLAND, ROMANIA, SLOVAKIA, SLOVENIA, the CZECH REPUBLIC, TURKEY and HUNGARY, to the extent that these countries have concluded this Agreement.
7. <unk> Competent authorities
8. <unk> Transit
( 1) Soweit noch nicht geschehen, erlassen die Vertragsparteien Vorschriften, die den Bestimmungen der im Anhang 1 genannten Richtlinie der Europäischen Gemeinschaft entsprechen. As far as is not already the case, the Contracting Parties shall adopt rules which comply with the provisions of the Directive of the European Community referred to in Annex 1.
( 2) Hinsichtlich der in Artikel 3 Absatz 3 jener Richtlinie genannten Anforderungen an die finanzielle Leistungsfähigkeit können die Vertragsparteien bis zum 1. Januar 2003 als nachprovsendes Minimkapital (einschließlich Reserven) einen geringeren als den in dem genannten Absatz 3 Buchstabe c) festgelegten Betrag vorsehen; unbeschadet der Bestimmungen des jeweiligen Europa-Abkommens zur Gründung einer Assoziation zwischen den Europäischen Gemeinschaften und ihren Mitgliedstaaten und bestimmten Vertragsparteien dieses Übereinkommens verlängert sich die genannte Frist bis zum 1. Januar 2005, wenn bei der Ratifizierung dieses Übereinkommens eine entsprechende Erklärung abgegeben wird. With respect to the financial capacity requirements referred to in Article 3 (3) of that Directive, the Contracting Parties may, by 1 January 2003, provide for a lesser amount than the amount specified in that paragraph (3) (c) of that Directive as a minimum capital requirement (including reserves) to be verified;
The buses and coaches used in occasional international traffic under this Agreement shall comply with the technical standards set out in Annex 2.
The following occasional operations carried out in the territory of a Contracting Party other than that in which the operator is established shall be exempt from the requirement of authorisation:
1. Rundfahrten <unk> mit geschlossenen Türen <unk>, d. h. Fahrt, die mit dem gleichen Omnibus ausführt werden, der die gleiche Reisegruppe über die gesamten Fahrtstrecke befördert und auf dem Ausgangsort zurückbringt. <unk> round trips
The place of departure shall be the territory of the Contracting Party in which the haulier is established.
2. transport of passengers on the outward journey with an empty return journey.
The place of departure shall be the territory of the Contracting Party in which the haulier is established.
3. Voyages with an empty outward journey, in which all passengers are accepted at the same place, provided that one of the following conditions is fulfilled:
( a) Passengers, in the territory of a non-Contracting Party or a Contracting Party which is not the home of the transport operator or the home of the passengers, shall constitute groups composed by contracts of carriage concluded before their arrival in the latter Contracting Party.
Passengers shall be brought to the territory of the Contracting Party in which the operator is established.
( b) Passengers have previously been brought to the territory of the Contracting Party by the same transport operator under the circumstances set out in paragraph 2 of this Article, in order to be transported to the territory of the Contracting Party in which the transport operator is established.
( c) Passengers have been invited to travel to the territory of another Contracting Party, the cost of the journey being borne by the inviting person.
Passengers shall be a homogeneous group, not constituted solely for the purpose of this journey and brought to the territory of the Contracting Party in which the operator is established.
The following journeys shall also be exempt from the requirement for authorisation:
4. Transitfahrten durch das Gebiet von Vertragsparteien im Zusammenhang mit genehmigungsfreie Casegenheitsverkehren. Transit journeys through the territory of Contracting Parties in connection with unauthorised occasional traffic.
5. Empty runs of buses and coaches intended solely to replace buses and coaches damaged or lost in a transboundary operation covered by this Agreement.
For journeys carried out by hauliers established in the European Community, the origin and / or destination of the journeys may be in any Member State of the European Community, irrespective of the Member State in which the coach is licensed or the haulier is established.
( 1) Für Casegenheitsverkehre, die nicht den in Artikel 6 genannten Bedingungen entsprechen, ist eine Genehmigung gemäß Artikel 15 erforderlich. An authorisation pursuant to Article 15 is required for occasional traffic which does not meet the conditions set out in Article 6.
( 2) Bei Verkehren, die von in der Europäischen Gemeinschaft niedergelassenen Verkehrsunternehmern ausgeführt werden, kann der Ausgangs- und/ oder Zielort des Verkehrs in jedem Mitgliedstaat der Europäischen Gemeinschaft liegen, unabhängig davon, in welcher Mitgliedstaat der Omnibus zugelassen oder der Verkehrsunternehmer niedergelassen ist. In the case of transport operations carried out by operators established in the European Community, the point of departure and / or destination of transport may be in any Member State of the European Community, irrespective of which Member State the bus is licensed or the operator is established.
The Contracting Parties to this Agreement shall accede, where not yet done, to the revised European Agreement on the Work of Mobile Personnel engaged in International Road Traffic (AETR) of 1 July 1970, or shall apply the version of Community Regulations (EEC) No 3820 / 85 and (EEC) No 3821 / 85 in force at the time of the entry into force of this Agreement.
( 1) Omnibusse used for journeys carried out in accordance with this Agreement shall be exempt from all vehicle taxes and taxes levied on the operation or ownership of vehicles and from all taxes and charges levied specifically on transport services in the territory of the other Contracting Parties.
This exemption for buses and coaches shall not apply to taxes and charges on fuels, VAT levied on transport services, road user charges and other charges levied by transport users for the use of infrastructure.
( 2) Die Vertragsparteien stellen sicher, daß Straßenusungsgebühren und andere von den Verkehrsnutzern zu zahlende Abgaben nicht gleichzeitig für das Befahren eines bestimmten Straßenabschnitts erhoben werden können. The Contracting Parties shall ensure that road use charges and other charges payable by road users cannot be levied simultaneously for driving on a particular section of road.
However, the Contracting Parties may levy charges on road networks on which user charges are payable for bridges, tunnels and mountain passes.
( 3) Der von den Omnibussen in den hierfür herstellerseitig vorgesehenen Behältern mitgeführte Kraftstoff bis zur Hoechstmenge von 600 l sowie die in den Fahrzeuge ausschließlich für Betriebszwecke befindlichen Schmierstoffe sind von allen in den anderen Vertragsparteien erhobenen Einfuhrzöllen und sonstigen Steuern und Abgaben befreit. The fuel carried by the buses in the containers provided for by the manufacturers for this purpose, up to the maximum volume of 600 litres, and the lubricants used in the vehicles exclusively for operating purposes, shall be exempt from all customs duties on imports and other taxes and charges levied in the other Contracting Parties.
( 4) Der nach Artikel 23 gebildete Gemeinsame Ausschuss erstellt eine Liste der in den einzelnen Vertragsparteien auf den Straßenpersonenverkehr mit Omnibussen erhobenen Steuern. The Joint Committee established pursuant to Article 23 shall draw up a list of taxes levied in each of the Contracting Parties on road passenger transport by bus and coach.
This list shall specify which taxes are covered by the provisions of the first subparagraph of paragraph 1 of this Article and can therefore only be levied in the Contracting Party in which the vehicle is registered.
In addition, the list shall specify which taxes are covered by the provisions of the second subparagraph of paragraph 1 of this Article and may therefore also be levied in Contracting Parties other than the Contracting Party in which the vehicle is registered.
Contracting Parties which replace one of the taxes on these lists with another equivalent or different tax shall inform the Joint Committee so that it may update the lists accordingly.
( 5) Die Ersatzteile und Werkzeuge für die Instandsetzung eines bei einer internationalen Verkehrsleistung Damdeten Omnibusses sind bei ihrer Einfuhr in das Gebiet der anderen Vertragspartei zu den in deren Bestimmungen für die vorübergehende Einfuhr solcher Gegenstände festgelegten Bedingungen von Einfuhrzöllen und allen Steuern und Abgaben befreit. Spare parts and tools for the repair of an omnibus damaged in an international traffic accident shall be exempt from customs duties on imports and all taxes and charges upon their entry into the territory of the other Contracting Party under the conditions laid down in the other Contracting Party <unk> s provisions for the temporary importation of such items.
The replaced parts shall be exported again or destroyed under the supervision of the competent customs authority of the other Contracting Party.
The operations referred to in Article 6 shall be carried out under a control document issued by the competent authorities or by another authorised authority of the Contracting Party in which the transport operator is established.
( 1) Das Kontrolldokument besteht aus severbaren Fahrtenblättern in doppelter Ausfertigung, die in Fahrtenheften zu je 25 Fahrtenblättern enthalten sind. The control document shall consist of detachable, duplicate sheets, each of which shall be contained in 25 sheets.
The control document shall conform to the model set out in Annex 3 to this Agreement.
( 2) Jedes Fahrtenheft und die in ihm enthaltenen Fahrtenblätter werden mit einer Kennnummer versehen. Each notebook and the sheets contained therein shall be provided with an identification number.
The individual sheets shall be additionally numbered from 1 to 25.
( 3) Der Text auf dem Deckblatt des Fahrtenheftes und auf den Fahrtenblättern wird in der Amtssprache oder in mehreren Amtssprachen der Vertragspartei gedruckt, in der der der Verkehrsunternehmer niedergelassen ist. The text on the cover of the booklet and on the travel sheets shall be printed in the official language or in several official languages of the Contracting Party in which the transport operator is established.
( 1) Das in Artikel 11 vorgesehene Fahrtenheft wird auf den Namen des Verkehrsunternehmers ausgestellt; es ist nicht übertragbar. The booklet provided for in Article 11 shall be issued in the name of the transport undertaking and shall not be transferable.
( 2) Das Original des Fahrtenblatt ist während der ganze Fahrt, für die es ausgestellt wurde, im Omnibus mitzführen. The original of the travel sheet shall be carried in the omnibus throughout the journey for which it has been issued.
( 3) Der Verkehrsunternehmer ist für die ordnungsgemäße Führung der Fahrtenblätter verantwortlich. The transport operator shall be responsible for the proper operation of the sheets.
( 1) Das Fahrtenblatt ist vom Verkehrsunternehmer für jede Fahrt vor deren Antritt in doppelter Ausfertigung auszufuellen. The travel sheet shall be duplicated by the haulier for each journey prior to its commencement.
( 2) Zur Angabe der Namen der Passagiere kann der Verkehrsunternehmer eine im Voraus auf einem gesonderten Blatt erstellte Liste verwenden, die dem Fahrtenblatt beizufügen ist. In order to specify the names of the passengers, the transport operator may use a list prepared in advance on a separate sheet, which shall be attached to the travel sheet.
The postmark of the transport operator and, where appropriate, the signatures of the transport operator and the coach driver shall be affixed both to this list and to the travel sheet.
( 3) Wenn die Hinfahrt gemäß Artikel 6 Absatz 3 als Emperfahrt erfolgt, kann die Liste der Passagiere zu den in Absatz 2 genannten Bedingungen zum Zeitpunkt der Aufnahme der Passagiere erstellt werden. If the outbound journey is an idle journey in accordance with Article 6 (3), the list of passengers may be drawn up on the terms and conditions set out in paragraph 2 of this Article at the time the passengers are admitted.
The competent authorities in two or more Contracting Parties may agree that the establishment of the passenger list is not necessary.
In this case, the number of passengers shall be specified in the control document.
The Joint Committee established in accordance with Article 23 shall be notified of such arrangements.
( 1) Genehmigungen für Casegenheitsverkehre, die nicht nach Artikel 6 liberalisiert sind, werden in gegenseitigem Einvernehmen zwischen den zuständigen Behörden der Vertragsparteien, in deren Gebiet Passagiere aufgenommen oder abgesetzt werden sollen, und den zuständigen Behörden der im Transit zu durchfahrenden Vertragsparteien erteilt. Approvals for occasional traffic not liberalized under Article 6 shall be issued by mutual agreement between the competent authorities of the Contracting Parties in whose territory passengers shall be admitted or disembarked and the competent authorities of the Contracting Parties to be transited.
If both the point of departure and the point of destination of the journey are in a Member State of the European Community, transit through other Member States of the Community is not subject to authorisation.
( 2) Die Genehmigung entspricht dem in Anhang 5 wiedergegebenen Muster. The approval shall be in accordance with the model set out in Annex 5.
( 1) Der Antrag auf Genehmigung ist vom Verkehrsunternehmer an die zuständigen Behörden der Vertragspartei zu richten, in deren Gebiet der Ausgangsort liegt. The request for authorisation shall be made by the transport operator to the competent authorities of the Contracting Party in whose territory the place of departure is.
The application form shall comply with the model set out in Annex 4.
( 2) Dem vom Verkehrsunternehmer auszufuellenden Antrag ist der Nachweis beizufügen, daß der Antragsteller die in Artikel 1 Absatz 1 Buchstabe a) zweiten Gedankenstrich genannte Erlaubnis zur Befuhr von Fahrgästen im grenzüberschreitenden Gelegenheitsverkehr mit Omnibussen besitzt. The request to be completed by the transport operator shall be accompanied by evidence that the applicant possesses the permit referred to in Article 1 (1) (a), second indent, for the carriage of passengers in occasional cross-border coach and coach services.
( 3) Die zuständigen Behörden der Vertragspartei, in deren Gebiet der Ausgangsort liegt, prüfen den Antrag auf Genehmigung des betreffenden Verkehrsdienst und leiten ihn im Genehmigungsfall weiter an die zuständigen Behörden der Vertragsparteien <unk> en), in deren Gebiet<unk> en) der oder die Zielort<unk> e) liegt, liegen, sowie an die zuständigen Behörden der im Transit zu durchfahrenden Vertragsparteien. The competent authorities of the Contracting Party in whose territory the place of departure is, shall examine the request for the approval of the transport service concerned and, in the case of approval, forward the request to the competent authorities of the Contracting Parties in whose territories (s) the place of departure is, or are, and to the competent authorities of the Contracting Parties in transit.
( 4) Abweichend von Artikel 15 Absatz 1 können Vertragsparteien, deren Gebiete im Transit durchfahren werden, beschließen, daß ihre Zustimmung zu den in diesem Abschnitt behandelten Verkehren nicht mehr erforderlich ist. In derogation from Article 15 (1), Contracting Parties whose areas are to be transited may decide that their consent to the operations referred to in this paragraph is no longer required.
Such a decision shall be notified to the Joint Committee established in accordance with Article 23.
( 5) Die zuständigen Behörden der Vertragsparteien <unk> en), deren Zustimmung Antrag wurde, erteilen die Genehmigung innerhalb eines Monats, und zwar ohne Diskriminierung aufgrund der Nationgehörigkeit oder des Geschäftssitz der Verkehrsunternehmers. The competent authorities of the Contracting Parties whose consent has been requested shall grant the authorisation within one month, without discrimination on the basis of nationality or place of business of the transport undertakings.
If such authorities do not agree to the conditions of the authorisation, they shall inform the competent authorities of the Contracting Parties concerned, stating the relevant reasons.
The competent authorities of two or more Contracting Parties may agree to simplify the authorisation procedure, the model of the application for authorisation and the model of authorisation for occasional traffic between them.
Such an arrangement shall be notified to the Joint Committee established in accordance with Article 23.
The control document provided for in Article 10 and the authorisations provided for in Article 15 shall be carried in an omnibus and presented to the inspecting officials on request.
The competent authorities in the Contracting Parties shall take the necessary measures to ensure that operators comply with the provisions of this Agreement.
An officially certified copy of the authorisation referred to in Article 1 (1) (a), second indent, for the carriage of occasional international bus and coach passengers shall be carried on the bus and provided upon request to the controlling officials.
The Joint Committee established in accordance with Article 23 shall be provided with samples of such documents issued by the competent authorities of the Contracting Parties.
The competent authorities of the Contracting Parties shall establish a system of penalties for violations of this Convention.
The penalties provided therein shall be effective, proportionate and dissuasive.
( 1) Wenn ein nicht ansässiger Verkehrsunternehmer schweren oder repeated Verstöße gegen die Straßenverkehrsvorschriften, insbesondere gegen die Bestimmungen über Fahr- und Ruhhezeiten und die Sicherheit im Straßenverkehr begangen hat, die zum Entzug der Erlaubnis zur Ausübung des Berufs eines Personenverkehrsunternehmers führen könnten, übermitteln die zuständigen Behörden der betreffenden Vertragspartei den zuständigen Behörden der Vertragspartei, in der der der Verkehrsunternehmer niedergelassen ist, alle in ihrem Besitz befindlichen Informationen über diese Verstöße und über die gegen ihn verhängten Strafen. If a non-resident haulage operator has committed serious or repeated violations of the road transport legislation, in particular of the provisions relating to driving and rest times and road safety which could result in the withdrawal of a passenger transport operator <unk> s occupation permit, the competent authorities of the Contracting Party concerned shall communicate to the competent authorities of the Contracting Party in which the haulage
( 2) Die zuständigen Behörden der Vertragspartei, in deren Gebiet die schweren oder wiederholte Verstöße gegen die Straßenverkehrsvorschriften, insbesondere gegen die Bestimmungen über Fahr- und Ruhhezeiten und die Sicherheit im Straßenverkehr begangen wurden, können dem betreffenden Verkehrsunternehmer vorübergehend den Zugang zum Gebiet dieser Vertragspartei verweigern. The competent authorities of the Contracting Party in whose territory the serious or repeated violations of the Road Traffic Regulations, in particular of the provisions relating to driving and rest periods and road safety, have been committed may, on a temporary basis, refuse access to the territory of that Contracting Party to the transport operator concerned.
Within the European Community, the competent authorities of a Member State may refuse access to that Member State only on a temporary basis.
Such measures shall be notified to the competent authorities of the Contracting Party in which the haulier is established and to the Joint Committee established in accordance with Article 23.
( 3) Wenn ein Verkehrsunternehmer schweren oder wiederholte Verstöße gegen die Straßenverkehrsvorschriften, insbesondere gegen die Bestimmungen über Fahr- und Ruhhezeiten und die Sicherheit im Straßenverkehr begangen hat, treffen die zuständigen Behörden der Vertragsparteien, in der der Verkehrsunternehmer niedergelassen ist, geeignete Maßnahmen, um eine Wiederholung derartiger Verstöße zu vermeiden; diese Maßnahmen können in der Aussetzung oder dem Entzug der Erlaubnis zur Ausübung des Berufs eines Personenverkehrsunternehmers bestehen. If a transport operator has committed serious or repeated violations of the road transport regulations, in particular of the provisions relating to driving and rest periods and road safety, the competent authorities of the Contracting Parties, in which the transport operator is established, shall take appropriate measures to avoid a repeat of such violations; such measures may include suspension or withdrawal of a passenger transport operator <unk> s licence.
Such action shall be notified to the Joint Committee established in accordance with Article 23.
( 4) Die Vertragsparteien garantieren den Verkehrsunternehmern das Recht, gegen die verhängten Strafmaßnahmen Rechtsmittel einzulegen. The Contracting Parties shall guarantee the right of carriers to bring legal proceedings against the penalties imposed.
( 1) Zur Erleichterung der Durchführung dieses Übereinkommens wird hermit ein Gemeinsamer Ausschuss gebildet. To facilitate the implementation of this Agreement, a Joint Committee shall be formed hereby.
This Committee shall be composed of representatives of the Contracting Parties.
( 2) Der Gemeinsame Ausschuss hält innerhalb von sechs Monaten nach Inkrafttreten dieses Übereinkommens eine erste Sitzung ab. The Joint Committee shall hold its first meeting within six months of the entry into force of this Agreement.
( 3) Der Gemeinsame Ausschuss gibt sich eine Geschäftsordnung. The Joint Committee shall adopt its own rules of procedure.
( 4) Der Gemeinsame Ausschuss tritt auf Verlangen mindestens einer Vertragspartei zusammen. The Joint Committee shall meet on the request of at least one Contracting Party.
( 5) Der Gemeinsame Ausschuss fasst Beschlüsse nur, wenn zwei Drittel der Vertragsparteien, darunter die Europäische Gemeinschaft, in den Sitzungen des Gemeinsamen Ausschusses vertreten sind. The Joint Committee shall take decisions only if two thirds of the Contracting Parties, including the European Community, are represented in the meetings of the Joint Committee.
( 6) Für die von dem Gemeinsamen Ausschuss zu fassenden Beschlüsse ist die Einstimmigkeit der vertretenen Vertragsparteien erforderlich. Decisions to be taken by the Joint Committee shall require the unanimity of the Parties represented.
If this unanimity cannot be reached, the competent authorities shall meet for consultations within six weeks at the request of one or more of the Contracting Parties concerned.
( 1) Der Gemeinsame Ausschuss sorgt für die ordnungsgemäße Durchführung dieses Übereinkommens. The Joint Committee shall ensure the proper implementation of this Agreement.
The Committee shall be informed of any measures taken or intended to be taken to implement the provisions of this Agreement.
( 2) Der Gemeinsame Ausschuss soll insbesondere The Joint Committee shall, in particular:
( a) draw up, on the basis of information provided to it by the Contracting Parties, a list of the competent authorities of the Contracting Parties for the functions referred to in paragraphs V, VI, VII, VIII and IX;
( b) modify or adapt the control documents and other models reproduced in the Annexes to this Convention;
( c) amend or adapt the Annexes to the technical standards to be applied to buses and coaches and to Annex 1 to the requirements applicable to passenger transport operators in accordance with Article 4 in order to take into account future measures adopted within the European Community;
( d) draw up, on the basis of information provided by the Contracting Parties, a list of customs duties, taxes and charges referred to in Article 9 (4) and (5);
( e) modify or adapt the social requirements referred to in Article 8 in order to take into account future measures adopted within the European Community;
( f) resolve any disputes which may arise concerning the implementation and interpretation of this Convention;
( g) propose further steps to liberalize the occasional traffic which remains subject to authorisation.
( 3) Die Vertragsparteien treffen die notwendigen Maßnahmen, um die Beschlüsse des Gemeinsamen Ausschusses nötigenfalls entsprechend ihren jeweiligen internen Verfahrensweisen Umsetzung. The Contracting Parties shall take the necessary steps to implement the decisions of the Joint Committee in accordance with their respective internal procedures.
( 4) Wenn zu einer Streitfrage gemäß Absatz 2 Buchstabe f) dieses Artikels keine Einigkeit erzielt werden kann, können die betroffenen Vertragsparteien den Fall einem Schiedsgericht vorlegen. If no agreement can be reached on a dispute under paragraph 2 (f) of this Article, the Contracting Parties concerned may submit the case to an arbitral tribunal.
Each of the Contracting Parties concerned shall designate a member of the arbitral tribunal.
The Joint Committee itself shall also designate a member of that arbitral tribunal.
The arbitrators shall make a majority decision.
The Contracting Parties concerned by the dispute shall take the necessary measures to implement the decision of the arbitral tribunal.
( 1) Die Bestimmungen dieses Übereinkommens ersetzt die einschlägigen Bestimmungen der zwischen einzelnen Vertragsparteien geschlossenen Übereinkommen. The provisions of this Agreement shall replace the relevant provisions of the agreements concluded between the Parties.
In the case of the European Community, this also applies to agreements between individual Member States and other Contracting Parties.
( 2) Einzelne Vertragsparteien mit Ausnahme der Europäischen Gemeinschaft können vereinbaren, auf Omnibusse, die im Casegenheitsverkehr zwischen ihren Gebieten und bei Transitfahrten durch ihre Gebiete eingesetzt werden, anstelle von Artikel 5 und Anhang 2 dieses Übereinkommens andere technische Normen anzuwenden. Individual Contracting Parties, with the exception of the European Community, may agree to apply other technical standards in place of Article 5 and Annex 2 of this Agreement to buses and coaches used in occasional traffic between their territories and on transit journeys through their territories.
( 3) Unbeschadet der Bestimmungen von Anhang 2 Artikel 6 ersetzen die Bestimmungen dieses Übereinkommens die einschlägigen Bestimmungen der zwischen den Mitgliedstaaten der Europäischen Gemeinschaft und anderen Vertragsparteien abgeschlossenen Übereinkommen. Without prejudice to the provisions of Annex 2 to Article 6, the provisions of this Agreement shall replace the relevant provisions of the Agreements concluded between the Member States of the European Community and other Contracting Parties.
However, the provisions concerning exemptions from authorisation contained in existing bilateral agreements between Member States of the European Community and other Contracting Parties on occasional trade under Article 7 may be maintained and renewed.
In such a case, the Contracting Parties concerned shall promptly inform the Joint Committee established in accordance with Article 23.
This Agreement shall be opened for signature in Brussels from 14 April 2000 to 30 June 2001 at the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union, which shall act as the depositary for this Agreement.
This Convention shall be approved or ratified by the signatory Parties in accordance with their respective rules of procedure.
Instruments of approval or ratification shall be deposited with the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union, which shall notify all other signatories accordingly.
( 1) Dieses Übereinkommen tritt für diejenigen Vertragsparteien, die es genehmigt oder ratifiziert haben, in Kraft, nachdem es von insgesamt vier Vertragsparteien, darunter die Europäische Gemeinschaft, genehmigt oder ratifiziert wurde; das Inkrafttreten erfolgt am ersten Tag des dritten auf das Datum der Hinterlegung der 4. Genehmigungs- oder Ratifizierungsurkunde folgenden Monats oder, wenn zum Zeitpunkt der Ratifizierung des Übereinkommens eine entsprechende Erklärung abgegeben wurde, erst am ersten Tag des 6. Monats. This Convention shall enter into force for those Contracting Parties which have approved or ratified it after it has been approved or ratified by a total of four Contracting Parties, including the European Community, and shall enter into force on the first day of the third month following the date of deposit of the fourth instrument of approval or ratification, or, if, at the time of the ratification of the Convention a declaration has been made, on the first day
( 2) Für Vertragsparteien, die dieses Übereinkommen nach dessen Inkrafttreten gemäß Absatz 1 genehmigen oder ratifizieren, tritt es am ersten Tag des dritten Monats in Kraft, der auf den Tag folgt, an dem die betreffende Vertragspartei ihre Genehmigungs- oder Ratifizierungsurkunde hinterlegt. For Contracting Parties which approve or ratify this Agreement after its entry into force in accordance with paragraph 1 of this Article, it shall enter into force on the first day of the third month following the date on which that Contracting Party deposits its instrument of approval or ratification.
Duration of the Convention - Assessment of its effectiveness
( 1) Dieses Übereinkommen wird für einen Zeitraum von fünf Jahren geschlossen, der mit seinem Inkrafttreten beginnt. This Convention shall be concluded for a period of five years commencing with its entry into force.
( 2) Die Laufzeit dieses Übereinkommens wird für diejenigen Vertragsparteien, die sich nicht dagegen aussprechen, automatisch um weitere Zeiträume von jeweils fünf Jahren verlängert. The term of this Agreement shall be automatically extended by further periods of five years each for those Contracting Parties which do not object.
Contracting Parties which do not wish to renew the Agreement shall notify the depositary body in accordance with the procedure laid down in Article 31.
( 3) Vor Ablauf eines jeden Fünfjahreszeitraums erstellt der Gemeinsame Ausschuss eine Bewertung der Wirksamkeit dieses Übereinkommens. Before the end of each five year period, the Joint Committee shall prepare an assessment of the effectiveness of this Agreement.
( 1) Nach dem Inkrafttreten ist dieses Übereinkommen offen für den Beitritt von Ländern, die Vollmitglieder der Europäischen Konferenz der Verkehrsminister (CEMT) sind. Upon entry into force, this Agreement shall be open to the accession of countries that are full members of the European Conference of Ministers of Transport (CEMT).
In the event of the accession of countries which are members of the Agreement on the European Economic Area, this Agreement shall not apply to trade between the Contracting Parties to the Agreement on the European Economic Area.
( 2) Dieses Übereinkommen ist auch offen für den Beitritt der Republik San Marino, des Fürstentums Andorra und des Fürstentums Monaco. This Convention shall also be open to the accession of the Republic of San Marino, the Principality of Andorra and the Principality of Monaco.
( 3) Für jeden diesem Übereinkommen nach dessen Inkrafttreten gemäß Artikel 28 beitretenden Staat tritt es am ersten Tag des dritten Monats in Kraft, der auf die Hinterlegung der Beitrittsurkunde dieses Staates folgt. For each State acceding to this Agreement after its entry into force in accordance with Article 28 of this Agreement, it shall enter into force on the first day of the third month following the deposit of that State <unk> s instrument of accession.
( 4) Jedem diesem Übereinkommen nach dessen Inkrafttreten gemäß Artikel 28 beitretenden Staat kann für die Einführung von Bestimmungen, die der der (den) in Anhang 1 genannten Richtlinie<unk> n) entsprechen, ein Zeitraum von höchstens drei Jahren eingeräumt werden. Any State acceding to this Agreement after its entry into force in accordance with Article 28 may be granted a period of not more than three years for the introduction of provisions equivalent to those referred to in Annex 1.
The Joint Committee shall be informed of the measures taken.
Either Contracting Party may denounce this Agreement for itself by simultaneously notifying the other Contracting Parties through the depositary body of the Agreement, subject to one year <unk> s notice.
The Joint Committee shall also be informed of the reasons for the denunciation.
However, for the first four years after its entry into force in accordance with Article 28, denunciation of this Agreement shall not be possible.
If the Agreement has been denounced by one or more Contracting Parties and the number of Contracting Parties falls below the minimum agreed for its initial entry into force in accordance with Article 28, the Agreement shall remain in force, unless the Joint Committee comprising the remaining Contracting Parties decides otherwise.
A Contracting Party acceding to the European Union shall cease to be a Contracting Party as from the date of such accession.
amending Annex XXI (Statistics) to the EEA Agreement
Having regard to the Agreement on the European Economic Area, as amended by the Protocol adjusting the Agreement on the European Economic Area, hereinafter referred to as <unk> the Agreement <unk>, and in particular Article 98 thereof,
( 1) Anhang XXI des Abkommens wurde durch den Entscheidung des Gemeinsamen EEA -Ausschusses Nr. 110/ 2002 vom 12. Juli 2002<unk> 1) geändert. Annex XXI to the Agreement was amended by Decision of the EEA Joint Committee No 110 / 2002 of 12 July 2002 (1).
( 2) Die Entscheidung 98 / 377/ EG der Kommission vom 18. Mai 1998 zur Anpassung von Anhang I der Verordnung (EWG) Nr. 571 / 88 des Rates im Hinblick auf die Durchführung von Erhebungen der Gemeinschaft über die Struktur der landwirtschaftlichen Betriebe<unk> 2) ist in das Abkommen aufzunehmen - Decision 98 / 377 / EC of the Commission of 18 May 1998 adapting Annex I to Council Regulation (EEC) No 571 / 88 with a view to the implementation of Community surveys on the structure of agricultural operations (2) shall be incorporated into the Agreement,
Point 23 (Council Regulation (EEC) No 571 / 88) of Annex XXI to the Agreement shall be amended as follows:
( a) The following indent shall be added:
<unk> - 398 D 0377: Commission Decision 98 / 377 / EC of 18 May 1998 (OJ L 263, 27.12.1998, p.
29). <unk>
( b) Adjustment (e) shall be replaced by:
<unk> Annex I to Council Regulation (EEC) No 571 / 88 shall be added by the catalogue in Annex 1 to this Annex. <unk>
( c) Annex XXI shall include at the end the heading <unk> ANNEX 1 DES ANNEX XXI <unk>.
( d) The catalogue annexed to this Decision shall be inserted as Annex 1 to Annex XXI under the subheading <unk> MERKMALSKATALOG <unk>.
The texts of Decision 98 / 377 / EC in the Icelandic and Norwegian languages published in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Communities are authentic.
This Decision shall enter into force on 9 November 2002, provided that all the notifications under Article 103 (1) of the Agreement have been made to the EEA Joint Committee (3).
This Decision shall be published in the EEA section of, and in the EEA supplement to, the Official Journal of the European Communities.
amending Annex XXI (Statistics) to the EEA Agreement
Having regard to the Agreement on the European Economic Area, as amended by the Protocol adjusting the Agreement on the European Economic Area, hereinafter referred to as <unk> the Agreement <unk>, and in particular Article 98 thereof,
( 1) Anhang XXI des Abkommens wurde durch den Entscheidung des Gemeinsamen EEA -Ausschusses Nr. 110/ 2002 vom 12. Juli 2002<unk> 1) geändert. Annex XXI to the Agreement was amended by Decision of the EEA Joint Committee No 110 / 2002 of 12 July 2002 (1).
( 2) Die Entscheidung 2000 / 363/ EG der Kommission vom 28. April 2000 über die Durchführungsbestimmungen zu der Richtlinie 95 / 64 / EG des Rates über die statistische Erfassung des Güter- und Personenseeverkehrs<unk> 2) ist in das Abkommen aufzunehmen - Decision 2000 / 363 / EC of the Commission of 28 April 2000 on the implementing provisions of Council Directive 95 / 64 / EC on the statistical coverage of maritime transport of goods and passengers (2) is to be incorporated into the Agreement.
Point 7b (Council Directive 95 / 64 / EC) of Annex XXI to the Agreement shall be amended as follows:
( a) The following indent shall be added:
<unk> - 32000 D 0363: Commission Decision 2000 / 363 / EC of 28 April 2000 (OJ L 263, 7.7.2000, p.
1). <unk>
( b) The following adaptation shall be added:
( b) Annex II to Council Directive 95 / 64 / EC shall be supplemented by the list in Annex 2 to this Annex.
( c) Annex XXI shall include the heading <unk> ANNEX 2 DES ANNEX XXI <unk> after Annex 1.
( d) The list in the Annex to this Decision shall be inserted as Annex 2 to Annex XXI under the subheading <unk> LISTE DER EFTA-HÄFEN <unk>.
The texts of Decision 2000 / 363 / EC in the Icelandic and Norwegian languages published in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Communities are authentic.
This Decision shall enter into force on 9 November 2002, provided that all the notifications under Article 103 (1) of the Agreement have been made to the EEA Joint Committee (3).
This Decision shall be published in the EEA section of, and in the EEA supplement to, the Official Journal of the European Communities.
amending Annex II (Technical regulations, standards, testing and certification) to the EEA Agreement
Having regard to the Agreement on the European Economic Area, as amended by the Protocol adjusting the Agreement on the European Economic Area, hereinafter referred to as <unk> the Agreement <unk>, and in particular Article 98 thereof,
( 1) Annex II to the Agreement was amended by Decision of the EEA Joint Committee No 13 / 2001 of 23 February 2001 (1).
( 2) Die Sechsundundzwanzigste Richtlinie 2002/ 34/ EG der Kommission vom 15. April 2002 zur Anpassung der Anhänge II, III und VII der Richtlinie 76/ 768 / EWG des Rates zur Angleichung der Rechtsvorschriften der Mitgliedstaaten über kosmetische Mittel an den technischen Fortschritt<unk> 2) ist in das Abkommen aufzunehmen - The Commission Directive 2002 / 34 / EC of 15 April 2002 adapting Annexes II, III and VII to Council Directive 76 / 768 / EEC on the approximation of the laws of the Member States relating to cosmetic products to technical progress (2) shall be incorporated into the Agreement,
The following indent shall be added under point 1 (Council Directive 76 / 768 / EEC) of Annex II, Chapter XVI, to the Agreement:
<unk> - 32002 L 0034: Twenty-sixth Commission Directive 2002 / 34 / EC of 15 April 2002 (OJ L 263, 7.12.2002, p.
19). <unk>
The texts of Directive 2002 / 34 / EC in the Icelandic and Norwegian languages published in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Union are authentic.
This Decision shall enter into force on 7 December 2002, provided that all the notifications under Article 103 (1) of the Agreement have been made to the EEA Joint Committee (3).
This Decision shall be published in the EEA section of, and in the EEA supplement to, the Official Journal of the European Union.
amending Annex XVIII (Health and safety at work, labour law and equal treatment for men and women) to the EEA Agreement
Having regard to the Agreement on the European Economic Area, as amended by the Protocol adjusting the Agreement on the European Economic Area, hereinafter referred to as <unk> the Agreement <unk>, and in particular Article 98 thereof,
( 1) Annex XVIII to the Agreement was amended by Decision of the EEA Joint Committee No 89 / 2002 of 25 June 2002 (1).
( 2) Die Richtlinie 2002/ 14/ EG des Europäischen Parlament und des Rates vom 11. März 2002 zur Festlegung eines allgemeinen Rahmens für die Informationen und Anhörung der Arbeitnehmer in der Europäischen Gemeinschaft<unk> 2) ist in das Abkommen aufzunehmen - Directive 2002 / 14 / EC of the European Parliament and of the Council of 11 March 2002 establishing a general framework for informing and consulting employees in the European Community (2) is to be incorporated into the Agreement.
The following point shall be inserted after point 32e (Council Directive 2001 / 86 / EC) in Annex XVIII to the Agreement:
32002 L 0014: Directive 2002 / 14 / EC of the European Parliament and of the Council of 11 March 2002 establishing a general framework for the information and consultation of employees in the European Community (OJ L 332, p.
29). <unk>
The texts of Directive 2002 / 14 / EC in the Icelandic and Norwegian languages, published in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Union, are authentic.
This Decision shall enter into force on 7 December 2002, provided that all the notifications under Article 103 (1) of the Agreement have been made to the EEA Joint Committee (3).
This Decision shall be published in the EEA section of, and in the EEA supplement to, the Official Journal of the European Union.
amending Annex XX (environmental protection) to the EEA Agreement
Having regard to the Agreement on the European Economic Area, as amended by the Protocol adjusting the Agreement on the European Economic Area, hereinafter referred to as <unk> the Agreement <unk>, and in particular Article 98 thereof,
( 1) Anhang XX des Abkommens wurde durch den Entscheidung des Gemeinsamen EEA -Ausschusses Nr. 149/ 2002 vom 8. November 2002<unk> 1) geändert. Annex XX to the Agreement was amended by Decision of the EEA Joint Committee No 149 / 2002 of 8 November 2002 (1).
( 2) Die Entscheidung 2002/ 371/ EG der Kommission vom 15. Mai 2002 zur Festlegung von Umweltkriterien für die Vergabe eines Eweltzeichens für Textilerzeugnisse und zur Änderung der Entscheidung 1999/ 178/ EG<unk> 2) ist in das Abkommen aufzunehmen - Decision 2002 / 371 / EC of the Commission of 15 May 2002 laying down environmental criteria for the award of an ecolabel for textile products and amending Decision 1999 / 178 / EG<unk> 2) is to be incorporated into the Agreement.
Annex XX to the Agreement shall be amended as follows:
1. Nummer 2en wird zu Nummer 2ena. Number 2en shall become number 2ena.
2. Under point 2ena (Commission Decision 1999 / 178 / EC) the following indent shall be added:
<unk> - 32002 D 0371: Commission Decision 2002 / 371 / EC of 15 May 2002 (OJ L 263, 27.12.2002, p.
29). <unk>
3. After paragraph 2em (Commission Decision 98 / 634 / EC) the following number shall be inserted:
32002 D 0371: Commission Decision 2002 / 371 / EC of 15 May 2002 laying down eco-criteria for the award of an eco-label for textile products and amending Decision 1999 / 178 / EC (OJ L 183, 7.12.2002, p.
29). <unk>
4. Nummer 2ena wird mit Wirkung vom 31. Mai 2003 gestrichen. Paragraph 2ena shall be deleted with effect from 31 May 2003.
The texts of Decision 2002 / 371 / EC in the Icelandic and Norwegian languages published in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Union are authentic.
This Decision shall enter into force on 7 December 2002, provided that all the notifications under Article 103 (1) of the Agreement have been made to the EEA Joint Committee (3).
This Decision shall be published in the EEA section of, and in the EEA supplement to, the Official Journal of the European Union.
amending Annex XX (environmental protection) to the EEA Agreement
Having regard to the Agreement on the European Economic Area, as amended by the Protocol adjusting the Agreement on the European Economic Area, hereinafter referred to as <unk> the Agreement <unk>, and in particular Article 98 thereof,
( 1) Anhang XX des Abkommens wurde durch den Entscheidung des Gemeinsamen EEA -Ausschusses Nr. 149/ 2002 vom 8. November 2002<unk> 1) geändert. Annex XX to the Agreement was amended by Decision of the EEA Joint Committee No 149 / 2002 of 8 November 2002 (1).
( 2) Die Entscheidung 2002/ 272/ EG der Kommission vom 25. März 2002 zur Festlegung der Umweltkriterien für die Vergabe des Umweltzeichens der Gemeinschaft für hart Bodenbeläge<unk> 2) ist in das Abkommen aufzunehmen - Decision 2002 / 272 / EC of the Commission of 25 March 2002 establishing the environmental criteria for the award of the Community Ecolabel for hard flooring (2) is to be incorporated into the Agreement:
The following point shall be inserted after point 2eu (Commission Decision 2002 / 255 / EC) in Annex XX to the Agreement:
32002 D 0272: Commission Decision 2002 / 272 / EC of 25 March 2002 laying down the eco-criteria applicable to the award of the Community Ecolabel for hard floorcoverings (OJ L 338, p.
13). <unk>
The texts of Decision 2002 / 272 / EC in the Icelandic and Norwegian languages published in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Union are authentic.
This Decision shall enter into force on 7 December 2002, provided that all the notifications under Article 103 (1) of the Agreement have been made to the EEA Joint Committee (3).
This Decision shall be published in the EEA section of, and in the EEA supplement to, the Official Journal of the European Union.
ROTTERDAMER AGREEMENT ON THE PROCEDURE OF PREVIOUS AGREEMENT FOR CERTAIN DANGEROUS CHEMICALS AND PESTICIAL INTERNATIONAL TRADE
Aware of the effects of certain hazardous chemicals and pesticides on human health and the environment,
Recalling the relevant provisions of the Rio Declaration on Environment and Development and of Chapter 19 of Agenda 21 <unk> Environmentally sound management of toxic chemicals, including measures to prevent illegal international trade in toxic and hazardous products <unk>,
Recognising the work carried out by the United Nations Environment Programme (UNEP) and the Food and Agriculture Organisation (FAO) of the United Nations in applying the Prior Informed Consent (PIC) voluntary procedure, as set out in UNEP <unk> s amended London Guidelines for the Exchange of Information on Chemicals in International Trade (hereinafter referred to as <unk> the London Guidelines <unk>) and in FAO <unk> s International Code of Conduct on the Marketing and Use of Pesticides (hereinafter referred to as <unk> the International Code of Conduct <unk>),
Bearing in mind the realities and specific needs of developing countries and countries with transition economies, and in particular the need to strengthen national competences and capacities for handling chemicals, including through technology transfer, provision of financial and technical assistance and promotion of cooperation between the Parties,
Considering the specific information needs of certain countries concerning transit traffic,
Recognising that good practice in the handling of chemicals should be promoted in all countries, taking into account, inter alia, the voluntary standards set out in the International Code of Conduct and in the UNEP Code of Ethics on International Trade in Chemicals,
Guided by the desire to ensure that hazardous chemicals exported from their territories are packaged and labelled in such a way as to ensure adequate protection of human health and the environment, in accordance with the principles of the revised London Guidelines and the International Code of Conduct,
Recognising that trade and environmental policies should complement each other with a view to sustainable development,
Emphasizing that this Agreement shall not be interpreted as implying in any way an amendment of the rights and obligations of a Contracting Party under applicable international conventions on chemicals in international trade or for the protection of the environment,
provided that the foregoing motivations are not intended to establish a hierarchy between this Convention and other international conventions,
Determined to protect health, including the health of consumers and workers, and the environment, from the potentially harmful effects of certain hazardous chemicals and pesticides in international trade,
The objective of this Agreement is to promote joint responsibility and joint efforts by the Contracting Parties in international trade in certain hazardous chemicals with a view to protecting health and the environment from potential harm and to contribute to their environmentally sound use by facilitating the exchange of information on the characteristics of such chemicals, by establishing a domestic decision making process for their import and export and by transmitting such decisions to the Contracting Parties.
( a) <unk> Chemicals
These categories include: pesticides (including particularly hazardous pesticide formulations) and industrial chemicals;
( b) <unk> prohibited chemicals
It includes chemicals for which authorisation has been refused for their initial use or which have been withdrawn from the market by industry either domestically or which have been excluded from further consideration in the national authorisation process, provided that it is clear that these measures have been taken for reasons of public health or environmental protection;
( c) <unk> chemicals subject to strict restrictions
It includes chemicals which have been refused authorisation for their use for virtually all purposes or which have been withdrawn from the market by industry either domestically or have been excluded from further consideration in the national authorisation process, provided that it is clear that these measures have been taken for reasons of public health or environmental protection;
( d) <unk> particularly hazardous pesticide formulations
( e) <unk> directly applicable legislation
( f) <unk> export
( g) <unk> Contracting Party
( h) <unk> regional economic integration organisation
( i) <unk> Chemicals Testing Committee
( 1) Dieses Übereinkommen findet Anwendung auf: This Convention shall apply to:
( a) chemicals subject to prohibitions or strict restrictions; and
( 2) Dieses Übereinkommen findet keine Anwendung auf: This Convention shall not apply to:
( a) Narcotic drugs and psychotropic substances;
( e) pharmaceutical products, including medicinal products for humans and animals;
( f) chemicals used as food additives;
( h) Chemicals in quantities so small that there is no risk of harm to human health or the environment, provided that they are imported for the following reasons:
( i) for research or analysis purposes, or
( ii) by an individual for his own personal use in quantities appropriate for such purpose.
( 1) Jede Vertragspartei bezeichnet eine oder mehrere nationale Behörden, die befugt sind, in ihrem Namen zu handeln und die nach diesem Übereinkommen erforderlichen Verwaltungsaufgaben wahrzunehmen. Each Contracting Party shall designate one or more national authorities empowered to act on its behalf and perform the administrative functions required under this Agreement.
( 2) Jede Vertragspartei bemüht sich zu gewährleisten, daß dieser Behörde oder diesen Behörden ausreichende Mittel zur wirksamen Erfuellung ihrer Aufgaben zur Verfügung stehen. Each Contracting Party shall endeavour to ensure that this authority or these authorities have sufficient resources available for the effective fulfilment of its functions.
( 3) Jede Vertragspartei teilt dem Sekretariat spätestens bis zum Tag des Inkrafttretens des Übereinkommens für diese Vertragspartei Namen und Anschrift dieser Behörde <unk> n) mit. Each Contracting Party shall notify the Secretariat, not later than the date of entry into force of the Convention, of the name and address of such Contracting Party.
It shall also promptly inform the Secretariat of any change in the name or address of such authorities.
( 4) Das Sekretariat setzt die Vertragsparteien unverzüglich über die gemäß Absatz 3 bei ihm eingegangenen Mitteilungen in Kenntnis. The Secretariat shall inform the Contracting Parties immediately of the notifications received pursuant to paragraph 3 of this Article.
( 1) Jede Vertragspartei, die eine unmittelbar geltende Rechtsvorschrift erlassen hat, notifiziert diese dem Sekretariat schriftlich. Any Contracting Party which has adopted a directly applicable legal provision shall notify the Secretariat thereof in writing.
This notification shall be made as soon as possible but not later than 90 days after the date on which the directly applicable legislation has entered into force and shall, where available, provide the information required by Annex I.
( 2) Jede Vertragspartei notifiziert dem Sekretariat zum Zeitpunkt des Inkrafttretens dieses Übereinkommens für diese Vertragspartei schriftlich ihre zu diesem Zeitpunkt unmittelbar geltenden Rechtsvorschriften, wobei Vertragsparteien, die bereits aufgrund der geänderten Londoner Leitlinien oder des Internationalen Verhaltenkodex unmittelbar geltende Rechtsvorschriften notifiziert haben, diese Notifikationen nicht erneut vorlegen müssen. Each Contracting Party shall notify the Secretariat in writing, at the time of the entry into force of this Agreement, of its legislation directly applicable to that Contracting Party at that date, whereby Contracting Parties which have already notified directly applicable legislation as a result of the amended London Guidelines or the International Code of Conduct shall not have to submit such notifications again.
( 3) Das Sekretariat prüft so bald wie möglich, spätestens jedoch sechs Monate nach Eingang einer Notifikation nach den Absätzen 1 und 2, ob die meldung die gemäß Anlage I erforderlichen Informationen enthält. Ist dies der Fall, übermittelt das Sekretariat allen Vertragsparteien unverzüglich eine Zusammenfassung der ihm zugeleiteten Informationen. If this is the case, the secretariat shall communicate to all Contracting Parties without delay a summary of the information provided to it.
If the notification does not contain the necessary information, the secretariat shall notify the notifying Party accordingly.
( 4) Das Sekretariat übermittelt den Vertragsparteien alle sechs Monate eine Brief Zusammenfassung der ihr aufgrund der Absätze 1 und 2 zugeleiteten Informationen, einschließlich Informationen über diejenigen Notifikationen, die nicht alle nach Anlage I erforderlichen Informationen enthalten. The Secretariat shall, every six months, provide the Contracting Parties with a brief summary of the information provided to it pursuant to paragraphs 1 and 2 of this Article, including information on notifications which do not contain all the information required in accordance with Annex I.
( 5) Sobald das Sekretariat aus zwei PIC-Regionen mindestens je eine Notifikation zu einer bestimmten Chemikalie erhalten hat, die nachweislich die Anforderungen der Anlage I erfuellt, leitet es diese Notifikationen an den Chemikalienprüfungsausschuss weiter. As soon as the secretariat, consisting of two PIC-Regions, has received at least one notification each of a particular chemical which verifiably meets the requirements of Annex I, it shall forward such notifications to the Chemical Testing Committee.
The composition of the PIC regions shall be decided upon by consensus at the first meeting of the Conference of the Parties.
( 6) Der Chemikalienprüfungsausschuss überprüft die in diesen Notifikationen enthaltenen Informationen und übermittelt der Konferenz der Vertragsparteien in Übereinstimmung mit den in Anlage II niedergelegten Kriterien Empfehlungen im Hinblick darauf, ob die betreffende Chemikalie dem Verfahren der vorherige Zustimmung nach Inkenntnissetzung unterliegen und demententsprechend in Anlage III aufgenommen werden soll. The Chemical Testing Committee shall review the information contained in such notifications and, in accordance with the criteria laid down in Annex II, shall make recommendations to the Conference of the Parties as to whether the chemicals concerned are subject to the prior informed consent procedure and should be included accordingly in Annex III.
( 1) Vertragsparteien, die Entwicklungsländer sind oder deren Wirtschaftssystem sich im Übergang befindet und in deren Hoheitsgebiet eine besonders gefährliche Pestizidformulierung unter Anwendungsbedingungen Probleme verursacht, können dem Sekretariat die Aufnahme dieser Pestizidformulierung in Anlage III vorschlagen. Contracting Parties which are developing countries or whose economies are in transition and in whose territory are causing problems with particularly hazardous pesticide formulation under application conditions may propose to the Secretariat the inclusion of this pesticide formulation in Annex III.
For the preparation of a proposal, the Contracting Party may seek technical assistance from any relevant source.
The proposal shall also contain the information required by Annex IV, Part 1.
( 2) Das Sekretariat prüft so bald wie möglich, spätestens jedoch sechs Monate nach Eingang eines Vorschlag nach Absatz 1, ob der Vorschlag die nach Anlage IV Teil 1 erforderlichen Informationen enthält. The Secretariat shall consider as soon as possible, but not later than six months after the receipt of a proposal in accordance with paragraph 1, whether the proposal contains the information required in accordance with Annex IV, Part 1.
If this is the case, the Secretariat shall promptly provide all Contracting Parties with a summary of the information provided to it.
If the proposal does not provide the necessary information, the secretariat shall notify the proposing Contracting Party accordingly.
( 3) Das Sekretariat sammelt die in Anlage IV Teil 2 vorgesehenen zusätzliche Informationen zu den nach Absatz 2 übermittelten Vorschläge. The Secretariat shall collect the additional information provided for in Annex IV, Part 2, to the proposals referred to in paragraph 2.
( 4) Sind die Anforderungen der Absätze 2 und 3 im Hinblick auf eine bestimmte besonders gefährliche Pestizidformulierung erfuellt worden, leitet das Sekretariat den Vorschlag und die dazugehörigen Informationen an den Chemikalienprüfungsausschuss weiter. If the requirements of paragraphs 2 and 3 of this Article have been met with regard to a particular particularly hazardous formulation of pesticides, the Secretariat shall forward the proposal and the relevant information to the Chemical Testing Committee.
( 5) Der Chemikalienprüfungsausschuss überprüft die in dem Vorschlag enthaltenen Informationen und die gesammelten zusätzliche Informationen und übermittelt der Konferenz der Vertragsparteien in Übereinstimmung mit den in Anlage IV Teil 3 niedergelegten Kriterien Empfehlungen im Hinblick darauf, ob die betreffende besonders gefährliche Pestizidformulierung dem Verfahren der vorherige Zustimmung nach Inkenntnissetzung unterliegt und demententsprechend in Anlage III aufgenommen werden soll. The Chemical Testing Committee shall review the information contained in the proposal and the additional information collected and, in accordance with the criteria laid down in Annex IV, Part 3, shall make recommendations to the Conference of the Parties as to whether the particularly hazardous pesticide formulation in question is subject to prior informed consent and should be included accordingly in Annex III.
( 1) Für jede Chemikalie, in deren Fall der Chemikalienprüfungsausschuss entschieden hat, sie für die Aufnahme in Anlage III zu empfehlen, arbeitet er einen Entwurf für ein Dokument zur Unterstützung des Entscheidungsprozesses aus. For each chemical in whose case the Chemical Assessment Committee has decided to recommend it for inclusion in Annex III, it shall draw up a draft document in support of the decision process.
The document in support of the decision making process should be based at least on the information contained in Annex I and Annex IV, respectively, and should also include information on uses of the chemical in a category other than that referred to by the directly applicable legislation.
( 2) Die in Absatz 1 bezeichnete Empfehlung wird zusammen mit dem Entwurf des Dokuments zur Unterstützung des Entscheidungsprozesses der Konferenz der Vertragsparteien zugeleitet. The recommendation referred to in paragraph 1 of this Article shall be transmitted together with the draft document in support of the decision making process to the Conference of the Parties.
The Conference of the Parties shall decide whether the chemical should be subject to the prior informed consent procedure and shall, accordingly, include the chemical in Annex III and approve the draft document in support of the decision making process.
( 3) Ist eine Entscheidung über die Aufnahme einer Chemikalie in Anlage III getroffen und das dazugehörige Dokument zur Unterstützung des Entscheidungsprozesses von der Konferenz der Vertragsparteien genehmigt worden, gibt das Sekretariat diese Informationen unverzüglich an alle Vertragsparteien weiter. Where a decision to include a chemical in Annex III has been taken and the relevant document in support of the decision making process has been approved by the Conference of the Parties, the secretariat shall promptly forward such information to all Parties.
Chemicals under the voluntary prior informed consent procedure
For all chemicals incorporated before the first session of the Conference of the Parties into the voluntary prior informed consent procedure, except those listed in Annex III, the Conference of the Parties at that meeting shall decide to include them in Annex III, provided that it is satisfied that all the requirements for inclusion in that Annex have been fulfilled.
( 1) Legt eine Vertragspartei dem Sekretariat Informationen vor, die beim Zeitpunkt der Entscheidung über die Aufnahme einer Chemikalie in Anlage III noch nicht zur Verfügung standen, und geht aus diesen Informationen hervorkunft, daß der Verbleib dieser Chemikalie in Anlage III nach den einschlägigen Kriterien in Anlage II bzw. Anlage IV nicht mehr JustiJustiJustiJustiJustitigt ist, so leitet das Sekretariat die Informationen an den Chemikalienprüfungsausschuss weiter. Where a Contracting Party provides to the Secretariat information which was not available at the time of the decision to include a chemical in Annex III, and where such information indicates that the whereabouts of that chemical in Annex III is no longer justified in accordance with the relevant criteria in Annex II or Annex IV, the Secretariat shall forward the information to the Chemical Testing Committee.
( 2) Der Chemikalienprüfungsausschuss überprüft die ihm nach Absatz 1 zugeleiteten Informationen. The Chemical Testing Committee shall review the information provided to it in accordance with paragraph 1 of this Article.
For each chemical in whose case it has decided, in accordance with the relevant criteria in Annex II or Annex IV, to recommend its removal from Annex III, it shall draw up an amended draft document in support of the decision making process.
( 3) Eine Empfehlung nach Absatz 2 wird der Konferenz der Vertragsparteien zusammen mit dem geänderten Entwurf des Dokuments zur Unterstützung des Entscheidungsprozesses zugeleitet. A recommendation in accordance with paragraph 2 of this Article shall be forwarded to the Conference of the Parties together with the amended draft of the document in support of the decision making process.
The Conference of the Parties shall decide whether to delete the chemical from Annex III and approve the amended draft document in support of the decision making process.
( 4) Ist eine Entscheidung über die Streiung einer Chemikalie aus Anlage III getroffen und das dazugehörige geänderte Dokument zur Unterstützung des Entscheidungsprozesses von der Konferenz der Vertragsparteien genehmigt worden, gibt das Sekretariat diese Informationen unverzüglich an alle Vertragsparteien weiter. If a decision to delete a chemical from Annex III has been taken and the relevant amended document in support of the decision making process has been approved by the Conference of the Parties, the secretariat shall immediately forward this information to all Parties.
Obligations in respect of imports of chemicals listed in Annex III
( 1) Jede Vertragspartei erlässt geeignete Rechts- bzw. Verwaltungsvorschriften, um eine frühzeitige Entscheidung über die Einfuhr von in Anlage III aufgenommenen Chemikalien zu gewährleisten. Each Contracting Party shall adopt appropriate laws and regulations to ensure an early decision on the importation of chemicals listed in Annex III.
( 2) Jede Vertragspartei übermittelt dem Sekretariat so bald wie möglich, spätestens jedoch neun Monate nach Absendung des in Artikel 7 Absatz 3 bezeichneten Dokuments zur Unterstützung des Entscheidungsprozesses, eine Antwort im Hinblick auf die künftige Einfuhr der betreffenden Chemikalie. Each Contracting Party shall, as soon as possible, but not later than nine months after the date of dispatch of the document referred to in Article 7 (3) in support of the decision making process, provide the Secretariat with a response with a view to the future importation of the chemicals concerned.
If a Contracting Party so amends its reply, it shall promptly submit the amended reply to the Secretariat.
( 3) Nach Ablauf der in Absatz 2 genannten Frist übermittelt das Sekretariat einer Vertragspartei, die eine solche Antwort nicht erteilt hat, unverzüglich eine entsprechende schriftliche Aufforderung. After the period referred to in paragraph 2 of this Article has expired, the secretariat shall promptly send a corresponding written request to a Contracting Party which has not given such a reply.
If the Contracting Party is unable to reply, the Secretariat shall, where appropriate, assist the Contracting Party in submitting a reply within the period referred to in Article 11 (2), last sentence.
( 4) Eine Antwort nach Absatz 2 besteht entweder aus An answer under paragraph 2 shall consist of either:
( a) a final decision based on laws, regulations or administrative provisions;
( ii) not to consent to imports; or
( iii) consent to imports subject to certain conditions; or
( b) a provisional reply which may include:
( i) a provisional decision on consent to import with or without certain conditions or on disagreement to import during the transitional period;
( ii) a declaration that a final decision is under intensive consideration;
( iii) a request for further information to be made to the secretariat or to the Contracting Party which has notified the directly applicable legislation;
( iv) a request to the Secretariat for assistance in the evaluation of the chemical.
( 5) Eine Antwort nach Absatz 4 Buchstabe a) oder b) bezieht sich auf die für die Chemikalie in Anlage III spezizierte<unk> n) Kategorie orie<unk> n). A response in accordance with paragraph 4 (a) or (b) of this Article shall refer to the categories specified for the chemical in Annex III.
( 6) Eine endgültigen Entscheidung soll auch eine Beschreibung aller Rechts- bzw. Verwaltungsvorschriften beiliegen, auf die sie sich stützt. A final decision shall also be accompanied by a description of all the laws and regulations on which it is based.
( 7) Jede Vertragspartei übermittelt dem Sekretariat spätestens bis zum Datum des Inkrafttretens dieses Übereinkommens für diese Vertragspartei Antworten zu jeder in Anlage III aufgenommenen Chemikalie. Each Contracting Party shall provide to the Secretariat, not later than the date of entry into force of this Agreement, for that Contracting Party, answers to each of the chemicals listed in Annex III.
Contracting Parties that have provided such replies under the revised London Guidelines or the International Code of Conduct shall not be required to submit them again.
( 8) Jede Vertragspartei stellt ihre Antwort nach diesem Artikel in Übereinstimmung mit ihren Rechts- bzw. Verwaltungsvorschriften den betroffenen innerhalb ihres Hoheitsbereichs zur Verfügung. Each Contracting Party shall, in accordance with its laws and / or regulations, provide the persons concerned with its answers in accordance with this Article within its jurisdiction.
( 9) Eine Vertragspartei, die aufgrund der Absätze 2 und 4 oder des Artikels 11 Absatz 2 entscheidet, der Einfuhr einer Chemikalie nicht oder nur unter bestimmten Bedingungen zuzustimmen, muss - sofern sie dies nicht bereits getan - Simultaneously folgendes verbieten oder es den selben Bedingungen unterwerfen: A Contracting Party which, on the basis of paragraphs 2 and 4 or paragraph 2 of Article 11, decides not to agree to the importation of a chemical or to do so only under certain conditions, shall, provided that it has not already done so, ban the following or shall subject it to the same conditions:
( a) imports of the chemical from any source; and
( b) domestic production of the chemical for domestic consumption.
( 10) Alle sechs Monate informiert das Sekretariat sämtliche Vertragsparteien über die ihm zugangenen Replies. Every six months the Secretariat shall inform all Contracting Parties of the replies it receives.
This information shall include, where available, a description of the laws, regulations or administrative provisions on which the decisions are based.
The Secretariat shall also inform the Contracting Parties of any failure to reply.
Obligations relating to exports of chemicals listed in Annex III
( 1) Jede führende Vertragspartei Each exporting Party
( a) apply appropriate laws, regulations and administrative provisions to provide, within their jurisdiction, the replies provided by the Secretariat in accordance with Article 10 (10);
( b) adopt appropriate laws, regulations and administrative provisions to ensure that exporters, within their jurisdiction, comply with the decisions in such replies not later than six months after the date on which the Secretariat first informed the Contracting Parties of the individual replies provided in accordance with Article 10 (10);
( c) advise and assist importing Contracting Parties, upon request and as appropriate, in:
( i) in obtaining further information enabling them to take action in accordance with Article 10 (4) and Article 11 (2) (c); and
( ii) strengthening their capacities and capabilities for the safe management of chemicals throughout their lifetime.
( 2) Jede Vertragspartei stellt sicher, daß eine in Anlage III aufgenommene Chemikalie nicht aus ihrem Hoheitsgebiet an eine einführende Vertragspartei ausgeführt wird, die unter außergewöhnlichen Umständen keine Antwort übermittelt hat oder die eine vorläufige Antwort übermittelt hat, die keine vorläufige Entscheidung enthält, es sei, Each Contracting Party shall ensure that a chemical product listed in Annex III is not exported from its territory to an importing Contracting Party which, under exceptional circumstances, has not provided a response or which has provided a provisional response which does not contain a provisional decision, unless:
( a) a chemical registered as a chemical with the importing Contracting Party at the time of import;
( b) it is a chemical which has been shown to have been imported or used by the importing Party and for which no legislation banning its use has been adopted;
( c) the exporter, through a designated national authority, has sought and obtained explicit consent to the importation from the importing Contracting Party.
The importing Contracting Party shall reply to such a request within 60 days and shall promptly notify the Secretariat of its decision.
The obligations of the exporting Contracting Parties under this paragraph shall enter into force six months after the date on which the Secretariat first informed the Contracting Parties, in accordance with Article 10 (10), that a Contracting Party had not provided a reply or that it had provided a provisional reply which did not contain a provisional decision and shall be valid for one year.
( 1) Wird eine von einer Vertragspartei verboten oder strengen Beschränkungen unterworfene Chemikalie aus dem Hoheitsgebiet dieser Vertragspartei ausgeführt, so notifiziert diese Partei der einführenden Vertragspartei die Ausfuhr. If a chemical product banned or subject to stringent restrictions by a Contracting Party is exported from the territory of that Contracting Party, that Party shall notify the importing Contracting Party of its export.
The export notification shall contain the information set out in Annex V.
( 2) Die Notifikation der Ausfuhr der betreffenden Chemikalie erfolgt vor der ersten Ausfuhr nach Erlass der entsprechenden unmittelbar geltenden Rechtsvorschriften. The notification of the export of the chemicals concerned shall be made before the first export after the enactment of the relevant directly applicable legislation.
Thereafter it shall be carried out before the first export of each calendar year.
The designated national authority of the importing Contracting Party may waive the requirement of prior notification.
( 3) Sobald eine führende Vertragspartei unmittelbar geltende Rechtsvorschriften erlassen hat, die zu wesentlichen Änderungen im Hinblick auf das Verbot oder die strenge Beschränkung der Chemikalie führen, legt sie eine aktualisierte Ausfuhrnotifikation vor. As soon as an exporting Contracting Party has adopted directly applicable legislation leading to substantial amendments to the prohibition or strict restriction of the chemicals, it shall submit an updated export notification.
( 4) Die einführende Vertragspartei bestätigt den Empfang der ersten nach Erlass der unmittelbar geltenden Rechtsvorschriften bei ihr eingegangenen Ausfuhrnotifikation. The importing Contracting Party shall confirm receipt of the first export notification received by the importing Party after the adoption of the directly applicable legislation.
If the exporting Contracting Party has not received such confirmation within 30 days of the dispatch of the export notification, it shall submit a second export notification.
The exporting Contracting Party shall make every effort to ensure that the importing Contracting Party receives the second notification.
( 5) Die in Absatz 1 niedergelegten Verpflichtungen einer Vertragspartei entfallen, The obligations of a Contracting Party specified in paragraph 1 of this Article shall cease to apply:
( a) once the chemical has been listed in Annex III;
( b) as soon as the importing Contracting Party has replied to the secretariat for that chemical in accordance with Article 10 (2);
( c) as soon as the Secretariat has forwarded the reply referred to in Article 10 (10) to the Contracting Parties.
( 1) Die Konferenz der Vertragsparteien re+ gt die Weltzollorganisation an an, den in Anlage III aufgenommenen einzelnen Chemikalien bzw. Chemikalienggruppen im Rahmen des Harmonisierten Systems bestimmte Zollcodes zuzuordnen. The Conference of the Parties shall encourage the World Customs Organization to allocate certain customs codes to the individual chemicals or groups of chemicals included in Annex III within the framework of the Harmonized System.
Each Contracting Party shall require that a code associated with such a chemical be noted on export in the chemical <unk> s transit documents.
( 2) Unbeschadet etwaiger Vorschriften der einführenden Vertragspartei schreibt jede Vertragspartei vor, daß sowohl für die in Anlage III aufgenommenen Chemikalien sowie für die in ihrem Hoheitsgebiet verboten oder striengen Beschränkungen unterliegenden Chemikalien bei der Ausfuhr Kennzeichnungsvorschriften gelten, die unter Berücksichtigung der einschlägigen internationalen Normen gewährleisten, daß ausreichende Informationen über Gefahren und/ oder Gefahren für die menschlichen Gesundheit oder die Umwelt zur Verfügung stehen. Without prejudice to any regulations of the importing Contracting Party, each Contracting Party shall require that export labelling regulations apply to both chemicals listed in Annex III and to chemicals subject to strict restrictions in its territory, which, taking into account the relevant international standards, ensure that sufficient information is available on risks and / or hazards to human health or the environment.
( 3) Unbeschaiger etwaiger Vorschriften der einführenden Vertragspartei kann jede Vertragspartei vorschreiben, daß für die in ihrem Hoheitsgebiet umwelt- oder gesundheitsbezogenen Kennzeichnungsvorschriften unterliegenden Chemikalien bei der Ausfuhr Kennzeichnungsvorschriften gelten, die unter Berücksichtigung der einschlägigen internationalen Normen gewährleisten, daß ausreichende Informationen über Gefahren und/ oder Gefahren für die menschlichen Gesundheit oder die Umwelt zur Verfügung stehen. Without prejudice to any regulations of the importing Contracting Party, any Contracting Party may prescribe that for the chemicals subject to labelling or health regulations in its territory, export labelling regulations apply which, taking into account the relevant international standards, ensure that sufficient information is available on risks and / or hazards to human health or the environment.
( 4) Für diejenigen der in Absatz 2 genannten Chemikalien, die zur berufliche Verwendung bestimmt sind, schreibt jede führende Vertragspartei vor, daß jedem Einführer ein Sicherheitsdatenblatt zugesandt wird, das in internationally anerkannter Form die neuesten verfügbaren Informationen enthält. For those chemicals referred to in paragraph 2 of this Article intended for professional use, each exporting Contracting Party shall prescribe that a safety data sheet shall be sent to each importer containing the latest available information in an internationally recognised form.
( 5) Die Angaben auf dem Etikett und auf dem Sicherheitsdatenblatt sollen soweit wie möglich in einer oder mehreren Amtssprachen der einführenden Vertragspartei abgefasst sein. The information on the label and the safety data sheet shall, as far as possible, be in one or more official languages of the importing Contracting Party.
( 1) Soweit angebracht und im Einklang mit dem Ziel dieses Übereinkommens erleichtert jede Vertragspartei As far as appropriate and consistent with the objective of this Convention, each Contracting Party shall facilitate:
( a) the exchange of scientific, technical, economic and legal information on chemicals falling within the scope of the Convention, including toxicological, ecotoxicological and safety information;
( b) the provision of publicly available information on internal legislation relevant to the objectives of the Convention;
( c) the provision to other Contracting Parties, either directly or through the secretariat, of information on internal legislation which significantly restricts one or, where appropriate, several uses of the chemical.
( 2) Vertragsparteien, die im Rahmen dieses Übereinkommens Informationen austauschen, schützen im gegenseitigen Einvernehmen alle vertraulichen Informationen. Parties which exchange information under this Agreement shall, by mutual agreement, protect all confidential information.
( 3) Folgende Informationen werden nicht als vertraulich im Sinne dieses Übereinkommens angesehen: The following information shall not be considered confidential within the meaning of this Agreement:
( a) the information referred to in Annexes I and IV, provided in accordance with Articles 5 and 6, respectively;
( b) the information contained in the safety data sheet referred to in Article 13 (4);
( c) the expiry date of the chemical;
( d) information on precautionary measures, including the classification of hazards, the nature of the risk and the relevant safety notices;
( e) the summary of the results of toxicological and ecotoxicological tests.
( 4) Das Herstellungsdatum der Chemikalie wird im Allgemeinen nicht als vertraulich im Sinne dieses Übereinkommens angesehen. The date of manufacture of the chemicals shall generally not be regarded as confidential within the meaning of this Agreement.
( 5) Eine Vertragspartei, die Auskünfte über den Transit von in Anlage III aufgeführten Chemikalien durch ihr Hoheitsgebiet benötigt, kann ihr Anliegen dem Sekretariat vortragen, dieses setzt alle Vertragsparteien davon in Kenntnis. A Contracting Party which needs information on the transit of chemicals listed in Annex III may make its request to the Secretariat, which shall inform all Contracting Parties thereof.
( 1) Jede Vertragspartei ergreift die erforderlichen Maßnahmen, um ihre innerstaatliche Infrastruktur und eigene staatliche Institutionen für die wirksame Durchführung des Übereinkommens zu schaffen oder zu verstärken. Each Contracting Party shall take the necessary measures to create or strengthen its domestic infrastructure and its own governmental institutions for the effective implementation of the Convention.
Such measures, which may include, where appropriate, the adoption or amendment of national laws, regulations or administrative provisions, may also include:
( a) the establishment of national registers and databases, including safety relevant information on chemicals;
( b) support for industry initiatives to promote chemical safety;
( c) the promotion of voluntary arrangements taking into account the provisions of Article 16.
( 2) Jede Vertragspartei stellt im Rahmen des Möglichen sicher, daß die Öffentlichkeit angemessenen Zugang zu Informationen über die Handhabung von Chemikalien und das verhalten bei Acfällen sowie über Alternatives hat, die für die menschlichen Gesundheit oder die Umwelt unbedenklicher sind als die in Anlage III aufgenommenen Chemikalien. Each Contracting Party shall, to the extent practicable, ensure that the public has adequate access to information on the handling of chemicals and behaviour in the event of accidents and on alternatives that are less harmful to human health or the environment than the chemicals listed in Annex III.
( 3) Die Vertragsparteien kommen überein, unmittelbar oder gegebenenfalls im Rahmen der zuständigen internationalen Organisationen bei der Durchführung dieses Übereinkommens auf subregionaler, regionaler und globaler Ebene zusammenarbeiten. The Contracting Parties agree to cooperate, directly or, where appropriate, within the framework of the competent international organizations, in the implementation of this Agreement on a subregional, regional and global level.
( 4) Dieses Übereinkommen ist nicht so auszulegen, als beschränke es das Recht der Vertragsparteien, Maßnahmen zu treffen, die die die menschlichen Gesundheit und die Umwelt strenger schützen als die in dem Übereinkommen fordergten, sofern diese Maßnahmen im Einklang mit dem Übereinkommen und dem Völkerrecht stehen. This Agreement shall not be interpreted as limiting the right of the Contracting Parties to take measures to protect human health and the environment more strictly than those required by the Agreement, provided that such measures are consistent with the Agreement and international law.
In order to implement this Agreement, the Parties shall cooperate in promoting technical assistance for the development of the necessary infrastructure and capacity for chemicals management, taking particular account of the needs of developing countries and countries with economies in transition.
Parties with more advanced chemical control programmes should provide other Parties with technical assistance, including training, in developing their chemical management infrastructure and capacities throughout their lifetime.
The Conference of the Parties shall elaborate and approve as soon as possible procedures and institutional mechanisms for determining non-compliance with the provisions of this Convention and for dealing with Parties in whose case such non-compliance has been established.
( 1) Hiermit wird eine Konferenz der Vertragsparteien eingesetzt. A Conference of the Parties shall be hereby established.
( 2) Die erste Tagung der Konferenz der Vertragsparteien wird vom Exekutivdirektor des UNEP gemeinsam mit dem Generaldirektor der FAO spätestens ein Jahr nach Inkrafttreten dieses Übereinkommens einberufen. The first meeting of the Conference of the Parties shall be convened by the Executive Director of UNEP together with the Director-General of FAO not later than one year after the entry into force of this Agreement.
Thereafter, regular meetings of the Conference of the Parties shall be held at regular intervals as determined by the Conference.
( 3) Extraordinary meetings of the Conference of the Parties shall take place if the Conference considers it necessary or if a Party so requests in writing, provided that this request is supported by at least one third of the Parties.
( 4) Die Konferenz der Vertragsparteien vereinbart und beschließt auf ihrer ersten Tagung einvernehmlich eine Geschäftsordnung und eine Finanzordnung für sich und für alle Nebenorgane sowie Finanzbestimmungen für die Tätigkeit des Sekretariats. The Conference of the Parties, at its first meeting, shall agree and adopt its own rules of procedure and financial regulations for itself and for all subsidiary bodies and financial provisions for the activities of the secretariat.
( 5) Die Konferenz der Vertragsparteien prüft und bewertet laufend die Durchführung dieses Übereinkommens. The Conference of the Parties shall examine and assess on an ongoing basis the implementation of this Agreement.
It shall carry out the functions conferred on it by the Convention by:
( a) in addition to the requirements of paragraph 6 of this Article, it shall use the subsidiary bodies it considers necessary for the implementation of the Agreement;
( b) cooperate, as appropriate, with relevant international organizations and intergovernmental and non-governmental agencies;
( c) consider and take further measures necessary to achieve the objectives of the Convention.
( 6) Die Konferenz der Vertragsparteien setzt auf ihrer ersten Tagung ein als Chemikalienprüfungsausschuss zu bezeichnendes Nebenorgan ein, das die diesem Ausschuss aufgrund des Übereinkommens zugewiesenen Aufgaben wahrnimmt. The Conference of the Parties shall, at its first meeting, establish a subsidiary body to be referred to as the Chemical Testing Committee, which shall perform the functions assigned to that Committee by virtue of the Convention.
( a) the members of the Chemicals Testing Committee shall be appointed by the Conference of the Parties.
The Committee shall be composed of a limited number of specialists in chemicals management designated by governments.
The members of the Committee shall be appointed on the basis of a balanced geographical distribution, including a balanced relationship between developed and developing countries;
( b) the Conference of the Parties shall decide on the mandate, organisation and functioning of the Committee;
( c) the Committee shall make every effort to reach consensus on its recommendations.
When all efforts at consensus have been exhausted and no agreement has been reached, the recommendation shall be adopted as a last resort by a two-thirds majority of the members present and voting.
( 7) Die Vereinten Nationen, ihre Sonderorganisationen und die Internationale Atomenergie-Organisation sowie jeder Staat, der nicht Vertragspartei dieses Übereinkommens ist, können auf den Tagungen der Konferenz der Vertragsparteien als Beobachter vertreten sein. The United Nations, its specialized agencies and the International Atomic Energy Agency, as well as any State not party to this Agreement, may be represented as observers at meetings of the Conference of the Parties.
Other national or international, governmental or non-governmental bodies or bodies which are competent in the matters covered by the Convention and which have notified the Secretariat of their wish to be represented as observers at a meeting of the Conference of the Parties may be admitted, unless at least one third of the Parties present object.
Admission and participation of observers shall be subject to the rules of procedure adopted by the Conference of the Parties.
( 1) Hiermit wird ein Sekretariat eingerichtet. A secretariat shall be hereby established.
( 2) Das Sekretariat hat folgende Aufgaben: The secretariat shall have the following functions:
( a) arrange meetings of the Conference of the Parties and its subsidiary bodies and provide the necessary services;
( b) assist, upon request, the Contracting Parties, in particular developing countries and parties with economies in transition, in the implementation of this Agreement;
( c) provide for the necessary coordination with the secretariats of other relevant international bodies;
( d) conclude, under the general supervision of the Conference of the Parties, the administrative and contractual arrangements necessary for the effective performance of its functions;
( e) perform the other secretarial functions provided for in this Agreement and any other functions determined by the Conference of the Parties.
( 3) Die SekretariatsAufgaben im Rahmen dieses Übereinkommens werden vom Exekutivdirektor des UNEP und vom Generaldirektor der FAO vorbehaltlich der zwischen ihnen vereinbarten und von der Konferenz der Vertragsparteien genehmigten Regelungen gemeinsam wahrgenommen. The secretariat functions under this Agreement shall be jointly performed by the Executive Director of UNEP and by the Director-General of FAO, subject to the arrangements agreed between them and approved by the Conference of the Parties.
( 4) Die Konferenz der Vertragsparteien kann mit dreiviertelmehrheit der anwesenden und abstimmenden Vertragsparteien beschließen, eine oder mehrere andere zuständigen internationale Organisationen mit den Sekretariatsaufgaben zu betrusten, wenn sie befindet, daß das Sekretariat nicht wie vorgesehen arbeitet. The Conference of the Parties may, by a three-quarters majority vote of the Parties present and voting, decide to entrust the secretarial duties to one or more other competent international organizations, if it considers that the secretariat is not functioning as foreseen.
( 1) Die Vertragsparteien legen alle zwischen ihnen entstehenden Streitigkeiten über die Auslegung oder Anwendung dieses Übereinkommens durch Verhandlungen oder andere friedliche Mittel ihrer Wahl bei. The Contracting Parties shall settle any dispute arising between them concerning the interpretation or application of this Agreement by negotiation or other peaceful means of their choice.
( 2) Bei der Ratifikation, der Annahme oder der Genehmigung dieses Übereinkommens oder beim Beitritt zu diesem Übereinkommen oder jederzeit danach kann eine Vertragspartei, die keine Organisation der regionalen Wirtschaftsintegration ist, in einer dem Verwahrer vorgelegten Urkunde erklären, daß sie in Bezug auf jede Streitigkeit über die Auslegung oder Anwendung des Übereinkommens eines der folgenden Mittel der Streitbeilegung oder beide gegenüber jeder Vertragspartei, welche dieselbe Verpflichtung übernimmt, als obligatorisch anerkennt: In the event of ratification, acceptance or approval of this Agreement or accession to, or at any time thereafter, a Contracting Party which is not a regional economic integration organisation may declare, in an instrument submitted to the depositary, that, with respect to any dispute concerning the interpretation or application of this Agreement, it recognises as obligatory one of the following means of dispute settlement, or both, with respect to any Contracting Party
( a) arbitration in accordance with a procedure to be decided by the Conference of the Parties as soon as possible in an Annex;
( b) submission of the dispute to the International Court of Justice.
( 3) Eine Vertragspartei, die eine Organisation der regionalen Wirtschaftsintegration ist, kann in Bezug auf ein Schiedsverfahren nach dem in Absatz 2 Buchstabe a) vorgesehenen Verfahren eine Erklärung mit gleicher Wirkung abgeben. A Contracting Party which is a regional economic integration organization may make a declaration having equivalent effect with respect to arbitration under the procedure provided for in paragraph 2 (a) of this Article.
( 4) Eine nach Absatz 2 abgegebene Erklärung bleibt in Kraft, bis sie nach den darin enthaltenen Bedingungen erlischt, oder bis zum Ablauf von drei Monaten nach Hinterlegung einer schriftlichen Rücknahmenotifikation beim Verwahrer. A declaration made in accordance with paragraph 2 of this Article shall remain in force until it ceases to exist in accordance with the conditions contained therein, or until the expiration of three months after the deposit of a notification of written withdrawal with the depositary.
( 5) Das Erlöschen einer Erklärung, eine Rücknahmenotifikation oder eine neue Erklärung berührt nicht die beim Internationalen Gerichtshof oder bei dem Schiedsgericht anpending Verfahren, sofern die Streitparteien nichts anderes vereinbaren. The lapse of a declaration, notification of withdrawal or new declaration shall not affect proceedings pending before the International Court of Justice or the arbitral tribunal, unless the parties to the dispute agree otherwise.
( 6) Haben sich die Streitparteien nicht auf ein Verfahren oder auf dasselbe Verfahren der Streitbeilegung gemäß Absatz 2 vereinbart und können sie ihre Streitigkeit nicht binnen zwölf Monaten, nachdem eine Vertragspartei einer anderen notifiziert hat, daß eine Streitigkeit zwischen ihnen besteht, beilegen, so wird der Streitfall auf Ersuchen einer der Streitparteien einer Vergleichskommission vorgelegt. If the parties to the dispute have not agreed on a procedure or on the same dispute settlement procedure as referred to in paragraph 2 of this Article and have not been able to settle their dispute within twelve months of one Contracting Party notifying another that a dispute exists between them, the dispute shall, at the request of one of the parties to the dispute, be referred to a conciliation commission.
The Comparative Commission shall draw up a report with recommendations.
Further procedures relating to the Settlement Commission shall be set out in an Annex to be adopted by the Conference of the Parties not later than the second session of the Conference.
( 1) Änderungen dieses Übereinkommens können von jeder Vertragspartei vorgeschlagen werden. Amendments to this Convention may be proposed by any Contracting Party.
( 2) Änderungen dieses Übereinkommens werden auf einer Tagung der Konferenz der Vertragsparteien beschlossen. Amendments to this Convention shall be adopted at a meeting of the Conference of the Parties.
The text of a proposed amendment shall be communicated to the Contracting Parties by the Secretariat at least six months before the meeting at which the amendment is proposed for decision.
The Secretariat shall also communicate proposed amendments to the signatories to the Convention and to the depositary for information.
( 3) Die Vertragsparteien bemühen sich nach Kräften um eine einvernehmliche Einigung über eine vorgeschlagene Änderung des Übereinkommens. The Contracting Parties shall endeavour to the best of their abilities to reach an amicable agreement on a proposed amendment to the Convention.
When all efforts at consensus have been exhausted and no agreement has been reached, the amendment shall, as a last resort, be adopted by a three-quarters majority of the Parties present and voting at the meeting.
( 4) Die Änderung wird vom Verwahrer allen Vertragsparteien zur Ratifikation, Annahme oder Genehmigung übermittelt. The amendment shall be communicated by the depositary to all Contracting Parties for ratification, acceptance or approval.
( 5) Die Ratifikation, Annahme oder Genehmigung einer Änderung wird dem Verwahrer schriftlich notifiziert. Ratification, acceptance or approval of an amendment shall be notified to the depositary in writing.
An amendment adopted in accordance with paragraph 3 of this Article shall enter into force for the Contracting Parties which have accepted it on the 90th day following the deposit of instruments of ratification, acceptance or approval by at least three quarters of the Contracting Parties.
Thereafter, the amendment shall enter into force for any other Contracting Party on the 90th day following the date on which that Contracting Party deposits its instrument of ratification, acceptance or approval of the amendment.
( 1) Die Anlagen dieses Übereinkommens sind Bestandteil des Übereinkommens; sofern nicht ausdrücklich etwas anderes vorgesehen ist, stellt eine Bezugnahme auf dieses Übereinkommen Simultaneously eine Bezugnahme auf die Anlagen dar. The Annexes to this Agreement shall form an integral part of the Agreement, unless expressly provided otherwise, and at the same time constitutes a reference to the Annexes.
( 2) Die Anhänge beschränken sich auf verfahrensmäßige, wissenschaftliche, technische und Verwaltungsmäßige Angelegenheiten. The Annexes shall be limited to procedural, scientific, technical and administrative matters.
( 3) Folgendes Verfahren findet auf den Vorschlag weiterer Anhänge dieses Übereinkommens, die Beschlussfassung darüber und das Inkrafttreten derselben Anwendung: The following procedure shall apply to the proposal of further Annexes to this Agreement, the decision making thereon and the entry into force thereof:
( a) further Annexes shall be proposed and adopted in accordance with the procedure laid down in Article 21 (1), (2) and (3);
( b) a Contracting Party which is unable to accept another Annex shall notify the Depositary in writing within one year of the date on which the Depositary has notified that the further Annex has been decided.
The depositary shall promptly notify all Contracting Parties of the receipt of any such notification.
A Contracting Party may withdraw such notification at any time and the Annex shall subsequently enter into force for that Contracting Party subject to subparagraph (c) of this Article;
( c) at the end of one year from the date on which the depositary notifies that a further Annex has been decided, the latter shall enter into force for all Contracting Parties which have not submitted a notification in accordance with subparagraph (b) of this Article.
( 4) Mit Ausnahme der Anlage III unterliegen der Vorschlag von Änderungen von Anlagen dieses Übereinkommens, die Beschlussfassung darüber und das Inkrafttreten derselben demselben Verfahren wie der Vorschlag weiterer Anlagen des Übereinkommens, die Beschlussfassung darüber und das Inkrafttreten derselben. With the exception of Annex III, the proposal for amendments to Annexes to this Agreement, the decision making thereto and the entry into force thereof shall be subject to the same procedure as the proposal for further Annexes to this Agreement, the decision making thereof and the entry into force thereof.
( 5) Folgendes Verfahren findet beim Vorschlag von Änderungen der Anlage III, bei der Beschlussfassung darüber und beim Inkrafttreten derselben Anwendung: The following procedure shall apply to the proposal for amendments to Annex III, to the decision making thereon and to the entry into force thereof:
( a) Amendments to Annex III shall be proposed and adopted in accordance with the procedure laid down in Articles 5 to 9 and Article 21 (2);
( b) the decision of the Conference of the Parties shall be taken by consensus;
( c) a decision amending Annex III shall be communicated without delay by the depositary to the Contracting Parties.
The amendment shall enter into force for all Contracting Parties on a date to be fixed in the Decision.
( 6) Bezog sich eine weitere Anlage oder eine Änderung einer Anlage auf eine Änderung dieses Übereinkommens, so tritt die weitere Anlage oder die geänderte Anlage erst in Kraft, wenn die Änderung des Übereinkommens in Kraft tritt. If a further Annex or an amendment to an Annex relates to an amendment to this Agreement, the further Annex or the amended Annex shall not enter into force until the amendment to the Agreement enters into force.
( 1) Vorbehaltlich des Absatzes 2 hat jede Vertragspartei dieses Übereinkommens eine Stimme. Subject to paragraph 2 of this Article, each Contracting Party to this Agreement shall have one vote.
( 2) Eine Organisation der regionalen Wirtschaftsintegration übt in Angelegenheiten ihrer Zuständigkeit ihr Stimmrecht mit der Anzahl von Stimmen aus, die der Anzahl ihrer Mitgliedstaaten entspricht, die Vertragsparteien dieses Übereinkommens sind. In matters within its competence, a regional economic integration organization shall exercise its right to vote with the number of votes equal to the number of its Member States which are Contracting Parties to this Agreement.
Such an organisation shall not exercise its right to vote when one of its Member States exercises its right to vote and vice versa.
( 3) Im Sinne dieses Übereinkommens bedeutet <unk> anwesende und abstimmende Vertragsparteien <unk> die anwesenden Vertragsparteien, die eine Ja- oder eine Neinstimme abgeben. For the purposes of this Convention, <unk> present and voting Contracting Parties
This Agreement shall be open for signature by all States and all regional economic integration organisations at Rotterdam on 11 September 1998 and at United Nations Headquarters in New York from 12 September 1998 to 10 September 1999.
( 1) Dieses Übereinkommen bedarf der Ratifikation, Annahme oder Genehmigung durch Staaten und durch Organisationen der regionalen Wirtschaftsintegration. This Agreement shall be subject to ratification, acceptance or approval by States and regional economic integration organisations.
It shall be open to accession by States and regional economic integration organisations from the date on which it ceases to be open for signature.
Instruments of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession shall be deposited with the depositary.
( 2) Jede Organisation der regionalen Wirtschaftsintegration, die Vertragspartei dieses Übereinkommens wird, ohne daß einer ihrer Mitgliedstaaten Vertragspartei ist, ist durch alle Verpflichtungen aus dem Übereinkommen gebunden. Any regional economic integration organisation which becomes a Contracting Party to this Agreement, without one of its Member States being a Contracting Party, shall be bound by any obligations under this Agreement.
If one or more Member States of such an organisation are Contracting Parties to the Convention, the Agency and its Member States shall decide on their respective responsibilities in respect of the fulfilment of their obligations under the Convention.
In such cases, the Agency and the Member States shall not be entitled to exercise rights under the Convention at the same time.
( 3) In ihrer Ratifikations-, Annahme-, Genehmigungs- oder Beitrittsurkunde gibt eine Organisation der regionalen Wirtschaftsintegration an, in dem Umfang sie in Bezug auf die durch das Übereinkommen erfassten Angelegenheiten zuständig ist. In its instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession, an organization of regional economic integration shall specify to what extent it is competent with respect to matters covered by the Convention.
Any such organisation shall also notify the depositary of any substantial change in the scope of its competences, which in turn shall inform the Contracting Parties.
( 1) Dieses Übereinkommen tritt am neunzigsten Tag nach dem Zeitpunkt der Hinterlegung der fünfzigsten Ratifikations-, Annahme-, Genehmigungs- oder Beitrittsurkunde in Kraft. This Convention shall enter into force on the 90th day following the date of deposit of the fiftieth instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession.
( 2) Für jeden Staat oder für jede Organisation der regionalen Wirtschaftsintegration, die nach Hinterlegung der fünfzigsten Ratifikations-, Annahme-, Genehmigungs- oder Beitrittsurkunde das Übereinkommen ratifiziert, annimmt, genehmigt oder ihm beitritt, tritt das Übereinkommen am neunzigsten Tag nach dem Zeitpunkt der Hinterlegung der Ratifikations-, Annahme-, Genehmigungs- oder Beitrittsurkunde durch den betreffenden Staat oder die betreffende Organisation der regionalen Wirtschaftsintegration in Kraft. For any State or regional economic integration organisation which ratifies, accepts, approves or accedes to the Agreement after the deposit of its fiftieth instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession, the Agreement shall enter into force on the 90th day following the deposit of the instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession by that State or regional economic integration organisation.
( 3) Für die Zwecke der Absätze 1 und 2 zählt eine von einer Organisation der regionalen Wirtschaftsintegration hinterlegte Urkunde nicht als zusätzliche Urkunde zu den von den Mitgliedstaaten der Organisation hintergelegten Urkunden. For the purposes of paragraphs 1 and 2 of this Article, an instrument deposited by a regional economic integration organisation shall not be considered as an additional instrument to those deposited by the Member States of the organisation.
No reservations may be made with respect to this Agreement.
( 1) Eine Vertragspartei kann jederzeit nach Ablauf von drei Jahren nach dem Zeitpunkt, zu dem dieses Übereinkommen für sie in Kraft getreten ist, durch eine an den Verwahrer gerichtete schriftliche Notifikation von dem Übereinkommen zurücktreten. A Contracting Party may withdraw from the Agreement at any time after three years from the date on which this Agreement has entered into force for it by notifying the depositary in writing.
( 2) Der Rücktritt wird nach Ablauf eines Jahres nach dem Eingang der Notifikation beim Verwahrer oder zu einem gegebenenfalls in der Rücktrittsnotifikation genannten späteren Zeitpunkt wirksam. Withdrawal shall take effect after one year from the date of receipt of such notification by the depositary or at a later date as may be specified in the notification of withdrawal.
The Secretary-General of the United Nations shall be the depositary of this Convention.
The original of this Agreement, of which the Arabic, Chinese, English, French, Russian and Spanish texts are equally authentic, shall be deposited with the Secretary-General of the United Nations.
between the European Atomic Energy Community (Euratom) and non-member States of the European Union on participation in arrangements within the Community for the rapid exchange of information in a radiological emergency (Ecurie)
Considering that Council Decision 87 / 600 / Euratom establishes a framework in the form of the Ecurian Arrangements for the rapid exchange of information in a radiological emergency;
the effectiveness of the Ecurian arrangements shall be improved by the participation of third countries, in particular neighbouring countries of the European Union;
Bulgaria, Cyprus, the Czech Republic, Estonia, Hungary, Latvia, Lithuania, Malta, Poland, Romania, the Slovak Republic, Slovenia, Switzerland and Turkey, hereinafter referred to as the participating countries, should be invited to accede to these Agreements;
The Agreement shall apply to notification and exchange of information in all cases where one of the participating countries or a Member State of Euratom decides to take comprehensive measures to protect the population in the event of a radiological emergency, namely:
( a) following an accident on their respective territories, in the following facilities or in the framework of the following activities:
- the transport and storage of nuclear fuel or radioactive waste;
- the production, use, storage, disposal and transport of radioisotopes for agricultural, industrial, medical and related scientific or research purposes;
- the use of radioisotopes for generating electricity in space objects,
( b) after other accidents which have or may have led to a significant release of radioactive substances;
( c) after detection, on or outside their respective territories, of anomalous levels of radioactivity likely to be harmful to the health of the respective populations.
Exchange of information in the case of the measures referred to in Article 1 within the territory of a participating country or in a Euratom Member State
( 1) Beschließt ein teilnehmendes Land, Maßnahmen nach Artikel 1 zu ergreifen, so übermittelt dieses Land der Kommission der Europäischen Gemeinschaften (hereinafter referred to as <unk> the Commission
The Commission shall promptly inform the Member States of Euratom and the other participating countries.
( 2) Hat ein Mitgliedstaat von Euratom beschlossen, derartige Maßnahmen zu ergreifen und die Kommission davon unterrichtet, so unterrichtet die Kommission unverzüglich die teilnehmenden Länder. Where a Member State of Euratom has decided to take such measures and has informed the Commission thereof, the Commission shall promptly inform the participating countries.
The information to be supplied in accordance with paragraph 2 above shall, as far as possible and indicated, include:
( a) the nature, timing and location of the event and the installation or activity concerned;
( b) information on the suspected or identified cause of the accident and on the likely development of the accident with respect to the release of radioactive substances;
( c) the general characteristics of the radioactive substances released, including species, probable physical and chemical form, quantity, composition and effective level of such releases;
( d) information on the existing and anticipated meteorological and hydrological conditions necessary for predicting the spread of the released radioactive substances;
( e) the results of environmental monitoring;
( f) the results of measurements of foodstuffs, feedingstuffs and drinking water;
( g) information on the protective measures taken or planned;
( h) information on measures taken or planned to educate the public;
( i) information on the likely behaviour of the radioactive substances released over time.
This information shall be supplemented at appropriate intervals by further relevant information, in particular information on the further development of the emergency situation and its likely or actual termination.
( 1) Nach Eingang der in Artikel 2 und 3 genannten Informationen müssen die Kommission unter Berücksichtigung der von den Mitgliedstaaten von Euratom eingegangenen Informationen After receipt of the information referred to in Articles 2 and 3, the Commission shall, taking into account the information received from the Member States of Euratom,:
( a) promptly inform the participating countries of the measures taken and recommendations made after such information has been received;
( b) inform the participating countries, at appropriate intervals, of radioactivity levels in foodstuffs, feedingstuffs, drinking water and the environment measured by the monitoring facilities of the Euratom Member States.
( 2) Nach Eingang der in Artikel 2 und 3 oben erwähnten Informationen müssen die teilnehmenden Länder Upon receipt of the information referred to in Articles 2 and 3 above, the participating countries shall:
( a) promptly inform the Commission of the measures taken and recommendations made after such information has been received;
( b) inform the Commission at appropriate intervals of radioactivity levels measured by its monitoring facilities in foodstuffs, feedingstuffs, drinking water and the environment.
Participating countries shall not be obliged to provide the European Commission with information which would prejudice national security, and the Commission shall not provide any information to participating countries provided by a Member State of Euratom or by a Contracting Party if such information has been reported as confidential.
( 1) Die teilnehmenden Länder setzen die bestehenden detaillierten Ecurie-Modalitäten für den Informationsaustausch gemäß Artikel 2, 3 und 4 binnen dreier Monate nach Unterzeichnung dieses Abkommens um. The participating countries shall implement the existing detailed modalities for the exchange of information provided for in Articles 2, 3 and 4 within three months of the date of signature of this Agreement.
( 2) danach sind die detaillierten Modalitäten für den Informationsaustausch nach Artikel 2, 3 und 4 in einem gemeinsamen Abkommen zwischen den teilnehmenden Ländern, der Kommission und den Mitgliedstaaten von Euratom festzulegen und in regelmäßigen Abständen zu überprüfen. The detailed modalities for the exchange of information referred to in Article 2, 3 and 4 shall thereafter be laid down in a joint agreement between the participating countries, the Commission and the Member States of Euratom and reviewed at regular intervals.
Each Contracting Party shall bear the costs of implementing these Arrangements.
( 1) Die teilnehmenden Länder nennen der Kommission die zuständigen Behörde und die zur Weiterleitung und Entgegennahme der Informationen nach Artikel 2, 3 und 4 benannte Kontaktstelle sowie ihre Kontaktinformation. Die Kommission meldet den teilnehmenden Länder, welche ihrer departungen die zuständigen Stelle oder Kontaktstelle ist. The participating countries shall inform the Commission of the competent authority and the contact point designated for forwarding and receiving information pursuant to Articles 2, 3 and 4, and of their contact information.
( 2) Die Kontaktstellen in den teilnehmenden Länder und die zuständigen Abteilung der Kommission müssen jederzeit erreichen sein. The contact points in the participating countries and the competent department of the Commission shall be reachable at any time.
( 1) Die teilnehmenden Länder werden zu den Sitzungen der von der Kommission für die Verwaltung der Ecurie-Vereinbarungen eingesetzten Gruppe eingeladen. Participating countries shall be invited to attend meetings of the Group established by the Commission for the Management of the Ecurian Arrangements.
( 2) Diese Gruppe kann beschließen, Vertreter der teilnehmenden Länder zu den Sitzungen der eingesetzten Arbeitsgruppen einzuladen. This Group may decide to invite representatives of the participating countries to the meetings of the working parties set up.
( 3) Die Vertreter der teilnehmenden Länder haben Beobachterstatus; sämtliche hierbei anfallenden Kosten werden von den jeweiligen nationalen Behörden getragen. The representatives of the participating countries shall have observer status and all costs incurred shall be borne by the respective national authorities.
Ecurian arrangements and other relevant international agreements
This Agreement shall not affect the rights and obligations of the participating countries and of the European Atomic Energy Community under any bilateral or multilateral agreement or agreement currently in force or yet to be concluded in the fields covered by this Agreement which are consistent with its objective.
( 1) Nach Unterzeichnung dieses Abkommens durch Euratom können die Republik Bulgaria, die Republik Zypern, die Czech Republik, die Republik Estonia, die Republik Ungarn, die Republik Lettland, die Republik Lithuauen, die Republik Malta, die Republik Polen, Republik Romania, die Slovakkische Republik, die Republik Slovenia, die Schweizerische Eidgenossenschaft und die Republik Türkei dieses Abkommen ratifizieren. After signature of this Agreement by Euratom, the Republic of Bulgaria, the Republic of Cyprus, the Czech Republic, the Republic of Estonia, the Republic of Hungary, the Republic of Latvia, the Republic of Lithuania, the Republic of Malta, the Republic of Poland, the Republic of Romania, the Slovak Republic, the Republic of Slovenia, the Swiss Confederation and the Republic of Turkey may ratify this Agreement.
To this end, Euratom shall send certified copies of the Agreement to those countries for signature.
Euratom may invite other countries to accede to this Agreement.
( 2) Dieses Abkommen wird bei der Kommission hinterlegt. This Agreement shall be deposited with the Commission.
( 3) Dieses Abkommen tritt drei Monate nach Beitritt von mindestens einem der oben aufgeführten Länder in Kraft. This Agreement shall enter into force three months after the accession of at least one of the countries listed above.
For each country acceding to this Agreement after its entry into force, the Agreement shall enter into force three months later.
( 4) Jedes beitretende Land unterrichtet die Kommission über den Abschluss der internen Verfahren bezüglich des Abschlusses dieses Abkommens. Each acceding country shall inform the Commission of the completion of internal procedures relating to the conclusion of this Agreement.
The Commission shall inform other Parties to this Agreement of the accession of any new Party, including the date of entry into force of the Agreement for that Party.
( 5) Jedes beitretende Land nimmt provisorisch als Mitglied der Ecurie-Vereinbarungen ab dem Datum teil, an dem die Kommission ein beglaubigtes Copemplar dieses ordnungsgemäß durch die mit der erforderlichen Vollmacht ausgestattete nationale Behörde unterzeichneten Abkommens sowie die für die volle Umsetzung nach Artikel 7 erforderliche Kontaktinformation erhalten hat. Each acceding country shall participate provisionally as a member of the Ecurian Arrangements from the date on which the Commission has received a certified copy of this Agreement duly signed by the national authority empowered by the requisite authority and the contact information required for its full implementation under Article 7.
( 1) Beschließt eine Vertragspartei dieses Abkommen zu kündigen, so ist dies den anderen Vertragsparteien schriftlich zu melden. If a Contracting Party decides to terminate this Agreement, it shall notify the other Contracting Parties in writing.
After the expiry of a period of three months from the date of notification, this Agreement shall cease to have legal effect between the denouncing Contracting Party and the other Contracting Parties to this Agreement.
The date of denunciation shall be the date of notification to the Commission.
The Commission shall inform the other Contracting Parties to this Agreement of the relevant date.
( 2) Nach Beitritt eines teilnehmenden Landes zur Europäischen Union gilt die Entscheidung 87 / 600/ Euratom des Rates, und dieses Abkommen verlieren die unmittelbare individuelle Rechtswirkung für dieses Land. After the accession of a participating country to the European Union, Decision 87 / 600 / Euratom of the Council shall apply, and this Agreement shall lose its immediate individual legal effect for that country.
( 3) Dieses Abkommen erlischt, falls Euratom beschließt, dieses Abkommen gemäß den Bestimmungen in Absatz 1 zu kündigen. This Agreement shall lapse if Euratom decides to terminate this Agreement in accordance with the provisions of paragraph 1.
This Declaration, in the form of an Exchange of Letters between Euratom and Switzerland on 21 June 1995 (OJ L 183, 9.9.1995, p.
4) Agreement shall be repealed with effect from the date of entry into force of this Agreement for Switzerland after its accession.
in the form of an exchange of letters between the European Community and the Republic of Croatia on the ecopoint system applicable as from 1 January 2003 to transit traffic of the Republic of Croatia through Austria
I have the honour to inform you that following negotiations between the Delegation of the Republic of Croatia and the Delegation of the European Community, in accordance with the provisions of Article 2 (2) (b) of Protocol 6 to the Interim Agreement between the European Community and the Republic of Croatia, the following has been agreed:
1. Ecopoints (transit rights) for Croatian lorries in transit through Austria for 2003: 171904 Ecopoints.
Additional ecopoints for Croatian users of the <unk> Rolling Road <unk> (RoLa) (up to a maximum of 40% of the total ecopoints for 2003): 68762 ecopoints.
Ecopoints for users of RoLa shall be allocated to the Croatian authorities in such a way as to award ecopoints for two road trips on the RoLa for each round trip.
The Austrian combined transport companies shall notify the Ministry of Maritime, Transport and Communications of the Republic of Croatia on a monthly basis of the number of Croatian users of combined transport in transit through Austria.
Transit journeys carried out under the conditions set out in Annex A or on the basis of CBMT authorisation shall be excluded from the ecopoint system.
2. Der driver eines kroatischen Lastkraftwagens hat auf Österreichischem Staatsgebiet folgendes mitzführen und den Aufsichtsbehörden auf Verlangen zur Überprüfung vorzulegen, entweder: The driver of a Croatian lorry shall carry the following items with him on Austrian territory and, upon request, submit them for verification to the supervisory authorities, either:
( a) a duly completed standard form or an Austrian certificate confirming payment of ecopoints for the journey in question (see Annex B), hereinafter referred to as the <unk> eco map <unk>; or
( b) an electronic device attached to the vehicle enabling the automatic debiting of ecopoints, hereinafter referred to as the <unk> ecotag <unk>; or
( c) appropriate documentation proving that the voyage is an ecopoint free transit trip in accordance with Annex A or with a CBMT permit; or
( d) appropriate documentation proving that the journey is not a transit and that the environmental data carrier, where present on the vehicle, has been duly adjusted.
The competent Austrian authorities shall issue the eco card in return for payment of the costs of the production and distribution of eco points and eco cards.
3. Die Umweltdatenträger werden nach den allgemeinen technischen Spezifikationen in Anhang C. hergestellt, programmiert und angebracht. Das ministerium für Seefahrt, Verkehr und Kommunikation der Republik Croatia ist befugt, die Umweltdatenträger zu genehmigen, zu programmierung und anzubringen. Environmental data carriers shall be prepared, programmed and attached in accordance with the general technical specifications set out in Annex C. The Ministry of Navigation, Transport and Communication of the Republic of Croatia shall be empowered to approve, programme and attach the environmental data carriers.
The environmental data carrier shall contain information on the country of origin and NOx emissions of the vehicle, in accordance with the indications in the COP-Bescheinigung (Conformity of Production), and on the conformity of current production in accordance with paragraph 4.
The environmental data carrier shall be affixed to the windscreen of the vehicle.
Its position is set out in Annex D. It is not transferable.
4. Der fahrer eines am oder nach dem 1. Oktober 1990 zugelassenen kroatischen Lastkraftwagens hat ebenfalls eine COP-Bescheinigung gemäß Anhang E zum Nachweis der NOx-Emissionen dieses Fahrzeugs mit sich zu führen und auf Verlangen vorzuweisen. The driver of a Croatian lorry registered on or after 1 October 1990 shall also carry with him a COP-certificate in accordance with Annex E to prove the NOx emissions of that vehicle and, on request, must provide it.
For heavy goods vehicles registered for the first time before 1 October 1990 or for which no document can be provided, a COP-value of 15,8 g/ kWh shall be used.
5. The Ministry of Navigation, Transport and Communication of the Republic of Croatia is empowered to issue the documents and environmental data carriers referred to in paragraphs 2 to 4.
6. Sofern das Fahrzeug keinen Umweltdatenträger verwendet, werden die erforderlichen Ökoppunkten auf der Ökokarte angebracht und entwertet. Unless the vehicle uses an environmental data carrier, the ecopoints required shall be placed on the ecological map and validated.
The eco card shall be validated as follows:
( a) By stamping the eco card in an eco card stamping machine;
( b) stamping of the eco card by the Austrian border control upon entry into Austria;
( c) by stamping and dating of the ecomap by the national authorities of the road haulage undertaking prior to its entry into Austrian territory;
( d) by stamping of the eco-map by a body carrying out the initial activation of environmental data carriers.
The Austrian border crossing points equipped with an eco-card stamping machine are listed in Annex F.
For statistical purposes, page 1 of the completed eco card shall be collected either by the Austrian authorities or returned by the competent authorities to the Austrian authorities within three months of the end of the journey.
The resulting statistical information shall be used by the Commission for proposals for the distribution of the ecopoint reserve.
Where the vehicle is equipped with an environmental data carrier, a number of ecopoints corresponding to the information on the vehicle <unk> s NOx emissions stored on the environmental data carrier shall be subtracted from the total ecopoints allocated to the Republic of Croatia during an ecopoint transit.
This shall be carried out through an infrastructure provided and operated by the Austrian authorities.
In the case of vehicles carrying environmental data carriers, any bilateral journeys of the environmental data carriers prior to driving on Austrian territory shall be adjusted in such a way as to permit proof that the journey is not a transit one.
If an eco card is used and a tractor is exchanged during a transit journey, the confirmation of payment issued at the time of entry shall remain valid and shall be kept.
If the COP-value of the new tractor exceeds the value indicated on the form, additional ecopoints affixed to a new map shall be invalidated upon departure.
7. Durchgehende trip, die die einmalig Überschreitung der Österreichische Grenze per Bahn - ob im konventionellen Eisenbahnverkehr oder im kombinierten Verkehr - und die Grenzüberschreitung auf der Strasse vor oder nach der Überschreitung per Bahn umfassen, werden nicht als Straßengfreitertransitverkehr durch Österreich, sondern als bilaterale Reisen gewertet. Crossings which include the single crossing of the Austrian border by rail, whether by conventional rail or combined transport, and the crossing by road before or after the crossing by rail shall not be considered as road freight transit through Austria, but as bilateral journeys.
Bilateral journeys shall be transit journeys through Austria using the following railway terminals:
Fürnitz, Villach Süd, Sillian, Innsbruck / Hall, Brennersee, Graz.
8. Die Ökoppunkte sind vom 1. Januar des Jahres, für das sie vergeben wurden, bis zum 31. Januar des folgenden jahres gültig. Ecopoints shall be valid from 1 January of the year for which they were awarded to 31 January of the following year.
9. Violations of this Agreement by the driver of a Croatian lorry or undertaking shall be punished in accordance with the applicable national legislation.
The Commission and the competent Austrian and Croatian authorities shall, within the limits of their competence, assist each other in the investigation and prosecution of such violations and, in particular, shall ensure that ecomaps and environmental data carriers are used and handled correctly.
Checks may be carried out at the discretion of the Member State of the European Community at a location other than the internal frontier, provided that the principle of non-discrimination is not violated.
10. Die Österreichische Aufsichtsbehörden können unter Wahrung des Proznismäigkeitsgrundsatzes geeignete Maßnahmen ergreifen, wenn ein Fahrzeug mit einem Umweltdatenträger ausgestattet ist und mindestens einer der folgenden Sachverhalte vorliegen: The Austrian supervisory authorities may, in accordance with the principle of proportionality, take appropriate measures where a vehicle is equipped with an environmental data carrier and at least one of the following circumstances is present:
( a) repeated violations, either caused by the vehicle or committed by the operator;
( b) there are no longer sufficient ecopoints available for Croatia;
( c) the environmental data medium has been manipulated or exchanged by a Party other than the party authorized under paragraph 3;
( d) Croatia has not allocated sufficient ecopoints to the vehicle for transit;
( e) the vehicle does not have appropriate documentation in accordance with paragraph 2 (c) or (d) to prove that the setting up of the environmental data carrier after which the voyage in question is not considered as a transit voyage on Austrian territory is permissible;
( f) the environmental data medium described in Annex C is not equipped with sufficient ecopoints for transit.
The Austrian supervisory authorities may, in accordance with the principle of proportionality, take appropriate measures where a vehicle is not equipped with an environmental data carrier and at least one of the following facts is present:
( a) no ecomap shall be submitted to the supervisory authorities in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement;
( b) submit an ecomap which is incomplete or incorrect or on which the ecopoints are not correctly affixed;
( c) the vehicle does not have the relevant documentation to prove that it does not need ecopoints; or
( d) the eco card has not been validated in accordance with the procedure referred to in paragraph 6.
11. Die gedruckten Ökoppunkte, die zum Ansetzen auf den Ökokarten bestimmt sind, werden jährlich vor dem 1. November des Vorjahres zur Verfügung gestellt. Printed ecopoints intended for affixing to eco maps shall be made available annually before 1 November of the previous year.
12. For vehicles registered before 1 October 1990 and whose engines have since been replaced, the COP-value of the new engine shall apply.
In this case, the certificate issued by the competent authority shall include a note of engine replacement and specify the new COP value for NOx emissions.
13. Eine Transitfahrt ist von der Bezahlung mit Ökopunkten ausgenommen, wenn die folgenden drei Bedingungen zuttreffen: A transit journey shall be exempt from payment with ecopoints if the following three conditions apply:
( a) the sole purpose of the journey is to transport a brand new vehicle or combination of vehicles from the manufacturer to the destination in another State;
( b) no goods shall be transported;
( c) the vehicle or combination of vehicles shall have relevant international registration documents and export plates.
14. Eine Transitfahrt ist von der Bezahlung mit Ökopunkten ausgenommen, wenn es es um die unladen Teilstrecke einer Fahrt handelt, für die gemäß Anhang A keine Ökoppunkten zu entrichten sind und geeignete Unterlagen mitführen werden, die dies voucher. A transit journey shall be exempt from payment with ecopoints if it is the unloaded section of a journey for which no ecopoints are payable in accordance with Annex A and appropriate documentation is carried to prove this.
( a) a waybill, or
( b) a completed eco card without any ecopoints attached to it, or
( c) a completed eco card with ecopoints which may be reused at a later date.
15. Alle Probleme im Zusammenhang mit der Verwaltung dieses Ökopunktesystems werden dem nach Artikel 41 des Interimsabkommens eingesetzten Interimsunterausschuss Verkehr Gemeinschaft/ Republik Croatia vorgelegt; der Ausschuss bewertet die Situation und recommennete Maßnahmen. Any problems relating to the administration of this ecopoint system shall be referred to the Interim Subcommittee on Transport, Community / Republic of Croatia, established pursuant to Article 41 of the Interim Agreement, which shall assess the situation and recommend appropriate measures.
All measures to be taken shall be implemented immediately, in accordance with the principles of proportionality and non-discrimination.
I should be obliged if you would confirm the agreement of your Government to the contents of this letter.
Please accept, Sir, the assurance of my highest consideration.
On behalf of the Council of the European Union
between the European Union and the United States of America on extradition
THE EUROPEAN UNION AND THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA,
DESIRING to further facilitate cooperation between the Member States of the European Union and the United States of America,
DESIRING to combat crime more effectively in order to protect their democratic societies and their common values,
BEARING IN MIND the rights of the individual and the rule of law,
BEARING IN MIND the guarantees embodied in their respective legal systems that provide for the right of extradited persons to a fair trial, including the right to a judgment by an impartial and duly established tribunal,
DESIRING to conclude an agreement on the extradition of criminals,
The Contracting Parties undertake, in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement, to take measures to strengthen cooperation in the framework of extradition relations between the Member States and the United States of America applicable to the extradition of criminals.
1. Der Begriff <unk> Vertragsparteien <unk> bedeutet die Europäische Union und die Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika. <unk> Parties <unk> means the European Union and the United States of America.
2. Der Begriff <unk> Mitgliedstaat <unk> bedeutet einen Mitgliedstaat der Europäischen Union. <unk> Member State
3. Der Begriff <unk> Justizministerium <unk> bedeutet im Falle der Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika das Justizministerium der Vereinigten Staaten; im Falle eines Mitgliedstaats dessen Justizministerium, mit der Ausnahme, daß im Falle eines Mitgliedstaats, in dem die in den Artikeln 3, 5, 6, 8 und 12 beschriebenen Aufgaben vom Generalstaatsanwalt wahrgenommen werden, dieser nach Artikel 19 benannt werden kann, um die Rolle des Justizministerium zu übernehmen, es sei denn, die Vereinigten Staaten und der betreffende Mitgliedstaat vereinbaren, eine andere Stelle zu benennen. <unk> The term <unk> Ministry of Justice
Scope of this Agreement in relation to bilateral extradition treaties with the Member States
( 1) Die Europäische Union entsprechend dem Vertrag über die Europäischen Union und die Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika tragen dafür Sorge, daß die Bestimmungen dieses Abkommens wie folgt Anwendung in Bezug auf bilaterale AuslieferungsVerträge finden, die zwischen den Mitgliedstaaten und den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika zum Zeitpunkt des Inkrafttretens dieses Abkommens in Kraft sind: The European Union, in accordance with the Treaty on the European Union and the United States of America, shall ensure that the provisions of this Agreement apply, as follows, to bilateral extradition treaties concluded between the Member States and the United States of America at the time of entry into force of this Agreement:
( a) Article 4 shall apply in lieu of provisions of bilateral treaties which permit extradition solely for a list of specific offences.
( b) Article 5 shall apply in lieu of provisions of bilateral treaties concerning the transmission, confirmation, legalization or legalization of a request for extradition of the documentation supplied therefor by the requesting State.
( c) Article 6 shall apply in the absence of provisions in bilateral treaties concerning the direct transmission of requests for provisional arrest between the United States Department of Justice and the Department of Justice of the Member State concerned.
( d) Article 7 shall apply in addition to provisions of bilateral treaties concerning the transmission of requests for extradition.
( e) Article 8 shall apply in the absence of provisions of bilateral treaties providing for supplementary information; if the provisions of bilateral treaties do not specify the method of transmission to be applied, paragraph 2 of that Article shall also apply.
( f) Article 9 shall apply, in the absence of provisions of bilateral treaties, for the temporary transfer of persons subject to proceedings in the requested State or who are serving a sentence therein.
( g) Article 10, unless otherwise provided, shall apply in lieu of or in the absence of provisions of bilateral treaties concerning the decision on multiple requests for extradition of the same person.
( h) Article 11 shall apply in the absence of provisions in bilateral treaties concerning the waiver of the formal extradition procedure or simplified extradition procedures.
( i) Article 12 shall apply in the absence of provisions of bilateral contracts for transit; if the provisions of bilateral treaties do not specify the procedure for an unscheduled landing of aircraft, paragraph 3 of that Article shall also apply.
( j) Article 13 may be applied by the requested State in place of, or in the absence of, provisions of bilateral treaties on the death penalty.
( k) Article 14 shall apply in the absence of provisions in bilateral treaties concerning the treatment of confidential information in the framework of a request.
( 2) a) Die Europäische Union trägt entsprechend dem Vertrag über die Europäischen Union dafür Sorge, daß jeder Mitgliedstaat in einer zwischen ihm und den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika erstellten Urkunde anerkennt, daß sein geltender Auslieferungsvertrag mit den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika in der in diesem Artikel dargelegten Weise zur Anwendung gelangt. The European Union shall, in accordance with the Treaty on the European Union, ensure that each Member State, in an instrument drawn up between it and the United States of America, recognises that its current extradition treaty with the United States of America applies in the manner set out in this Article.
( b) The European Union shall, in accordance with the Treaty on European Union, ensure that new Member States which accede to the European Union after the entry into force of this Agreement and which have concluded bilateral extradition treaties with the United States of America take the measures referred to in subparagraph (a) of this Article.
( c) The Contracting Parties shall endeavour to complete the operation described in subparagraph (b) of this Article before the planned accession of a new Member State or as soon as possible thereafter.
The European Union shall inform the United States of America of the date of accession of new Member States.
( 3) Ist der in Absatz 2 Buchstabe b) genannte Vorgang am Tag des Beitrittsts nicht abgeschlossen, so gelten die Bestimmungen dieses Abkommens im Rahmen der Beziehungen zwischen dem betreffenden neuen Mitgliedstaat und den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika ab dem Datum, an dem sie sich einander einander und die Europäische Union davon unterrichtet haben, daß ihre diesbezüglichen internen Verfahren abgeschlossen sind. If the operation referred to in paragraph 2 (b) of this Article has not been completed on the date of accession, the provisions of this Agreement shall apply in the framework of relations between the new Member State concerned and the United States of America from the date on which they have informed each other and the European Union that their respective internal procedures have been completed.
( 1) Ausgeliefert wird wegen Verbrechen, die nach dem Recht des ersuchenden und des ersuchten Staates mit einer Freiheit punishment im Hoechstmaß von mindestens einem Jahr oder einer strengeren Strafe bedroomed sind. Extradition shall be made for offences under the law of the requesting and requested State punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of at least one year or more.
He shall also be extradited for attempting or agreeing to commit, or participating in, an extraditable offence.
Where the request relates to the enforcement of a sentence imposed on a person for a crime capable of extradition, the term of imprisonment to be served shall be not less than four months.
( 2) Wird die Auslieferung für eine auslieferungsfähige Strafat bewilligt, so gilt sie auch für jede andere in dem Ersuchen genannte Strafat, die mit Freiheit fined von einem Jahr oder weniger drohist ist, wenn alle anderen Auslieferungsbedingungen erfuellt sind. If extradition is granted for an extradition capable offence, it shall also apply to any other offence referred to in the request which is threatened with imprisonment of one year or less if all other extradition conditions are met.
( 3) Für die Zwecke dieses Artikels gilt eine Strafat unabhängig davon als auslieferungsfähig, For the purposes of this Article, a criminal offence shall be deemed capable of extradition independently thereof,
( a) whether the law of the requesting State and that of the requested State places it in the same category of crime or describes it in the same terms;
( b) whether it is an offence for which United States federal law requires, solely for the purpose of establishing the jurisdiction of a United States Federal Tribunal, elements of a crime such as the movement of persons or goods between States or the use of mail or other means of conducting trade between States or foreign trade;
( c) whether in charges, taxes, customs, foreign exchange and foreign trade matters the law of the requesting State and that of the requested State provide for the same kind of charges, taxes, customs duties or foreign exchange restrictions or foreign trade restrictions in respect of the same type of goods.
( 4) Was die Strafat außerhalb des Hoheitsgebiets des ersuchenden Staates begangen, so wird die Auslieferung unter den anderen für sie geltenden Bedingungen bewilligt, wenn nach dem Recht des ersuchten Staates eine unter derartigen Umständen außerhalb seiner Hoheitsgebiet begangen ist Strafbar ist. If the offence was committed outside the territory of the requesting State, extradition shall be granted under the other conditions applicable to it, if under the law of the requested State an act committed under such circumstances outside its territory is punishable.
If, under such circumstances, an act committed outside its territory is not a criminal offence under the law of the requested State, it shall be at the discretion of the competent authority of the requested State to grant the extradition, provided that all other conditions of extradition have been fulfilled.
( 1) Auslieferungsersuchen und die dazugehörigen Unterlagen werden auf dem diplomatischen Weg übermittelt, wozu auch die Übermittlung gemäß Artikel 7 gehört. Requests for extradition and related documents shall be communicated by diplomatic means, including transmission pursuant to Article 7.
( 2) Unterlagen, die den Stempel oder das Siegel des Justizministerium oder des für Auswärtige Angelegenheiten zuständigen Ministeriums des ersuchenden Staates tragen, gelten in Auslieferungsverfahren im ersuchten Staat ohne weitere Bestätigung, Beglaubigung oder sonstige Legalisierung. Documents bearing the stamp or seal of the Ministry of Justice or the ministry of the requesting State responsible for foreign affairs shall be considered in extradition proceedings in the requested State without further confirmation, authentication or other legalization.
Requests for provisional arrest may also be communicated directly between the ministries of justice of the requesting State and of the requested State, except through diplomatic channels.
The channels of the International Criminal Police Organisation (Interpol) may also be used for the transmission of such a request.
Submission of documentation following the provisional arrest
( 1) Wird die Person, um deren Austradition ersucht wird, vom ersuchten Staat in vorläufigen Haft hält, so kann der ersuchende Staat seiner Verpflichtung nach Artikel 5 Absatz 1, sein Auslieferungsersuchen und die dazugehörigen Unterlagen auf dem diplomatischen Weg zu übermitteln, dadurch nachkommen, daß er das Ersuchen und die Unterlagen der Embassy des ersuchten Staates im ersuchenden Staat vorlegt. If the requested State holds the person in provisional detention, the requesting State may, in accordance with Article 5 (1), fulfil its obligation to communicate its request for extradition and the relevant documents by diplomatic route by presenting the request and the documents to the requested State <unk> s embassy in the requesting State.
In this case, the date of receipt of the request by the Embassy shall be considered to be the date of receipt by the requested State for the purpose of applying the time limits to be observed in accordance with the extradition treaty in force for the purpose of holding the person in question in custody.
( 2) Kann ein Mitgliedstaat am Tag der Unterzeichnung dieses Abkommens aufgrund der an diesem Tag in seiner innerstaatlichen Rechtsordnung geltenden ständigen Rechtsprechung die in Absatz 1 genannten Maßnahmen nicht treffen, so findet dieser Artikel auf diesen Mitgliedstaat so lange keine Anwendung, bis dieser Mitgliedstaat und die Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika durch diplomatischen Notenwechsel eine andere Vereinbarung treffen. If, on the date of signature of this Agreement, a Member State is unable to meet the measures referred to in paragraph 1 of this Article on the basis of the consistent case law applicable on that date in its domestic legal system, this Article shall not apply to that Member State until that Member State and the United States of America reach another agreement by exchanging diplomatic notes.
( 1) Der ersuchte Staat kann den ersuchenden Staat suchen, binnen einer von ihm gesetzten angemessenen Frist ergänzende Angaben vorzulegen, wenn seines Erachtens die zur Begründung des Auslieferungsersuchens zur Verfügung gestellten Unterlagen die Anforderungen des geltenden Auslieferungsvertrags nicht sufficiend erfuellen. The requested State may ask the requesting State to provide supplementary information within a reasonable period set by it if, in its opinion, the documents made available to justify the request for extradition do not satisfy sufficiently the requirements of the extradition treaty in force.
( 2) Solche ergänzenden Angaben können unmittelbar zwischen den Justizministen der betreffenden Staaten erbeten und übermittelt werden. Such supplementary information may be requested and communicated directly between the Ministries of Justice of the States concerned.
( 1) Wird ein Austradition ersuchen im Falle einer Person bewilligt, gegen die im ersuchten Staat ein Verfahren anhäng ist oder die dort eine Strafverbüßt, so kann der ersuchte Staat die betreffende Person an den ersuchenden Staat zum Zwecke der Strafverfolgung vorübergehend überstellen. If a request for extradition is granted in the case of a person against whom proceedings are pending in the requested State or who is serving a sentence there, the requested State may temporarily transfer that person to the requesting State for the purpose of criminal prosecution.
( 2) Die so überstellte Person wird im ersuchenden Staat in Haft hält und nach Abschluss des Verfahrens gegen sie unter Bedingungen, die vom ersuchenden und ersuchten Staat einvernehmlich festzulegen sind, an den ersuchten Staat zurücküberstellt. The person so transferred shall be held in custody in the requesting State and shall be returned to the requested State upon completion of the proceedings against him, subject to conditions to be agreed by the requesting and requesting State.
The period of detention in the territory of the requesting State in the course of prosecution in that State may be subtracted from the period of detention to be served in the requested State.
Requests for extradition and surrender from several States
( 1) Erhält der ersuchte Staat vom ersuchenden Staat und von einem anderen Staat oder anderen Staaten Ersuchen um Auslieferung der selben Person entweder wegen derselben Strafat oder wegen verschiedener Verbrechen, so entscheidet die führende Behörde des ersuchten Staates, dem Staat die Person gegebenenfalls überstellt wird. If the requested State receives a request from the requesting State and from another State or other States for the extradition of the same person, either for the same offence or for various offences, the executing authority of the requested State shall decide which State the person may be transferred.
( 2) Erhält ein ersuchter Mitgliedstaat ein Austradition ersuchen der Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika und ein Übergabeersuchen nach dem Europäischen Warrant for the Same Person entweder wegen derselben Strafat oder wegen verschiedener Verbrechen, so entscheidet die zuständigen Behörde des ersuchten Mitgliedstaats, dem Staat die Person gegebenenfalls übertragen wird. If a requested Member State receives a request for extradition from the United States of America and a request for surrender pursuant to the European Arrest Warrant for the Same Person, either for the same offence or for different offences, the competent authority of the requested Member State shall decide which State may hand over the person.
For this purpose, the competent authority shall be the executive authority of the requested Member State when, under the bilateral extradition treaty in force between the United States and the Member State, decisions on competing requests are taken by that authority; if this is not governed by the bilateral extradition treaty, the competent authority shall be designated by the Member State concerned in accordance with Article 19.
( 3) Bei seiner Entscheidung nach den Absätzen 1 und 2 berücksichtigt der ersuchte Staat alle berechgeblichen Umstände, einschließlich unter anderem solcher, die bereits im geltenden Auslieferungsvertrag genannt sind, und in Ermangelung solcher Angaben der folgenden Umstände: In making its decision in accordance with paragraphs 1 and 2 of this Article, the requested State shall take into account all relevant circumstances, including, inter alia, those already mentioned in the applicable extradition treaty, and in the absence of such information, the following circumstances:
( a) the contractual basis for the requests;
( b) the places where the offences were committed;
( c) the respective interests of the requesting States;
( d) the seriousness of the offences;
( e) the nationality of the victim;
( f) the possibility of further delivery between the requesting States;
( g) the chronological sequence of receipt of the requests from the requesting States.
If the person to be extradited consents to his surrender to the requesting State, the requested State may transfer that person as quickly as possible without further procedures, in accordance with the principles and procedures of its legal system.
The consent of the person to be extradited may include the waiver of the protection of the principle of speciality.
( 1) Ein Mitgliedstaat kann gestatten, daß eine Person, die von einem Drittstaat an die Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika oder von den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika an einen Drittstaat überstellt wird, durch sein Hoheitsgebiet befördert wird. A Member State may allow a person transferred from a third State to the United States of America or from the United States of America to a third State to be transported through its territory.
The United States of America may authorize the carriage through its territory of a person transferred from a third State to a Member State or from a Member State to a third State.
( 2) Ein Durchlieferungsersuchen wird auf diplomatischem Weg oder unmittelbar zwischen dem Justizministerium der Vereinigten Staaten und dem Justizministerium des betreffenden Mitgliedstaats gestellt. A request for transit shall be made by diplomatic route or directly between the Ministry of Justice of the United States and the Ministry of Justice of the Member State concerned.
The channels of Interpol may also be used for the transmission of such a request.
The request shall contain a description of the person to be surrendered and a brief summary of the facts of the case.
A person to be extradited shall be held in custody for the duration of the transit.
( 3) Eine Genehmigung ist nicht erforderlich, wenn der Luftweg benutzt wird und keine Zwischenlandung im Hoheitsgebiet des Durchlieferungsstaates vorgesehen ist. No authorisation shall be required if the air route is used and no stopover is provided in the territory of the transit State.
In the event of an unscheduled landing, the State in which it is made may request that a request for transit be made in accordance with paragraph 2 of this Article.
All necessary measures shall be taken to prevent the person in question from fleeing until the transit has been completed, provided that the request for transit is received within 96 hours of the unscheduled landing.
If the offence for which extradition is sought is threatened with the death penalty under the laws of the requesting State, but not under the laws of the requested State, the requested State may grant extradition on condition that the requested person is not subject to the death penalty or, if such a condition cannot be satisfied by the requesting State for procedural reasons, on condition that the death penalty, if imposed, is not enforced.
If the requesting State accepts extradition under the conditions set out in this Article, it shall fulfil those conditions.
If the requesting State does not accept the conditions, the request for extradition may be refused.
If the requesting State considers, in response to its request for extradition, the provision of particularly sensitive information, it may seek information from the requested State as to the extent to which that information can be protected by the requested State.
If the requested State is unable to protect the information in the manner desired by the requesting State, the requesting State shall decide whether the information is nevertheless provided.
The Contracting Parties shall consult each other to the appropriate extent for the purpose of making the most effective use of this Agreement and for the purpose of facilitating the settlement of any disputes concerning the interpretation and application of this Agreement.
( 1) Dieses Abkommen gilt für vor oder nach seinem Inkrafttreten begangen Straftaten. This Agreement shall apply to crimes committed before or after its entry into force.
( 2) Dieses Abkommen gilt für nach seinem Inkrafttreten gestellte Auslieferungsersuchen. This Agreement shall apply to requests for extradition made after its entry into force.
However, Articles 4 and 9 shall also apply to requests pending in a requested State at the time of the entry into force of this Agreement.
( 1) Dieses Abkommen schließt nicht aus, daß der ersuchte Staat Gründe für eine Ablehnung aufgrund eines Umstandes geltend macht, der durch dieses Abkommen nicht geregelt ist, sich jedoch aus einem geltenden bilateralen Auslieferungsvertrag zwischen einem Mitgliedstaat und den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika ergibt. This Agreement does not preclude the requested State from making a claim for refusal on the basis of a circumstance not covered by this Agreement but arising out of a valid bilateral extradition treaty between a Member State and the United States of America.
( 2) In den Fällen, in denen die Verfassungsgrundsätze des ersuchten Staates oder die für diesen verbindlichen endgülterlichen Entscheidungen ein Hindernis für die Erfuellung seiner Auslieferungspflicht darstellen können und dieses Abkommen oder der geltende bilaterale Vertrag keine Regelung dieser Angelegenheit vorsehen, konsultieren sich der ersuchte und der ersuchende Staat. In cases where the constitutional principles of the requested State or the final binding decisions of that State may constitute an obstacle to the fulfilment of its extradition obligation and where this Agreement or the bilateral Treaty in force do not provide for any regulation of this matter, the requested State and the requesting State shall consult each other.
This Agreement shall not preclude the conclusion, after its entry into force, of bilateral agreements between a Member State and the United States of America in conformity with this Agreement.
The European Union shall notify the United States of America of any designation made pursuant to Article 2 (3) and Article 10 (2) before the instruments referred to in Article 3 (2) are exchanged between the Member States and the United States of America.
( 1) Dieses Abkommen gilt für: This Agreement shall apply to:
( a) the United States of America;
( b) the European Union, for:
- territories for which external relations fall within the competence of a Member State, or for countries which are not Member States for which a Member State has other external relations obligations, provided that the Contracting Parties have reached an agreement by means of the exchange of a diplomatic note duly confirmed by that Member State.
( 2) Die Anwendung dieses Abkommens auf Gebiete oder Länder, für die eine Ausdehnung der Geltung in Einklang mit Absatz 1 Buchstabe b) vorgesehen wurde, kann von jeder der Vertragsparteien gegenüber der anderen Vertragspartei mit einer Frist von sechs Monaten schriftlich auf diplomatischem Wege vorbehaltlich einer ordnungsgemäßen Bestätigung zwischen dem betreffenden Mitgliedstaat und den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika gekündigen werden. Application of this Agreement to territories or countries for which an extension of validity in accordance with paragraph 1 (b) of this Article has been provided may be terminated by either of the Contracting Parties in writing to the other Contracting Party by a period of six months, subject to proper confirmation between the Member State concerned and the United States of America.
The Contracting Parties agree to undertake a joint review of this Agreement as soon as necessary, but not later than five years after its entry into force.
The review shall relate in particular to the practical implementation of the Agreement and may also include aspects such as the impact of any further development of the European Union on the subject matter of this Agreement, including Article 10.
( 1) Dieses Abkommen tritt am ersten Tag nach Ablauf des dritten Monats nach dem Zeitpunkt in Kraft, zu dem die Vertragsparteien die Urkunden über den Abschluss ihrer diesbezüglichen internen Verfahren Exchange haben. This Agreement shall enter into force on the first day following the expiry of the third month following the date on which the Contracting Parties have exchanged their instruments of conclusion of their respective internal procedures.
These instruments also indicate that the steps referred to in paragraph 2 of Article 3 have been taken.
( 2) Jede Vertragspartei kann dieses Abkommen jederzeit durch schriftliche Mitteilung an die andere Vertragspartei kündigen, und diese Kündigung wird sechs Monate nach dem Zeitpunkt der Mitteilung wirksam. Any Contracting Party may, at any time, denounce this Agreement by giving written notice to the other Contracting Party, and such denunciation shall take effect six months after the date of such notification.
on mutual legal assistance between the European Union and the United States of America
THE EUROPEAN UNION AND THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA,
DESIRING to further facilitate cooperation between the Member States of the European Union and the United States of America,
DESIRING to combat crime more effectively in order to protect their democratic societies and their common values,
BEARING IN MIND the rights of the individual and the rule of law,
BEARING IN MIND the guarantees embodied in their respective legal systems which provide for the right of defendants to a fair trial, including the right to a judgment by an impartial and duly established tribunal,
DESIRING to conclude an Agreement on mutual legal assistance in criminal matters,
The Contracting Parties undertake to take measures to strengthen cooperation and mutual legal assistance in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement.
1. Der Begriff <unk> Vertragsparteien <unk> bedeutet die Europäische Union und die Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika, <unk> Contracting Parties
2. Der Begriff <unk> Mitgliedstaat <unk> bedeutet einen Mitgliedstaat der Europäischen Union. <unk> Member State
Scope of this Agreement in relation to and in the absence of bilateral agreements with Member States on mutual legal assistance
( 1) Die Europäische Union entsprechend dem Vertrag über die Europäischen Union und die Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika tragen dafür Sorge, daß dieses Abkommen wie folgt Anwendung in Bezug auf bilaterale Verträge über Rechtshilfe findet, die zwischen den Mitgliedstaaten und den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika zum Zeitpunkt des Inkrafttretens dieses Abkommens in Kraft sind: The European Union, in accordance with the Treaty on the European Union and the United States of America, shall ensure that this Agreement applies, as follows, to bilateral treaties on mutual legal assistance between the Member States and the United States of America in force at the time of the entry into force of this Agreement:
( a) Article 4 shall apply in order to permit the identification of bank balances and transactions in addition to powers already available under the provisions of bilateral treaties.
( b) Article 5 shall apply in order to permit the formation and operation of joint investigation teams in addition to powers already available under the provisions of bilateral treaties.
( c) Article 6 shall apply in order to permit, in addition to powers already available under the provisions of bilateral treaties, the interrogation of a person in the requested State by video transmission technology between the requesting State and the requested State.
( d) Article 7 shall apply in order to permit the use of accelerated means of communication in addition to powers already available under the provisions of bilateral treaties.
( e) Article 8 shall apply in order to permit mutual legal assistance to the administrative authorities concerned, in addition to powers already available under the provisions of bilateral treaties.
( f) Subject to the provisions of paragraphs 4 and 5 of Article 9, Article 9 shall apply in lieu of or in the absence of provisions of bilateral treaties relating to limitations on the use of information or evidence made available by the requesting State and to conditions on mutual legal assistance or refusal thereof on data protection grounds.
( g) Article 10 shall apply in the absence of provisions in bilateral treaties concerning the circumstances in which a requesting State may require its request to be treated as confidential.
( 2) a) Die Europäische Union trägt entsprechend dem Vertrag über die Europäischen Union dafür Sorge, daß jeder Mitgliedstaat in einer zwischen ihm und den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika erstellten Urkunde anerkennt, daß sein geltender bilateraler Vertrag über Rechtshilfe mit den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika in der in diesem Artikel dargelegten Weise zur Anwendung gelangt. The European Union shall, in accordance with the Treaty on European Union, ensure that each Member State, in an instrument drawn up between it and the United States of America, recognises that its current bilateral mutual legal assistance treaty with the United States of America applies in the manner set out in this Article.
( b) The European Union shall, in accordance with the Treaty on European Union, ensure that new Member States which accede to the European Union after the entry into force of this Agreement and which have concluded bilateral treaties on mutual legal assistance with the United States of America take the measures referred to in subparagraph (a) of this Article.
( c) The Contracting Parties shall endeavour to complete the operation described in subparagraph (b) of this Article before the planned date of accession of a new Member State or as soon as possible thereafter.
The European Union shall inform the United States of America of the date of accession of new Member States.
( 3) a) Die Europäische Union entsprechend dem Vertrag über die Europäischen Union und die Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika tragen auch dafür Sorge, daß die Bestimmungen dieses Abkommens zur Anwendung gelangen, wenn zwischen einem Mitgliedstaat und den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika kein bilateraler Vertrag über Rechtshilfe in Kraft ist. The European Union, in accordance with the Treaty on the European Union and the United States of America, shall also ensure that the provisions of this Agreement are applied where no bilateral mutual legal assistance treaty is in force between a Member State and the United States of America.
( b) The European Union shall, in accordance with the Treaty on European Union, ensure that each Member State, in an instrument drawn up between it and the United States of America, recognises that the provisions of this Agreement are being applied.
( c) The European Union shall, in accordance with the Treaty on European Union, ensure that new Member States which accede to the European Union after the entry into force of this Agreement and which have not concluded bilateral treaties on mutual legal assistance with the United States of America, take the measures referred to in subparagraph (b) of this Article.
( 4) Ist der in Absatz 2 Buchstabe b) und Absatz 3 Buchstabe c) genannten Vorgang am Tag des Beitritts nicht abgeschlossen, so gelten die Bestimmungen dieses Abkommens im Rahmen der Beziehungen zwischen den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika und dem betreffenden neuen Mitgliedstaat ab dem Datum, an dem sie sich gegenseitig und die Europäische Union davon haben, daß ihre diesbezüglichen internen Verfahren abgeschlossen sind. If the operation referred to in paragraph 2 (b) and paragraph 3 (c) of this Article has not been completed on the date of accession, the provisions of this Agreement shall apply in the framework of relations between the United States of America and the new Member State concerned, as from the date on which they have informed each other and the European Union that their respective internal procedures have been completed.
( 5) Die Vertragsparteien kommen überein, daß dieses Abkommen nur die Rechtshilfe zwischen den betreffenden Staaten regelt. The Contracting Parties agree that this Agreement shall govern only mutual legal assistance between the States concerned.
The provisions of this Agreement shall not give rise to any right of a private person to obtain, dispose of or exclude evidence or to prevent the execution of a request and shall not extend or restrict any other domestic law.
( 1) a) At the request of the requesting State, the requested State shall, in accordance with the provisions of this Article, immediately investigate whether the banks established in its territory can provide information as to whether a particular natural or legal person suspected of a criminal offence or charged with such a crime is the holder of one or more bank accounts.
The requested State shall promptly communicate the results of its enquiries to the requesting State.
( b) The steps referred to in subparagraph (a) of this Article may also be taken to provide information on:
( i) information concerning natural or legal persons convicted or otherwise involved in criminal activities;
( ii) information held by non-banking financial institutions; and
( iii) financial transactions not related to bank accounts.
( 2) Ein Request um Informationen nach Absatz 1 umfasst A request for information pursuant to paragraph 1 shall include:
( a) the identity of the natural or legal person relevant to the location of such accounts; and
( b) information sufficient to enable the competent authority of the requested State to:
( i) reasonably believe that the natural or legal person concerned was involved in an offence and that banks or non-banking financial institutions in the territory of the requested State are in possession of the requested information;
( ii) establish that the information requested relates to criminal investigations or criminal proceedings;
( c) as far as possible, information as to which bank or non-banking financial entity may be affected and other information the availability of which may help to limit the scope of the investigation.
( 3) Rechtshilfeersuchen nach diesem Artikel erfolgen zwischen: Requests for legal assistance under this Article shall be made between:
( a) the central authorities in the Member States having jurisdiction over mutual legal assistance designated in accordance with Article 15 (2), or the national authorities of the Member States having jurisdiction over the investigation and prosecution of criminal offences; and
( b) the national authorities of the United States designated in accordance with Article 15 (2) with jurisdiction over the investigation and prosecution of criminal offences.
The Contracting Parties may, after the entry into force of this Agreement, arrange, by exchanges of diplomatic notes, an amendment to the channels of communication through which requests under this Article shall be made.
( 4) a) Vorbehaltlich des Buchstabens (b) kann ein Staat nach Artikel 15 seine Verpflichtung zur Leistung von Rechtshilfe nach diesem Artikel begrenzen auf Subject to subparagraph (b), a State may, pursuant to Article 15, limit its obligation to provide mutual legal assistance under this Article to:
( i) acts liable to prosecution under the laws of both the requested and the requesting State;
( ii) offences punishable by imprisonment or imprisonment of a maximum of not less than four years in the requesting State and not less than two years in the requested State; or
( iii) certain serious offences liable to prosecution under the laws of both the requested and the requesting State.
( b) A State which limits its obligations in accordance with subparagraphs (a) (ii) and (iii) shall at least permit the identification, under the law of both the requesting and the requested State, of bank accounts related to terrorist activities and the laundering of proceeds from a wide range of serious crimes.
( 5) Die Rechtshilfe darf im Rahmen dieses Artikels nicht aus Gründen des Bankgeheimnisses verweigert werden. Mutual legal assistance shall not be denied under this Article for reasons of bank secrecy.
( 6) Der ersuchte Staat reagiert Ersuchen um Vorlage von Aufzeichnungen über die nach diesem Artikel ermittelten Bankguthaben oder Transaktionen entsprechend den Bestimmungen des zwischen den betreffenden Staaten geltenden Vertrags über Rechtshilfe oder in Ermangelung eines solchen Vertrags entsprechend den Anforderungen seines internen Rechts. The requested State shall respond to requests for records of bank deposits or transactions established pursuant to this Article in accordance with the provisions of the mutual legal assistance treaty between the States concerned or, in the absence of such a treaty, in accordance with the requirements of its internal law.
( 7) Die Vertragsparteien ergreifen Maßnahmen, damit sich für die ersuchten Staaten aufgrund der Anwendung dieses Artikels keine außergewöhnliche belastung ergibt. The Contracting Parties shall take measures to ensure that the application of this Article does not give rise to an exceptional burden on the States concerned.
Nevertheless, if an exceptional burden should arise for a requested State, including for banks or through the provision of the communication channels provided for in this Article, the Contracting Parties shall enter into consultations without delay with a view to facilitating the application of this Article also by taking measures to reduce the existing and future burden.
( 1) Soweit die Vertragsparteien dies noch nicht getan haben, ergreifen sie die erforderlichen Maßnahmen, damit gemeinsame Ermittlungteams gebildet und im Hoheitsgebiet jedes Mitgliedstaats und der Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika eingesetzt werden können, so daß kriminalPolizeiliche Ermittlungen und eine Strafverfolgung, an der einer oder mehrere der Mitgliedstaaten und die Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika beteiligt sind, erleichtert werden, wenn der betreffende Mitgliedstaat und die Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika dies für zweckmäßig erachten. To the extent that the Contracting Parties have not yet done so, they shall take the necessary steps to establish joint investigation teams and to facilitate criminal investigations and prosecutions involving one or more of the Member States and the United States of America where appropriate by the Member State concerned and the United States of America.
( 2) Die für das jeweiligen Team berechgeblichen Modalitäten wie Zusammensetzung, Bestandsdauer, Standort, Organisation, Funktionen, Zweck und Umfang der Beteiligung von Teammitglieder aus einem Staat an Ermittlungen im Gebiet eines anderen Staates werden im Einvernehmen zwischen den betreffenden für die Ermittlung und Verfolgung von Straftaten und von den jeweiligen Staaten bestimmten zuständigen Behörden festgelegt. The modalities relevant to the respective team, such as composition, duration, location, organisation, functions, purpose and scope of participation of team members from one State in investigations in the territory of another State, shall be determined by mutual agreement between the competent authorities concerned for the investigation and prosecution of criminal offences and the competent authorities designated by the respective States.
( 3) Die betreffenden von den jeweiligen Staaten bestimmten zuständigen Behörden treten zum Zwecke der Bildung und des Einsatzes solcher Ermittlungteams in unmittelbaren Kontakt, außer wenn sich die Staaten diesbezüglich auf andere geeignete Kommunikationsmittel einigen, weil außergewöhnliche Komplexität, große Tragweite oder andere Umstände in Bezug auf einige oder auf alle Aspekte eine zentralere Koordinierung erforderlich erscheinen lassen. The competent authorities concerned, as determined by the respective States, shall enter into direct contact for the purpose of establishing and deploying such investigative teams, except when the States agree on other appropriate means of communication in this respect because of exceptional complexity, broad scope or other circumstances with respect to some or all aspects of central coordination may appear necessary.
( 4) Verlangt die Arbeit eines gemeinsamen Ermittlungteams Ermittlungen maßnahmen in einem der Staaten, von denen es gebildet wurde, so kann ein von diesem Staat in das Team entsentes Mitglied die zuständigen Behörden seines Staates ersuchen, diese Maßnahmen zu ergreifen, ohne daß die übrigen Staaten ein Rechtshilfeersuchen einreichen müssen. If the work of a joint investigative team requests investigative measures in one of the States from which it has been constituted, a member of that State may request the competent authorities of that State to take such measures without the other States having to submit a request for legal assistance.
The legal standard required for taking the measure in that State shall be that required for domestic investigations.
( 1) Die Vertragsparteien treffen die erforderlichen Vorkehrungen, damit zwischen jedem Mitgliedstaat und den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika für die VerHearing eines Zeugen oder eines Sachverständigen in einem Strafverfahren, in dem Rechtshilfe gewährt wird, in einem ersuchten Staat der Einsatz der Video-Übertragungstechnik möglich ist, sofern diese Möglichkeit derzeit noch nicht besteht. The Contracting Parties shall make the necessary arrangements to permit the use of video transmission technology in criminal proceedings between any Member State and the United States of America, in a requested State, provided that such possibility does not currently exist.
In the absence of specific provisions in this Article, the arrangements shall be those provided for in the Treaty in force on mutual legal assistance between the States concerned or, where appropriate, in accordance with the law of the requested State.
( 2) Sofern zwischen dem ersuchenden und dem ersuchten Staat nichts anderes vereinbart wird, trägt der ersuchende Staat die Kosten für die Einrichtung und den Betrieb der Video-Übertragung. Unless otherwise agreed between the requesting State and the requested State, the requesting State shall bear the costs of the installation and operation of the video transmission.
Other costs related to the provision of such assistance (including, inter alia, travel expenses of the persons concerned in the requested State) shall be borne in accordance with the applicable provisions of the applicable mutual legal assistance treaty between the States concerned or, in the absence of such a treaty, in accordance with the arrangement between the requesting State and the requested State.
( 3) Der ersuchende und der ersuchte Staat können Konsultationen aufnehmen, um die Lösung rechtlicher, technischer und logistischen Fragen, die bei der Ausführung des Ersuchens auftreten können, zu erleichtern. The requesting State and the requested State may enter into consultations to facilitate the resolution of legal, technical and logistical issues which may arise in the course of the execution of the request.
( 4) Unbeschadet der Rechtsprechung des ersuchenden Staats ist die Abgabe einer absichtlich falsche Erklärung oder eine andere Verfehlung eines Zeugen oder Sachverständigen während der Video-Konferenz im ersuchten Staat in derselben Weise Strafbar, wie dies in einem innerstaatlichen Verfahren der Fall wäre. Without prejudice to the jurisprudence of the requesting State, the issuing of a deliberately false declaration or any other misconduct by a witness or expert during the video conference in the requested State shall be punishable in the same way as would be the case in domestic proceedings.
( 5) Dieser Artikel gilt unbeschadet des Einsatzes sonstiger Mittel zur Vernehmung im ersuchten Staat gemäß dem anwendbaren Vertrags- oder Gesetzrecht. This Article shall apply without prejudice to the use of other means of interrogation in the requested State in accordance with applicable treaty or law.
( 6) Dieser Artikel gilt unbeschadet der Anwendung der Bestimmungen der bilateralen Abkommen über Rechtshilfe zwischen den Mitgliedstaaten und den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika, die den Einsatz der Video-Übertragungstechnik für andere als die in Absatz 1 genannten Zwecke vorschreiben oder gestatten, wie beispielsweise für Zwecke der Identifizierung von Personen oder Gegenständen oder der Festhaltung von Ermittlungen feststellungen. This Article shall apply without prejudice to the application of the provisions of the bilateral mutual legal assistance agreements between the Member States and the United States of America which prescribe or permit the use of video transmission technology for purposes other than those referred to in paragraph 1, such as, for example, for purposes of identification of persons or objects or the detention of investigative findings.
A State may also authorize the use of video transmission technology in such cases where this is not already provided for in applicable contract or statutory law.
Requests for mutual legal assistance and corresponding communications may be made by means of accelerated means of communication such as fax or electronic mail, followed by formal confirmation, if so requested by the requested State.
The requested State shall reply to the request by one of these accelerated means of communication.
( 1) Rechtshilfe wird auch einer nationalen Verwaltungsbehörde gewährt, die Ermittlungen zu Handlungen mit Blick auf deren strafrechtliche Verfolgung oder Verweisung an die Ermittlungen oder Strafverfolgungsbehörden führt und diese Ermittlungen aufgrund ihrer spezifischen Verwaltungsrechtlichen oder rechtlichen Befugnis führt. Mutual assistance shall also be granted to a national administrative authority which conducts investigations into acts with a view to their criminal prosecution or referral to the investigative or criminal prosecution authorities and which conducts such investigations on the basis of its specific administrative or statutory powers.
In such circumstances, mutual legal assistance may also be provided to other administrative authorities.
No mutual legal assistance shall be granted in respect of matters in which the administrative authority considers that there will be no persecution or referral.
( 2) a) Requests for mutual legal assistance under this Article shall be made between the central authorities designated under the bilateral mutual legal assistance treaty between the States concerned, or between other bodies in accordance with an agreement of the central authorities.
( b) In the absence of a Treaty, requests shall be made between the Ministry of Justice of the United States of America and the Ministry of Justice of the Member State concerned, or a ministry with jurisdiction over the transmission of requests for mutual assistance which is comparable to that provided for in Article 15 (1), or between other authorities designated by such Ministries on both sides.
( 3) Die Vertragsparteien ergreifen Maßnahmen, damit sich für die ersuchten Staaten aufgrund der Anwendung dieses Artikels keine außergewöhnliche belastung ergibt. The Contracting Parties shall take measures to ensure that the application of this Article does not give rise to an exceptional burden on the States concerned.
Nevertheless, if an exceptional burden should arise for a requested State, the Contracting Parties shall enter into consultations without delay with a view to facilitating the application of this Article also by taking measures to reduce the existing and future burden.
Limited use to protect personal and other data
( 1) Der ersuchende Staat kann alle vom erlangten Staat erlangten Beweismittel oder Informationen verwenden The requesting State may use any evidence or information obtained from the requested State.
( a) for the purposes of its criminal investigations and criminal proceedings;
( b) to avert a direct and serious threat to its public security;
( c) in its non-criminal judicial and administrative procedures, which are directly related to investigations and procedures;
( i) those referred to in subparagraph (a); or
( ii) mutual legal assistance has been provided in accordance with Article 8;
( d) for any other purpose, where the information or evidence has become public knowledge in the course of the proceedings for which it has been communicated or in any of the cases referred to in subparagraphs (a), (b) and (c); and
( e) for any other purpose, only with the prior consent of the requested State.
( 2) a) Dieser Artikel schließt nicht aus, daß der ersuchte Staat in einem besonderen Fall zusätzliche Bedingungen aufstellen kann, wenn das spezifische Rechtshilfeersuchen ohne solche Bedingungen nicht erledigt werden könnte. This Article does not preclude the possibility of the requested State, in a special case, imposing additional conditions where the specific request for mutual legal assistance could not be made without such conditions.
Where additional conditions have been laid down in accordance with this subparagraph, the requested State may require the requesting State to provide information on the use of the evidence and information.
( b) The requested State shall not, as a condition for the provision of evidence and information within the meaning of subparagraph (a), impose any general restrictions with respect to the legal standards of the requesting State relating to the handling of personal data.
( 3) Stellt der ersuchte Staat nach der Weitergabe an den ersuchenden Staat Umstände fest, die ihn veranlassen können, in einem bestimmten Fall eine zusätzliche Bedingung zu stellen, so kann der ersuchte Staat sich mit dem ersuchenden Staat ins Benehmen setzen, um festzulegen, inwieweit die Beweismittel und die Informationen geschützt werden können. If, after transfer to the requesting State, the requested State finds circumstances which may induce it to make an additional condition in a particular case, the requested State may engage with the requesting State to determine to what extent the evidence and information may be protected.
( 4) Ein ersuchter Staat kann anstelle dieses Artikels die in dem geltenden bilateralen Vertrag über Rechtshilfe enthaltene Bestimmung über die beschränte Verwendung von Daten anwenden, wenn dies zu einer weniger stark Begrenzung der Verwendung von Informationen und Beweismitteln als nach den Bestimmungen dieses Artikels führt. An requested State may, in lieu of this Article, apply the provision in the bilateral mutual legal assistance treaty in force on the limited use of data, if this results in a less severe limitation on the use of information and evidence than under the provisions of this Article.
( 5) Ist nach einem beim Zeitpunkt der Unterzeichnung dieses Abkommens geltenden bilateralen Vertrag über Rechtshilfe zwischen einem Mitgliedstaat und den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika die Einschränkung der Verpflichtung zur Leistung von Rechtshilfe in Bezug auf bestimmte Steuerzuwiderhandlungen zulässig, so kann der betreffende Mitgliedstaat in seinem Austausch von Urkunden mit den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika nach Artikel 3 Absatz 2 angeben, daß er in Bezug auf solche Zuwiderhandlungen weiterhin die in diesem Vertrag enthaltene Bestimmung über die beschränte Verwendung von Daten anwendet. If, after a bilateral mutual legal assistance treaty in force at the time of signature of this Agreement between a Member State and the United States of America permits the restriction of the obligation to provide mutual legal assistance in respect of certain tax offences, the Member State concerned may, in its exchange of documents with the United States of America in accordance with Article 3 (2), specify that, with respect to such offences,
The requested State shall make every effort to keep a request and its contents confidential when the requesting State requests such confidentiality.
If the request cannot be carried out without breaching the desired confidentiality, the central authority of the requested State shall inform the requesting State, which shall then decide whether the request should nevertheless be carried out.
The Contracting Parties shall consult each other to the appropriate extent for the purpose of making the use of this Agreement as effective as possible and for the purpose of facilitating the settlement of any dispute concerning the interpretation and application of this Agreement.
( 1) Dieses Abkommen gilt für vor oder nach seinem Inkrafttreten begangen Straftaten. This Agreement shall apply to crimes committed before or after its entry into force.
( 2) Dieses Abkommen gilt für nach seinem Inkrafttreten gestellte Rechtshilfeersuchen. This Agreement shall apply to requests for legal assistance made after its entry into force.
However, Articles 6 and 7 shall also apply to requests pending in a requested State at the time of the entry into force of this Agreement.
Subject to the provisions of Articles 4 (5) and 9 (2) (b), this Agreement shall not preclude the requested State from claiming grounds for rejecting mutual legal assistance arising out of a bilateral mutual legal assistance treaty or, where such a treaty does not exist, from its applicable legal principles, including in the event that the execution of the request would prejudice the sovereignty, security, public policy and other fundamental interests of that State.
Future bilateral agreements with Member States on mutual legal assistance
This Agreement shall not constitute an obstacle to the conclusion, after its entry into force, of bilateral agreements between a Member State and the United States of America in conformity with this Agreement.
( 1) Was im Rahmen von Artikel 8 Absatz 2 Buchstabe b) ein anderes ministerium als das Justizministerium benannt, so notifiziert die Europäische Union den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika eine solche Benennung vor Austausch der Urkunden zwischen den Mitgliedstaaten und den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika nach Artikel 3 Absatz 3. If, under Article 8 (2) (b), a different Ministry than the Ministry of Justice is designated, the European Union shall notify the United States of America of such designation prior to the exchange of instruments between the Member States and the United States of America in accordance with Article 3 (3).
( 2) Vor Austausch der Urkunden zwischen den Mitgliedstaaten und den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika nach Artikel 3 Absätze 2 und 3 notifizieren sich die Vertragsparteien nach gegenseitigen Konsultationen darüber, welche nationalen Behörden mit Zuständigkeit für die Ermittlung und Verfolgung von Verbrechen nach Artikel 4 Absatz 3 zu benennen sind, welche die benannten nationalen Behörden sind. Prior to the exchange of instruments between the Member States and the United States of America pursuant to Article 3 (2) and (3), the Contracting Parties shall, after consultation with each other, notify themselves of which national authorities with jurisdiction for the investigation and prosecution of offences referred to in Article 4 (3) are to be designated, which are the designated national authorities.
For those Member States which do not have a mutual legal assistance treaty with the United States of America, the European Union shall, prior to such exchange, notify the United States of America, which is the central authority in accordance with Article 4 (3).
( 3) Die Vertragsparteien notifizieren einander vor Austausch der Urkunden zwischen den Mitgliedstaaten und den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika nach Artikel 3 Absätze 2 und 3 jede nach Artikel 4 Absatz 4 geltend gegrenzung der Verwendung von Daten. The Contracting Parties shall notify each other before the exchange of instruments between the Member States and the United States of America pursuant to Article 3 (2) and (3) of any limitation on the use of data made in accordance with Article 4 (4).
( 1) Dieses Abkommen gilt für: This Agreement shall apply to:
( a) the United States of America;
( b) the European Union, for:
- territories for which external relations fall within the competence of a Member State, or for countries which are not Member States for which a Member State has other external relations obligations, provided that the Contracting Parties have concluded an arrangement by way of exchange of a diplomatic note duly confirmed by that Member State.
( 2) Die Anwendung dieses Abkommens auf Gebiete oder Länder, für die eine Ausdehnung der Geltung in Einklang mit Buchstabe b) vorgesehen wurde, kann von jeder der Parteien gegenüber der anderen Vertragspartei mit einer Frist von sechs Monaten schriftlich auf diplomatischem Wege vorbehaltlich einer ordnungsgemäßen Bestätigung zwischen dem betreffenden Mitgliedstaat und den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika gekündigen werden. Application of this Agreement to territories or countries for which an extension of validity has been provided in accordance with subparagraph (b) of this Article may be terminated by either of the Parties in writing to the other Contracting Party by a period of six months, subject to proper confirmation between the Member State concerned and the United States of America.
The Contracting Parties agree to undertake a joint review of this Agreement not later than five years after its entry into force.
The review shall relate in particular to the practical implementation of the Agreement and may also include aspects such as the impact of the further development of the European Union on the subject matter of this Agreement.
( 1) Dieses Abkommen tritt am ersten Tag nach Ablauf des dritten Monats nach dem Zeitpunkt in Kraft, zu dem die Vertragsparteien untereinander die Urkunden über den Abschluss ihrer diesbezüglichen internen Verfahren Exchange haben. This Agreement shall enter into force on the first day following the expiry of the third month following the date on which the Contracting Parties have exchanged among themselves their instruments of conclusion of their respective internal procedures.
These instruments also indicate that the steps referred to in paragraphs 2 and 3 of Article 3 have been taken.
( 2) Jede Vertragspartei kann dieses Abkommen jederzeit durch schriftliche Mitteilung an die andere Vertragspartei kündigen, und diese Kündigung wird sechs Monate nach dem Zeitpunkt der Mitteilung wirksam. Any Contracting Party may, at any time, denounce this Agreement by giving written notice to the other Contracting Party, and such denunciation shall take effect six months after the date of such notification.
Cooperation on anti-competitive activities between the European Community and the Government of Japan
( hereinafter referred to as <unk> the Contracting Parties
RECOGNISING that the interdependence of the economies of all countries, including the European Community and Japan, is progressing,
CONSCIOUS that the well considered and effective enforcement of competition law by the European Community and Japan, respectively, is important for the performance of their markets and for their trade with each other,
CONSCIOUS that cooperation and, where appropriate, coordination between the Contracting Parties would facilitate the well considered and effective enforcement of competition law in the European Community and Japan respectively,
CONSCIOUS that from time to time differences may arise between the Contracting Parties in the application of the competition laws of the European Community and Japan respectively,
RESOLVED to take into account the important interests of the other Contracting Party in the application of the competition laws of the European Community or Japan (hereinafter referred to as <unk> the competition laws of the Contracting Parties <unk>), and
CONSIDERING the recommendation of the Council of the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development of 27 and 28 July 1995 on cooperation between Member States in the field of restrictive practices affecting international trade and the recommendation of the Council of the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development of 25 March 1998 on measures to be taken against harmful cartels (
( 1) Ziel dieses Abkommens ist es, durch Förderung der Zusammenarbeit und Abstimmung zwischen den Wettbewerbsbehörden der Vertragsparteien zu einer wirksamen Durchsetzung des Wettbewerbsrechts der Vertragsparteien beizutragen und die Möglichkeiten für Konflikte zwischen den Vertragsparteien in allen Angelegenheiten, die die Anwendung ihres Wettbewerbsrechts berühren, zu vermeiden oder zu begrenzen. The objective of this Agreement is to contribute, by promoting cooperation and coordination between the competition authorities of the Parties, to effective enforcement of the competition laws of the Parties and to avoid or limit the possibilities for conflict between the Parties in all matters affecting the application of their competition laws.
( 2) Für die Zwecke dieses Abkommens bezeichnet: For the purposes of this Agreement:
( a) <unk> anti-competitive activities
( b) <unk> competent competition authority of a Member State
At the time of signature of this Agreement, the Commission of the European Communities shall transmit a list of such authorities to the Government of Japan.
The Commission shall provide the Government of Japan with an updated list as soon as necessary.
Information referred to in Article 9 (6) of this Agreement shall not be transmitted to the competent authority of a Member State until that authority is on the list provided by the Commission to the Government of Japan;
( c) <unk> competent competition authorities
( i) for the European Community: the Commission of the European Communities in respect of its powers under European Community competition law; and
( ii) for Japan: the Fair Competition Commission;
( d) <unk> competition law
( i) for the European Community: Articles 81, 82 and 85 of the Treaty establishing the European Community, Council Regulation (EEC) No 4064 / 89 on the control of concentrations between undertakings and their implementing regulations in accordance with the Treaty, and any amendments thereto; and
( ii) for Japan: the Law on the Prohibition of Private Monopolies and on the Preservation of Fair Competition (Law 54 of 1947, hereinafter referred to as <unk> the Antimonopoly Law <unk>), with its implementing regulations and all its amendments;
( e) <unk> enforcement activities
Except where studies, studies or surveys are carried out with a view to examining the general economic situation or economic conditions in a particular sector of the economy.
Such investigations, studies or surveys shall not be designed to include investigations into suspected infringements of competition law;
( f) <unk> the territory of one Contracting Party
( g) <unk> the law of one Contracting Party <unk>, <unk> the law of the Contracting Party <unk> and <unk> the law of the other Contracting Party
( 1) Die Wettbewerbsbehörde einer Vertragspartei unterrichtet die Wettbewerbsbehörde der anderen Vertragspartei von den Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen, die ihrer Ansicht nach wichtige Belange der anderen Vertragspartei berühren können. The competition authority of a Contracting Party shall inform the competition authority of the other Contracting Party of enforcement measures which it considers may affect important interests of the other Contracting Party.
( 2) Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen, die wichtige Belange der anderen Vertragspartei berühren können, sind Maßnahmen, die Important Belange der anderen Vertragspartei berühren können, sind Maßnahmen, die
( a) are relevant to the enforcement activities of the other Contracting Party;
( b) against nationals of the other Contracting Party (in the case of the European Community nationals of the Member States of the European Community) or against companies registered or established in the territory of the other Contracting Party in accordance with the applicable law;
( c) relate to anti-competitive activities, other than mergers or acquisitions, a substantial part of which take place in the territory of the other Party;
( d) a merger or acquisition involving:
( i) at least one of the undertakings concerned; or
( ii) an undertaking controlling at least one of the undertakings concerned;
means a company registered or established in the territory of the other Party in accordance with the applicable law;
( e) relate to conduct which the teaching competition authority considers to have been required, encouraged or approved by the other Contracting Party; or
( f) the imposition by a competition authority of or request for sanctions or remedies which would require or prohibit certain conduct in the territory of the other Contracting Party.
( 3) Mitteilungen nach Absatz 1 ergehen in Bezug auf Zusammenschlüsse oder Übernahmen spätestens: Notifications pursuant to paragraph 1 shall be made with respect to mergers or takeovers not later than:
( a) in the case of the European Community:
( i) the decision to initiate the procedure provided for in Article 6 (1) (c) of Regulation (EEC) No 4064 / 89; and
( ii) a statement of objections;
( b) for Japan:
( i) the date on which documents, reports or other information relating to the proposed concentration are requested pursuant to the Antimonopoly Act; and
( ii) the date on which a recommendation or decision to call a hearing is made.
( 4) Mitteilungen nach Absatz 1 ergehen in allen Fällen mit Ausnahme von Zusammenschlüssen oder Übernahmen so rechtzeitig vor den nachstehend aufgeführten Maßnahmen, wie es praktisch möglich ist: In all cases, with the exception of mergers or takeovers, notifications referred to in paragraph 1 of this Article shall be made in good time before the measures listed below, as practically possible:
( a) in the case of the European Community:
( i) a statement of objections; or
( ii) the adoption of a decision or settlement;
( b) for Japan:
( i) initiation of criminal proceedings;
( ii) the filing of a complaint requesting a preliminary injunction;
( iii) the adoption of a recommendation or decision to call a hearing; and
( iv) the imposition of a fine where no recommendation has previously been made to the payer.
( 5) Die Mitteilungen müssen ausreichende Angaben enthalten, damit die unterrichtete Vertragspartei eine erste Bewertung der Auswirkungen der Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen auf ihre eigenen wichtigen Belange vornehmen kann. The notifications shall contain sufficient information to enable the Contracting Party to make an initial assessment of the impact of enforcement activities on its own important interests.
( 1) Die Wettbewerbsbehörde jeder Vertragspartei unterstützt die Wettbewerbsbehörde der anderen Vertragspartei bei ihren Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen im Rahmen ihrer üblicherweise verfügbaren Mittel in einem Umfang, das mit dem für die unterstützende Vertragspartei maßgebenden Recht und den für sie maßgebenden wichtigen Belangen vereinbar ist. The competition authority of each Contracting Party shall assist the competition authority of the other Contracting Party in its enforcement activities to an extent consistent with the law applicable to the supporting Contracting Party and the important interests relevant to it.
( 2) Der Wettbewerbsbehörde jeder Vertragspartei obliegen in einem mit dem Recht der jeweiligen Vertragspartei und ihren wichtigen Belangen zu vereinbarenden Umfang folgende Aufgaben: The competition authority of each Contracting Party shall, to an extent consistent with the law of the respective Contracting Party and its important interests, have the following functions:
( a) inform the competition authority of the other Contracting Party of enforcement measures against anti-competitive activities which the receiving competition authority considers may adversely affect competition in the territory of the other Contracting Party;
( b) provide to the competition authority of the other Contracting Party important information held or of which the forwarding competition authority is aware and which relates to anti-competitive activities which the forwarding competition authority considers may be material to the enforcement activities of the competition authority of the other Contracting Party or may justify its enforcement activities; and
( c) Transmission to the competition authority of the other Contracting Party, at its request and in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, of information held by the transmitting competition authority relevant to the enforcement activities of the competition authority of the other Contracting Party.
( 1) Führen die Wettbewerbsbehörden beider Vertragsparteien Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen in Bezug auf miteinander verbundene Vorgänge durch, ziehen sie eine Abstimmung ihrer Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen in Erwägung. Where the competition authorities of both Parties carry out enforcement activities with respect to interrelated transactions, they shall consider coordinating their enforcement activities.
( 2) Bei der Erwägung, ob im Zusammenhang mit bestimmten Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen eine Abstimmung erfolgen sollte, berücksichtigen die Wettbewerbsbehörden der Vertragsparteien unter anderem folgende Gesichtpunkten: When considering whether coordination should be made in connection with specific enforcement activities, the competition authorities of the Parties shall, inter alia, take into account the following aspects:
( a) the impact of the coordination on their ability to achieve the objectives of their enforcement activities;
( b) the relative capacity of the competition authorities of the Contracting Parties to obtain the information necessary to carry out the enforcement activities;
( c) the extent to which the competition authority of either Party may take effective remedies against the anti-competitive activities in question;
( d) the possibility of more efficient use of resources;
( e) possible cost savings for the benefit of those affected by the enforcement activities; and
( f) the potential benefits to Contracting Parties and to persons affected by enforcement activities of concerted remedies.
( 3) Stimmen die Wettbewerbsbehörden der Vertragsparteien ihre Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen ab, berücksichtigt jede Wettbewerbsbehörde bei ihren Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen sorgfältig die Ziele, die die andere Wettbewerbsbehörde mit ihren Maßnahmen verfolgt. If the competition authorities of the Contracting Parties vote to adopt their enforcement measures, each competition authority shall take due account of the objectives pursued by the other competition authority in its enforcement activities.
( 4) Führen die Wettbewerbsbehörden beider Vertragsparteien Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen in Bezug auf miteinander verbundene Vorgänge durch, prüft die Wettbewerbsbehörde jeder Vertragspartei auf Ersuchen der Wettbewerbsbehörde der anderen Vertragspartei, soweit dies mit den wichtigen Belangen der ersuchten Vertragspartei vereinbar ist, ob Personen, die vertrauliche Informationen im Zusammenhang mit den betreffenden Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen mitgeteilt haben, der Weitergabe dieser Informationen an die Wettbewerbsbehörde der anderen Vertragspartei zustimmen. Where the competition authorities of both Contracting Parties carry out enforcement activities with respect to interrelated transactions, the competition authority of each Contracting Party, at the request of the competition authority of the other Contracting Party, shall, to the extent that is compatible with the important interests of the requested Contracting Party, examine whether persons who have communicated confidential information relating to the enforcement activities in question agree to the disclosure of such information to the competition authority of the other
( 5) Vorbehaltlich einer ordnungsgemäßen Mitteilung an die Wettbewerbsbehörde der anderen Vertragspartei können die Wettbewerbsbehörden jeder Vertragspartei die Abstimmung der Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen jederzeit einschränken oder beenden und ihre Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen allein fortführen. Subject to proper notification to the competition authority of the other Party, the competition authorities of each Party may at any time restrict or terminate the coordination of enforcement activities and may continue their enforcement activities alone.
( 1) Nimmt die Wettbewerbsbehörde einer Vertragspartei an, daß deren wichtige Belange durch wettbewerbswidrige Verhaltensweisen im Gebiet der anderen Vertragspartei beeinträchtigt werden, kann sie in Ansehcht der Wichtigkeit, Zuständigkeitskonflikte zu vermeiden, und unter Berücksichtigung des Umstands, daß die Wettbewerbsbehörde der anderen Vertragspartei in einer besseren Position sein könnte, um wirksamer gegen die betreffenden wettbewerbswidrigen Verhaltensweisen vorzugehen, die Wettbewerbsbehörde der anderen Vertragspartei ersuchen, geeignete Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen zu ergreifen. In the event that the competition authority of a Contracting Party accepts that its important interests are affected by anti-competitive activities in the territory of the other Contracting Party, it may, taking into account the importance of avoiding conflicts of jurisdiction, and taking into account the fact that the competition authority of the other Contracting Party might be in a better position
( 2) In dem Ersuchen sind die Merkmale des wettbewerbswidrigen Verhaltens und dessen Auswirkungen auf wichtige Belange der Vertragspartei der ersuchenden Wettbewerbsbehörde so genau wie möglich anzugeben und zusätzliche Informationen und sonstige Formen der Zusammenarbeit anzubieten, die bereitzustellen die ersuchende Wettbewerbsbehörde in der Lage ist. The request shall specify the characteristics of competitive conduct and its impact on important interests of the Contracting Party to the requesting competition authority as accurately as possible and shall offer additional information and other forms of cooperation that the requesting competition authority is able to provide.
( 3) Die ersuchte Wettbewerbsbehörde erwägt sorgfältig, ob gegen das im Ersuchen angegebene wettbewerbswidrige verhalten Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen eingeleitet oder laufenden Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen ausgebreitet werden sollen. The competition authority concerned shall carefully consider whether enforcement action should be taken against the anticompetitive activities referred to in the request, or whether current enforcement activities should be expanded.
The Requested Competition Authority shall communicate its decision to the Requesting Competition Authority as soon as practicable.
Where enforcement action is initiated, the requested competition authority shall inform the requesting competition authority of the outcome of the action and, where possible, of important developments that have occurred in the meantime.
( 4) Dieser Artikel schränkt weder das Ermessen der ersuchten Wettbewerbsbehörde ein, nach Maßgabe ihres Wettbewerbsrechts und ihrer Durchsetzungspraxis gegen die in dem Ersuchen mitgeteilten wettbewerbswidrigen Verhaltensweisen vorzugehen, noch steht er der Rücknahme des Ersuchens durch die ersuchende Wettbewerbsbehörde entgegen. This Article shall not restrict the discretion of the requested competition authority to act, in accordance with its competition laws and enforcement practices, against the anticompetitive activities referred to in the request, nor shall it preclude the requesting competition authority from withdrawing the request.
( 1) Die Wettbewerbsbehörde jeder Vertragspartei erwägt sorgfältig die wichtigen Belange der anderen Vertragspartei in allen Phasen der Durchführung ihrer Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen, einschließlich der Entscheidung über die Einleitung von Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen, den Umfang von Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen und die Art der im Einzelfall angestrebten Sanktionen oder Abhilfemaßnahmen. The competition authority of each Contracting Party shall carefully consider the other Contracting Party <unk> s important interests in all phases of the implementation of its enforcement activities, including the decision on the initiation of enforcement activities, the scope of enforcement activities and the nature of the sanctions or remedies sought in individual cases.
( 2) Teilt eine Vertragspartei der anderen Vertragspartei mit, daß bestimmte Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen der letzteren Vertragspartei ihre wichtigen Belange beeinträchtigen könnten, sorgt die letztere Vertragspartei dafür, daß die erstere Vertragspartei rechtzeitig über wichtige Entwicklungen bei der Durchführung der Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen unterrichtet wird. If a Contracting Party notifies the other Contracting Party that certain enforcement activities of the latter Contracting Party may affect its important interests, the latter Contracting Party shall ensure that the former Contracting Party is notified in good time of important developments in the implementation of the enforcement activities.
( 3) Ist eine Vertragspartei der Ansicht, daß wichtige Belange der anderen Vertragspartei durch Durchsetzungsmaßnahmen beeinträchtigt werden könnten, sollte die Vertragsparteien zusätzlich zu allen anderen Faktoren, die unter den gegebenen Umständen für eine angemessene Abwiegung ihrer konkurrierenden Belange relevsind, folgende Gesichtpunkte berücksichtigen: If a Party considers that the other Party <unk> s important interests could be adversely affected by enforcement activities, the Parties should, in addition to any other factors relevant under the circumstances to an appropriate assessment of its competing interests, consider the following:
( a) the relative importance of the anti-competitive activities or transactions in question in the territory of one Contracting Party as compared to the activities or transactions in the territory of the other Contracting Party;
( b) the relative impact of anti-competitive activities on the important interests of each Party;
( c) the presence or absence of evidence in the territory of the Contracting Party which is carrying out the enforcement activities of any intention of the parties to the anti-competitive activities to prejudice consumers, suppliers or competitors;
( d) the extent to which anti-competitive activities significantly restrict competition on the markets of the European Community or Japan;
( e) the degree of discrepancy or consistency between one Contracting Party <unk> s enforcement activities and the law or policy or important interests of the other Contracting Party;
( f) whether natural or legal persons shall be subject to conflicting requirements of the Contracting Parties;
( g) the location of the assets concerned and the whereabouts of those involved in the operation;
( h) the extent to which the Contracting Party <unk> s enforcement activities can provide for effective sanctions or other remedies against the anti-competitive activities; and
( i) the extent to which enforcement action by the other Contracting Party against the same natural or legal persons would be affected.
( 1) Die Vertragsparteien können einander erforderlichenfalls in allen Fragen im Zusammenhang mit diesem Abkommen auf diplomatischem Weg konsultieren. The Contracting Parties may consult each other diplomatically on any matter relating to this Agreement.
( 2) Das Ersuchen um Konsultation nach diesem Artikel wird auf diplomatischem Weg übermittelt. The request for consultation under this Article shall be communicated by diplomatic route.
( 1) Die Wettbewerbsbehörden der Vertragsparteien konsultieren einander auf Ersuchen der Wettbewerbsbehörde einer der Vertragsparteien in allen Fragen, die sich bei der Durchführung dieses Abkommens stellen könnten. The competition authorities of the Contracting Parties shall, at the request of the competition authority of one of the Contracting Parties, consult each other on all matters which may arise in the implementation of this Agreement.
( 2) Die Wettbewerbsbehörden der Vertragsparteien treten mindestens einmal im Jahr zusammen, um The competition authorities of the Parties shall meet at least once a year to:
( a) exchange information on their ongoing enforcement activities and priorities in respect of each Contracting Party <unk> s competition law;
( b) exchange information on sectors of common interest;
( c) to discuss any changes they may consider to the approach; and
( d) to discuss other issues of mutual interest relating to the application of the competition laws of the Contracting Parties.
( 1) Ungeachtet der sonstigen Bestimmungen dieses Abkommens ist keine Vertragspartei verpflichtet, Informationen an die andere Vertragspartei weiterzugeben, wenn diese Weitergabe nach dem Recht der Vertragspartei, die über die Informationen verfügt, verboten ist oder mit ihren wichtigen Belangen unvereinbar wäre. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Agreement, no Contracting Party shall be obliged to disclose information to the other Contracting Party if such disclosure is prohibited under the law of the Contracting Party which has the information or would be incompatible with its important interests.
( 2) a) Andere als allgemein zugängliche Informationen, die eine Vertragspartei der anderen Vertragspartei nach Maßgabe dieses Abkommens übermittelt, werden von der empfangenden Vertragspartei nur für die Zwecke des Artikels 1 Absatz 1 benutzt. Information transmitted by one Party to the other Party in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement other than generally available information shall be used by the receiving Party only for the purposes of Article 1 (1).
( b) Where a Contracting Party discloses information in confidence in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, the receiving Contracting Party shall maintain such confidentiality in accordance with its laws.
( 3) Eine Vertragspartei kann verlangen, daß die nach diesem Abkommen weitergegebenen Informationen gemäß den von ihr genannten Bedingungen verwendet werden. A Contracting Party may require that the information transferred pursuant to this Agreement be used in accordance with the conditions specified by it.
Without the prior consent of the other Contracting Party, the receiving Contracting Party shall not use such information in a manner contrary to these conditions.
( 4) Jede Vertragspartei kann die Informationen, die sie der anderen Vertragspartei übermittelt, einschränken, wenn letztere nicht die von ersterer geforderte Gewähr für die Wahrung der Vertraulichkeit, die Einhaltung der genannten Bedingungen oder der Beschränkungen des Verwendungszwecks bieten kann. Any Contracting Party may restrict the information it transmits to the other Contracting Party if the latter is unable to provide the guarantee requested by the former for the maintenance of confidentiality, compliance with the said conditions or the limitations of the intended use.
( 5) Dieser Artikel steht der Nutzung oder Weitergabe von anderen als allgemein zugänglichen Informationen durch die empfangende Vertragspartei nicht entgegen, sofern This Article shall not prejudice the use or disclosure by the receiving Contracting Party of information other than generally available information, provided that:
( a) the Contracting Party providing the information has previously consented to the use or disclosure of the information; or
( b) the receiving Contracting Party is obliged to do so under the law applicable to it.
In this case, the following shall apply to the receiving Contracting Party:
( i) refrain from taking any measures which would give rise to a legal obligation to disclose confidential information under this Agreement to third parties or other authorities without the prior consent of the Contracting Party supplying the information;
( ii) inform the Contracting Party which provided the information of such use or disclosure in advance, as far as possible, and, upon request, consult with the other Contracting Party, taking due account of its important interests; and
( iii) use all means at its disposal under applicable law to maintain the confidentiality of information in respect of requests by third parties or other authorities to disclose the information in question, unless otherwise agreed with the Contracting Party that provided the information.
( 6) Die Wettbewerbsbehörde der Europäischen Gemeinschaft The competition authority of the European Community
( a) after informing the Japanese competition authority, inform the competent authorities of the Member State (s) concerned of the notifications sent to it by the Japanese competition authority;
( b) after consultation with the Japanese competition authority, inform the competent authorities of the Member State / Member States of any cooperation or coordination with respect to enforcement activities; and
( c) ensure that information provided to the competent authorities of the Member State / Member States in accordance with subparagraphs (a) and (b) of this Article which is not generally available is neither used nor disclosed for purposes other than those referred to in Article 1 (1) of this Agreement.
( 1) Dieses Abkommen wird von den Vertragsparteien nach Maßgabe des jeweils in der Europäischen Gemeinschaft und in Japan geltenden Rechts im Rahmen der ihren Wettbewerbsbehörden zur Verfügung stehenden Mittel durchgeführt. This Agreement shall be implemented by the Contracting Parties, in accordance with the laws applicable in the European Community and Japan, within the means available to their competition authorities.
( 2) Die Wettbewerbsbehörden der Vertragsparteien können zur Durchführung dieses Abkommens besondere Vereinbarungen treffen. The competition authorities of the Contracting Parties may enter into special agreements to implement this Agreement.
( 3) Dieses Abkommen hindert die Vertragsparteien nicht daran, auf der Grundlage anderer bilateraler oder multilateraler Übereinkünfte oder sonstiger Vereinbarungen zwischen den Vertragsparteien einander Hilfe zu leisten oder die andere Vertragspartei um Hilfe zu suchen. This Agreement shall not prevent the Contracting Parties from providing assistance on the basis of other bilateral or multilateral agreements or other agreements between the Contracting Parties or from requesting assistance from the other Contracting Party.
( 4) Dieses Abkommen lässt die politische oder rechtliche Position der Vertragsparteien in Fragen, die die Zuständigkeit betreffen, unberührt. This Agreement shall not prejudice the political or legal position of the Contracting Parties in matters relating to their competence.
( 5) Dieses Abkommen lässt die Rechte und Pflichten der Europäischen Gemeinschaft und Japans nach Maßgabe anderer internationalen Übereinkünfte oder des für sie geltenden Rechts unberührt. This Agreement shall not prejudice the rights and obligations of the European Community and of Japan in accordance with other international agreements or with the laws applicable to them.
Unless otherwise agreed in this Agreement, the competition authority of one Contracting Party may address notifications under this Agreement directly to the competition authority of the other Contracting Party.
However, notifications under Article 1 (2) (b) and Article 2 and requests under Article 5 (1) shall be confirmed in writing by diplomatic channels.
Confirmation shall be given as soon as practically possible after the notification concerned has been communicated to the competition authority of the other Contracting Party.
( 1) Dieses Abkommen tritt am dreißigsten Tag nach seiner Unterzeichnung in Kraft. This Agreement shall enter into force on the 30th day following its signature.
( 2) Dieses Abkommen bleibt bis 60 Tage nach dem Zeitpunkt in Kraft, in dem eine Vertragspartei der anderen Vertragspartei schriftlich auf diplomatischem Weg mitgeteilt hat, daß sie dessen Beendigung begehrt. This Agreement shall remain in force until 60 days after the date on which one Contracting Party has notified the other Contracting Party in writing by diplomatic route that it is seeking its termination.
( 3) Die Vertragsparteien überprüfen die Funktionsweise dieses Abkommens spätestens fünf Jahre nach seinem Inkrafttreten. The Contracting Parties shall review the functioning of this Agreement not later than five years after its entry into force.
between the European Union and the Russian Federation on the participation of the Russian Federation in the Police Mission of the European Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
hereinafter referred to as <unk> Participating Parties
- the United Nations International Police Intervention Force (IPTF) has been present in Bosnia and Herzegovina since 1996 and the European Union has offered to provide the follow-up mission to the IPTF mission in Bosnia and Herzegovina as from 1 January 2003,
- Bosnia and Herzegovina, by exchange of letters dated 2 and 4 March 2002, has accepted this offer, which provides, inter alia, for the EUPM planning team to enjoy the same status currently enjoyed by members of the European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina,
- the Council of the European Union has adopted Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP of 11 March 2002 on the European Union Police Mission (1) and Joint Actions 2003 / 141 / CFSP of 27 February 2003 (2) and 2003 / 188 / CFSP of 17 March 2003 (3) amending Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP on the Police Mission of the European Union, which invites the non-EU European members of NATO and other States which are candidates for accession to the Union, as well as other non-EU OSCE Member States which currently provide staff for the IPTF, to contribute to the EUPM,
- an Agreement between the EU and Bosnia and Herzegovina on the activities of the EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina (4) was concluded on 4 October 2002, including the status of EUPM staff,
The Russian Federation aligns itself with Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP on the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina, adopted by the Council of the European Union on 11 March 2002, as amended by Joint Action 2003 / 141 / CFSP of 27 February 2003 and by Joint Action 2003 / 188 / CFSP of 17 March 2003, including the Annex to Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP concerning the mandate to be given to EUPM pursuant to the following Articles.
( 1) Die Russische Föderation leistet einen Beitrag zur EUPM durch die AbDelegation von fünf Polizeiamte. The Russian Federation shall make a contribution to the EUPM by the delegation of five police officers.
Such staff should be seconded for at least one year, with due regard to rotation.
( 2) Die Russische Föderation sorgt dafür, daß das zur EUPM Delegation Personal seinen Auftrag im Einklang mit den Bestimmungen der Gemeinsamen Aktion 2002/ 210/ GFSP, geändert durch die Gemeinsamen Maßnahmen 2003 / 141/ GFSP und 2003/ 188/ GFSP, durchführt. The Russian Federation shall ensure that staff seconded to the EUPM carry out their duties in accordance with the provisions of Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP, as amended by Joint Actions 2003 / 141 / CFSP and 2003 / 188 / CFSP.
( 3) Die Russische Föderation unterrichtet die EUPM und das Generalsekretariat des Rates der Europäischen Union rechtzeitig über jede Änderung ihres Beitrags zur EUPM. The Russian Federation shall inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union in good time of any amendment to its contribution to the EUPM.
( 4) Das zur EUPM seconded Personal wird einer umfassende ärztlichen Untersuchung unterzogen und erhält die erforderlichen Immunfungen; seine Tauglichkeit ist von einer hierzu befugten Behörde der Russischen Föderation zu bescheinigen. The staff seconded to the EUPM shall undergo a comprehensive medical examination and shall receive the necessary vaccinations; its suitability shall be certified by a competent authority of the Russian Federation.
The staff seconded to the EUPM shall carry with them a copy of the certificate of medical fitness.
( 5) Die Russische Föderation trägt die Kosten für die posting der von ihr seconded Polizeiamte, einschließlich der Gehälter, Vergütungen, Krankenkosten, Versicherungen und Kosten der Reisen nach und aus Bosnia und Herzegovina. The Russian Federation shall bear the costs of secondment of police officers seconded by the Russian Federation, including salaries, remuneration, medical expenses, insurance and travel expenses to and from Bosnia and Herzegovina.
( 1) Das von der Russischen Föderation zur EUPM bezeichnete Personal fällt unter das Abkommen zwischen der Europäischen Union und Bosnia und Herzegovina vom 4. Oktober 2002 über die Tätigkeiten der EUPM in Bosnia und Herzegovina. The staff seconded by the Russian Federation to EUPM shall be covered by the Agreement between the European Union and Bosnia and Herzegovina of 4 October 2002 on EUPM activities in Bosnia and Herzegovina.
( 2) Die Russische Föderation ist für Ansprüche im Zusammenhang mit der AbDelegation eines Mitglieds des EUPM-Personals zuständig, die von einem Mitglied des Personals oder bezüglich eines Mitglieds des Personals erhoben werden. The Russian Federation shall deal with claims relating to the secondment of a member of the EUPM staff raised by a member of the staff or relating to a member of the staff.
The Russian Federation shall be competent to take legal action against the seconded person.
( 3) Die EUPM ist eine unbewaffnete Mission und hat als solche keine Einsatzregeln. The EUPM shall be an unarmed mission and shall have as such no rules of engagement.
( 4) Die delegated Polizeiamte tragen im Dienst ihre nationalen Polizeiuniformen. The seconded police officers shall wear their national police uniforms on duty.
Berets and badges shall be provided by the EUPM.
( 1) Der Beitrag der Russischen Föderation zur EUPM erfolgt unbeschadet der Beschlussfassungsautonomie der Union. The contribution of the Russian Federation to the EUPM shall be made without prejudice to the decision making autonomy of the Union.
In the performance of its functions and in its conduct, the staff seconded by the Russian Federation shall be guided by the interests of the EUPM.
( 2) Alle Mitglieder des EUPM-Personals unterstehen weiterhin der jeweiligen nationalen Behörde. All members of EUPM staff shall continue to be subject to the respective national authority.
( 3) Die nationalen Behörden übertragen dem Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM die Einsatzleitung (OPCOM), der diese Leitung über eine hierarchische Struktur ausübt. The national authorities shall assign operational command and control (OPCOM) to the head of the mission / police chief of EUPM, who shall exercise such command and control through a hierarchical structure.
( 4) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef leitet die EUPM und führt die laufenden Geschäfte. The head of the mission / police chief shall head the EUPM and shall conduct the current operations.
( 5) Die Russische Föderation hat gemäß Artikel 8 Absatz 2 der Gemeinsamen Aktion 2002/ 210 / CFSP hinsichtlich der laufenden Durchführung des Einsatzes dieselben Rechte und Pflichten wie die an dem Einsatz beteiligten EU-Mitgliedstaaten. Pursuant to Article 8 (2) of Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP, the Russian Federation shall have the same rights and obligations with respect to the ongoing implementation of the deployment as the Member States of the EU participating in the deployment.
This shall apply to the performance of normal operational tasks on the ground, including at the headquarters of the police mission.
( 6) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM übt die disziplinargewalt über das EUPM -Personal aus. The head of the mission / police chief of the EUPM shall exercise disciplinary authority over the EUPM staff.
Where appropriate, the competence for disciplinary action shall lie with the relevant national authority.
( 7) Zur Vertretung seines nationalen Kontingents im Rahmen der Mission ernennt die Russische Föderation einen nationalen Kontingentsleiter (NPC). For the representation of its national contingent within the framework of the mission, the Russian Federation shall appoint a national contingent leader (NPC).
The NPC shall report to the Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM on national matters and shall be responsible for the ongoing maintenance of discipline in their contingent.
( 8) Die Europäische Union beschließt die Beendigung des Einsatzes erst nach Hearing der Russischen Föderation, sofern dieser Staat zum Zeitpunkt der Beendigung der Mission noch immer einen Beitrag zur EUPM leistet. The European Union shall decide on the termination of the mission only after consultation with the Russian Federation, provided that that State, at the time of the termination of the mission, still contributes consistently to the EUPM.
The Russian Federation shall take appropriate measures to ensure that staff seconded to EUPM, when handling classified EU information, comply with the security requirements of the Council of the European Union as set out in Council Decision 2001 / 264 / EC of 19 March 2001 (5) on the adoption of the Council <unk> s security requirements.
( 1) Die Russische Föderation stellt jedes Jahr 25000 EUR zur Deckung der laufenden Ausgaben der EUPM bereit. The Russian Federation shall provide EUR 25000 each year to cover EUPM <unk> s current expenditure.
The Russian Federation shall consider the voluntary provision of additional contributions, taking into account its resources and its level of participation.
( 2) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM und die zuständigen Verwaltungsdienststellen der Russischen Föderation unterzeichnen eine Vereinbarung über die Beiträge der Russischen Föderation zu den laufenden Ausgaben der EUPM. The head of the mission / police chief of the EUPM and the relevant administrative services of the Russian Federation shall sign an agreement on the contributions of the Russian Federation to the current expenditure of the EUPM.
This Arrangement shall establish that:
( a) the amount of the contribution in question, including any voluntary contributions;
( b) the modalities of payment and management of the contribution in question;
( c) where appropriate, the agreed control and verification procedures for the contribution in question.
( 3) Die Russische Föderation unterrichtet die EUPM und das Generalsekretariat des Rates der Europäischen Union zum 31. Juli 2003 förmlich über den Gesamtbetrag seiner Beteiligung an den laufenden Ausgaben für das Jahr 2003 und in den Folgejahre zum 1. November jeder Jahres und schließt die finanzielle Vereinbarung für das Jahr 2003 zum 15. August 2003 ab; in den Folgejahre schließt sie zum 15. Dezember jeden Jahres die finanzielle Vereinbarung für ihre Beteiligung an den laufenden Kosten des folgenden Jahres ab. The Russian Federation shall inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union as from 31 July 2003 formally of the total amount of its participation in current expenditure for the year 2003 and in subsequent years for the year 2003 and shall conclude the financial agreement for its participation in the current costs of the following year on 15 December of each year.
( 4) Die Beiträge der Russischen Föderation zu den laufenden Kosten der EUPM werden zum 15. September 2003 und in den Folgejahre zum 31. März jeder Jahres auf ein diesem Staat mitzuteilendes Bankkonto eingezahlt. The contributions of the Russian Federation to the running costs of the EUPM shall be deposited into a bank account of that State by 15 September 2003 and in subsequent years by 31 March of each year.
( 1) ABl. L 70 vom 13.3.2002, S. 1. 1.
( 2) ABl. L 53 vom 28.2.2003, S. 63.
( 3) ABl. L 73 vom 19.3.2003, S. 9. 9.
( 4) ABl. L 293 vom 29.10.2002, S. 2. OJ L 293, 29.10.2002, p.
( 5) ABl. L 101 vom 11.4.2001, S. 1. 1.
between the European Union and the Russian Federation concerning an Agreement on the participation of the Russian Federation in the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
between the European Union and the Republic of Turkey on the participation of the Republic of Turkey in the EU-led intervention forces in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia
hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Parties <unk>,
- the Council of the European Union having adopted Joint Action 2003 / 92 / CFSP of 27 January 2003 on the military operation of the European Union in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia (1),
- the Republic of Turkey has been invited to participate in the EU-led operation,
- the troop deployment process has been successfully completed and Operation Commander and the EU-Military Committee have recommended that the participation of the operational forces of the Republic of Turkey in the EU-led operation be agreed,
- the Political and Security Committee decided on 11 March 2003 to approve the contribution of the Republic of Turkey to the EU-led operation,
- an exchange of letters has taken place between the Government of the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia and the Secretary-General / High Representative concerning the conduct of the operation,
- an Agreement between the EU and the Government of the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia on the status of the EU-led forces and their members was concluded on 21 March 2003,
( 1) Die Republik Türkei schließt sich der vom Rat der Europäischen Union am 27. Januar 2003 angenommenen Gemeinsamen Aktion 2003 / 92 / CFSP nach Maßgabe der nachstehenden Artikel an. The Republic of Turkey shall join the Joint Action 2003 / 92 / CFSP adopted by the Council of the European Union on 27 January 2003, in accordance with the provisions of the following Articles.
( 2) Im Sinne dieses Abkommens bezeichnet der Ausdruck For the purposes of this Agreement: the expression
( a) <unk> Operation Concordia <unk> is the military operation of the European Union in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia under Joint Action 2003 / 92 / CFSP;
( b) <unk> EU-led forces
( c) <unk> EUF personnel
( d) the <unk> operational financing mechanism for financing the common costs of the European Union military operation in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia established by the Council Decision of 27 January 2003;
( e) <unk> participating States
( f) <unk> Joint Complaints Commission <unk> means the Joint Complaints Commission established in accordance with Article 13 of the Agreement between the European Union and the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia on the status of EU-led forces (EUF) in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia.
( 1) Die Republik Türkei beteiligt sich an der Operation Concordia mit dem auf der Streitkräfteplanungskonferenz festgelegten Kontingent. The Republic of Turkey shall participate in Operation Concordia with the contingent established at the Armed Forces Planning Conference.
Where necessary, appropriate rotation of seconded staff shall be ensured.
( 2) Die Republik Türkei sorgt dafür, daß die Forces und das Personal der Türkei ihrem Auftrag im Einklang mit den Bestimmungen der Gemeinsamen Aktion 2003 / 92 / GFSP, dem Einsatzplan sowie den entsprechenden Durchführungsbestimmungen nachkommen. The Republic of Turkey shall ensure that the forces and personnel of Turkey carry out their mission in accordance with the provisions of Joint Action 2003 / 92 / CFSP, the operational plan and the relevant implementing provisions.
( 3) Die Republik Türkei unterrichtet den Operation Commander der der EU, den EUF Commander und den Militärstab der EU über jede Änderung der Beteiligung der Türkei an der Operation Concordia. The Republic of Turkey shall inform the EU <unk> s Operation Commander, the EUF Commander and the Military Staff of any amendment to Turkey <unk> s participation in Operation Concordia.
( 1) Für die Forces und das Personal, die an der Operation Concordia teilnehmen, gelten die Bestimmungen des Abkommens zwischen der Europäischen Union und der ehemaligen jugoslawischen Republik Mazedonien über den Status der EU-geführten Forces (EUF) in der ehemaligen jugoslawischen Republik Mazedonien sowie die entsprechenden Durchführungsbestimmungen. The provisions of the Agreement between the European Union and the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia on the status of the EU-led Forces (EUF) in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia and the relevant implementing provisions shall apply to the forces and personnel participating in Operation Concordia.
( 2) Der Status des Personals, das zu Stabs- oder Führstruppenteilen außerhalb der ehemaligen jugoslawischen Republik Mazedonien beitragen wird, wird durch Vereinbarungen zwischen den betreffenden Stabs- und Führstruppenteilen und der Republik Türkei geregelt. The status of personnel contributing to staff or command units outside the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia shall be governed by agreements between the staff or command and control units concerned and the Republic of Turkey.
( 1) Die Beteiligung der Republik Türkei an der Operation Concordia erfolgt unbeschadet der Beschlussfassungsautonomie der Europäischen Union. Participation of the Republic of Turkey in Operation Concordia shall take place without prejudice to the decision making autonomy of the European Union.
( 2) Freiwillige und Personal unterstehen in ihrer Gesamtheit weiterhin voll und ganz den jeweiligen nationalen Behörden. The forces and personnel in their entirety shall continue to be fully and wholly subject to the respective national authorities.
( 3) Die nationalen Behörden übertragen dem Operation Commander der der EU die Operational Control. The national authorities shall assign operational control to the EU Operation Commander.
Operation Commander shall have the power to delegate its powers of action.
( 4) Die Republik Türkei hat gemäß Artikel 8 Absatz 4 der Gemeinsamen Aktion 2003/ 92 / CFSP und des Beschlusses FYROM / 1/ 2003 des Politischen und Sicherheitspolitischen Komitees zur Einsetzung des Ausschusses der beitragenden Länder hinsichtlich der laufenden Durchführung der Operation Concordia dieselben Rechte und Pflichten wie die teilnehmenden Mitgliedstaaten. Pursuant to Article 8 (4) of Joint Action 2003 / 92 / CFSP and the Decision FYROM / 1 / 2003 of the Political and Security Committee on the establishment of the Committee of Contributing Countries, the Republic of Turkey shall enjoy the same rights and obligations as the participating Member States with respect to the ongoing implementation of Operation Concordia.
( 5) Die Republik Türkei übt die Gerichtsbarkeit über das Personal der Türkei aus. The Republic of Turkey shall exercise jurisdiction over the staff of Turkey.
Operation Commander and Force Commander may at any time request the withdrawal of personnel from the Republic of Turkey.
( 6) Die Republik Türkei ernennt einen hochrangigen MilitärVertreter (SMR), der das nationale Kontingent seines Landes bei den EUF vertreten. The Republic of Turkey shall appoint a high ranking military representative (SMR) to represent the national contingent of its country with the EUF.
The High Level Military Representative shall consult the EUF Commander on all matters relating to Operation Concordia and shall be responsible for the day to day maintenance of discipline in his contingent.
The Republic of Turkey shall take appropriate measures to ensure that Turkish personnel handling classified EU information comply with the security requirements of the Council of the European Union as set out in Council Decision 2001 / 264 / EC (2) and, where appropriate, with further guidance from the Operation Commander.
( 1) Unbeschadet der Bestimmungen von Artikel 7 trägt die Republik Türkei alle im Zusammenhang mit ihrer Beteiligung an der Operation Concordia entstehenden Kosten, sofern gemäß der Regelung im Verwaltungshaushaltsplan für die Operation keine gemeinsame Finanzierung der Kosten vorgesehen ist. Without prejudice to the provisions of Article 7, the Republic of Turkey shall bear all costs incurred in connection with its participation in Operation Concordia, provided that no joint financing of the costs is provided for in accordance with the regulation in the administrative budget for the operation.
( 2) Bewilligt die Gemeinsame Beschwerdekommission natürlichen oder juristischen Personen in der ehemaligen jugoslawischen Republik Mazedonien Schadensatz, so übernimmt die Republik Türkei die Schadendigungszahlung, wenn durch Personal oder Mittel der Türkei Todesfälle, Körperinjuries, Schäden oder Verluste verursacht werden, sofern nicht der Mechanismus gemäß Artikel 9 Absatz 3 des Beschlusses des Rates vom 27. Januar 2003 betreffend die Einrichtung des Mechanismus die Schadensersatzleistung beschließt. If the Joint Complaints Commission grants damages to natural or legal persons in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia, the Republic of Turkey shall make the payment of compensation if death, bodily injury, damage or loss is caused by Turkey <unk> s staff or resources, unless the mechanism referred to in Article 9 (3) of the Council <unk> s Decision of 27 January 2003 concerning the establishment of the mechanism decides on the payment of damages.
( 1) Die Republik Türkei beteiligt sich an den gemeinsamen Kosten der Operation mit dem Betrag von 136087,80 EUR für einen Zeitraum von sechs Monaten. The Republic of Turkey shall contribute to the joint costs of the operation with the sum of EUR 136087,80 for a period of six months.
( 2) Zwischen dem gemäß dem Entscheidung des Rates vom 27. Januar 2003 eingesetzten Verwalter des Mechanismus und den zuständigen Verwaltungsbehörden der Republik Türkei wird eine Vereinbarung über die Finanzierung der gemeinsamen Kosten der Operation geschlossen. An agreement on the financing of the joint costs of the operation shall be concluded between the mechanism administrator established pursuant to the Council Decision of 27 January 2003 and the competent administrative authorities of the Republic of Turkey.
( a) the arrangements for the payment and management of the financial contribution;
( b) where appropriate, the agreed control and audit procedures for the financial contribution.
( 3) Die Beiträge der Republik Türkei zu den gemeinsamen Kosten der Operation Concordia werden von der Republik Türkei auf ein Bankkonto eingezahlt, das der Verwalter des Mechanismus der Republik Türkei mitgeteilt. The contributions of the Republic of Turkey to the joint costs of Operation Concordia shall be deposited by the Republic of Turkey into a bank account held by the administrator of the mechanism of the Republic of Turkey.
If one of the participating Parties fails to fulfil any of the obligations incumbent upon it under the preceding Articles, the other Party may denounce the Agreement and the period of denunciation shall be one month.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon its signature.
It shall remain in force as long as the Republic of Turkey contributes to Operation Concordia.
between the European Union and the Republic of Iceland on the participation of the Republic of Iceland in the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
hereinafter referred to as <unk> Participating Parties
- the United Nations International Police Intervention Force (IPTF) has been present in Bosnia and Herzegovina since 1996 and the European Union has offered to provide the follow-up mission to the IPTF mission in Bosnia and Herzegovina as from 1 January 2003,
- Bosnia and Herzegovina, by exchange of letters dated 2 and 4 March 2002, has accepted this offer, which provides, inter alia, for the EUPM planning team to enjoy the same status currently enjoyed by members of the European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina,
- the Council of the European Union, on 11 March 2002, adopted Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP on the Police Mission of the European Union (1), inviting non-EU European members of NATO and other States applying for accession to the Union, as well as other non-EU OSCE Member States currently providing staff to IPTF, to contribute to the EUPM,
- an Agreement between the EU and Bosnia and Herzegovina on the activities of the EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina (2) was concluded on 4 October 2002, including the status of EUPM staff;
The Republic of Iceland aligns itself with Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP on the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina, including the Annex concerning the mandate for EUPM, adopted by the Council of the European Union on 11 March 2002, in accordance with the following Articles.
( 1) Die Republik Island leistet einen Beitrag zur EUPM durch die AbDelegation von zwei Polizeiamte und von internationalem Zivilpersonal im Umfang von einer Person. The Republic of Iceland shall make a contribution to the EUPM by seconding two police officers and one person of international civilian staff.
Such staff should be seconded for at least one year, with due regard to rotation.
( 2) Die Republik Island sorgt dafür, daß das zur EUPM Delegation Personal seinen Auftrag im Einklang mit den Bestimmungen der Gemeinsamen Aktion 2002/ 210 / GFSP durchführt. The Republic of Iceland shall ensure that staff seconded to EUPM carry out their duties in accordance with the provisions of Joint Action 2002 / 210 / GFSP.
( 3) Die Republik Island unterrichtet die EUPM und das Generalsekretariat des Rates der Europäischen Union rechtzeitig über jede Änderung ihres Beitrags zur EUPM. The Republic of Iceland shall inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union in good time of any amendment to its contribution to the EUPM.
( 4) Das zur EUPM seconded Personal wird einer umfassende ärztlichen Untersuchung unterzogen und erhält die erforderlichen Immunfungen; seine Tauglichkeit ist von einer hierzu befugten Behörde der Republik Island zu bescheinigen. The staff seconded to the EUPM shall undergo a comprehensive medical examination and shall receive the necessary vaccinations; its suitability shall be certified by a competent authority of the Republic of Iceland.
The staff seconded to the EUPM shall carry with them a copy of the certificate of medical fitness.
( 5) Die Republik Island trägt die Kosten für die posting der von ihr seconded PolizeiOfficers und / oder des von ihr seconded internationalen Zivilpersonals, einschließlich der Gehälter, Vergütungen, Krankenkosten, Versicherungen und Kosten der Reisen nach und aus Bosnia und Herzegovina. The Republic of Iceland shall bear the costs of secondment of its seconded police officers and / or of its seconded international civilian personnel, including salaries, remuneration, medical expenses, insurance and travel costs to and from Bosnia and Herzegovina.
( 1) Das von der Republik Island zur EUPM bezeichnete Personal fällt bis zum 31. Dezember 2002 unter das für das EUPM -Planungsteam geltende Abkommen und ab 1. Januar 2003 unter das Abkommen zwischen der Europäischen Union und Bosnia und Herzegovina vom 4. Oktober 2002 über die Tätigkeiten der EUPM in Bosnia und Herzegovina. The staff seconded by the Republic of Iceland to EUPM shall fall by 31 December 2002 under the Agreement applicable to the EUPM Planning Team and from 1 January 2003 under the Agreement between the European Union and Bosnia and Herzegovina of 4 October 2002 on EUPM activities in Bosnia and Herzegovina.
( 2) Die Republik Island ist für Ansprüche im Zusammenhang mit der AbDelegation eines Mitglieds des EUPM-Personals zuständig, die von einem Mitglied des Personals oder bezüglich eines Mitglieds des Personals erhoben werden. The Republic of Iceland shall be competent in respect of claims made by a member of the staff or relating to a member of the staff in connection with the delegation of a member of the EUPM staff.
The Republic of Iceland shall be competent to take legal action against the seconded person.
( 3) Die EUPM ist eine unbewaffnete Mission und hat als solche keine Einsatzregeln. The EUPM shall be an unarmed mission and shall have as such no rules of engagement.
( 4) Die delegated Polizeiamte tragen im Dienst ihre nationalen Polizeiuniformen. The seconded police officers shall wear their national police uniforms on duty.
Berets and badges shall be provided by the EUPM.
( 1) Der Beitrag der Republik Island zur EUPM erfolgt unbeschadet der Beschlussautonomie der Union. The contribution of the Republic of Iceland to the EUPM shall be made without prejudice to the decision-making autonomy of the Union.
In the performance of its functions and in its conduct, the staff seconded from the Republic of Iceland shall be guided by the interests of EUPM.
( 2) Alle Mitglieder des EUPM-Personals unterstehen weiterhin der jeweiligen nationalen Behörde. All members of EUPM staff shall continue to be subject to the respective national authority.
( 3) Die nationalen Behörden übertragen dem Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM die Einsatzleitung (OPCOM), der diese Leitung über eine hierarchische Struktur ausübt. The national authorities shall assign operational command and control (OPCOM) to the head of the mission / police chief of EUPM, who shall exercise such command and control through a hierarchical structure.
( 4) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef leitet die EUPM und führt die laufenden Geschäfte. The head of the mission / police chief shall head the EUPM and shall conduct the current operations.
( 5) Die Republik Island hat gemäß Artikel 8 Absatz 2 der Gemeinsamen Aktion 2002/ 210/ GFSP hinsichtlich der laufenden Durchführung des Einsatzes dieselben Rechte und Pflichten wie die an dem Einsatz beteiligten EU-Mitgliedstaaten. Pursuant to Article 8 (2) of Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP, the Republic of Iceland shall have the same rights and obligations with respect to the ongoing implementation of the operation as the Member States of the EU participating in the operation.
This shall apply to the performance of normal operational tasks on the ground, including at the headquarters of the police mission.
( 6) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM übt die disziplinargewalt über das EUPM -Personal aus. The head of the mission / police chief of the EUPM shall exercise disciplinary authority over the EUPM staff.
Where appropriate, the competence for disciplinary action shall lie with the relevant national authority.
( 7) Zur Vertretung ihres nationalen Kontingents im Rahmen der Mission ernennt die Republik Island einen nationalen Kontingentsleiter (NPC). For the representation of its national contingent within the framework of the mission, the Republic of Iceland shall appoint a national contingent leader (NPC).
The NPC shall report to the Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM on national matters and shall be responsible for the ongoing maintenance of discipline in their contingent.
( 8) Die Europäische Union beschließt die Beendigung des Einsatzes erst nach Hearing der Republik Island, sofern dieser Staat zum Zeitpunkt der Beendigung der Mission noch immer einen Beitrag zur EUPM leistet. The European Union shall decide on the termination of the mission only after consultation with the Republic of Iceland, provided that that State, at the time of the termination of the mission, is still making a contribution to the EUPM.
The Republic of Iceland shall take appropriate measures to ensure that staff seconded to EUPM, when handling classified EU information, comply with the safety requirements of the Council of the European Union as laid down in Council Decision 2001 / 264 / EC (3).
( 1) Die Republik Island stellt jedes Jahr 25000 EUR zur Deckung der laufenden Ausgaben der EUPM bereit. The Republic of Iceland shall provide EUR 25000 each year to cover the current expenditure of the EUPM.
The Republic of Iceland shall consider the voluntary provision of additional contributions, taking into account its resources and its level of participation.
( 2) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM und die zuständigen Verwaltungsdienststellen der Republik Island unterzeichnen eine Vereinbarung über die Beiträge von Island zu den laufenden Ausgaben der EUPM. The head of the mission / police chief of the EUPM and the competent administrative services of the Republic of Iceland shall sign an agreement on the contributions of Iceland to the current expenditure of the EUPM.
This Arrangement shall establish that:
( a) the amount of the contribution in question, including any voluntary contributions;
( b) the arrangements for the payment and management of the amount concerned;
( c) where appropriate, the agreed control and verification procedures for the amount concerned.
( 3) Die Republik Island unterrichtet die EUPM und das Generalsekretariat des Rates der Europäischen Union zum 15. November 2002 und in den Folgejahre zum 1. November förmlich über den Gesamtbetrag ihrer Beteiligung an den laufenden Ausgaben und schließt die finanzielle Vereinbarung zum 15. Dezember jedes Jahres ab. The Republic of Iceland shall inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union by 15 November 2002 and in the following years by 1 November formally of the total amount of its participation in current expenditure and shall conclude the financial arrangement by 15 December of each year.
( 4) Die Beiträge der Republik Island zu den laufenden Kosten der EUPM werden zum 31. März jedes Jahres auf ein diesem Staat mitzuteilendes Bankkonto eingezahlt. The contributions of the Republic of Iceland to the running costs of the EUPM shall be deposited by 31 March of each year into a bank account of that State.
If one of the participating Parties fails to fulfil any of the obligations incumbent upon it under the preceding Articles, the other Party may denounce the Agreement in writing with a period of notice of two months.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon its signature.
It shall remain in force as long as the Republic of Iceland contributes to the EUPM.
between the European Union and the Government of the Swiss Confederation, represented by the Federal Department of Foreign Affairs, on the participation of Switzerland in the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
hereinafter referred to as <unk> Participating Parties
- the United Nations International Police Intervention Force (IPTF) has been present in Bosnia and Herzegovina since 1996 and the European Union has offered to provide the follow-up mission to the IPTF mission in Bosnia and Herzegovina as from 1 January 2003,
- Bosnia and Herzegovina, by exchange of letters dated 2 and 4 March 2002, has accepted this offer, which provides, inter alia, for the EUPM planning team to enjoy the same status currently enjoyed by members of the European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina,
- the Council of the European Union, on 11 March 2002, adopted Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP on the Police Mission of the European Union (1), inviting non-EU European members of NATO and other States applying for accession to the Union, as well as other non-EU OSCE Member States currently providing staff to IPTF, to contribute to the EUPM,
- an Agreement between the EU and Bosnia and Herzegovina on the activities of the EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina (2) was concluded on 4 October 2002, including the status of EUPM staff;
Switzerland aligns itself with Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP on the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina, including the Annex concerning the mandate for EUPM, adopted by the Council of the European Union on 11 March 2002, in accordance with the following Articles.
( 1) Die Schweiz leisten einen Beitrag zur EUPM durch die AbDelegation von vier Polizeiamte. Switzerland shall contribute to the EUPM by the secondment of four police officers.
Such staff should be seconded for at least one year, with due regard to rotation.
( 2) Die Schweiz sorgt dafür, daß das zur EUPM Delegation Personal seinen Auftrag im Einklang mit den Bestimmungen der Gemeinsamen Aktion 2002/ 210 / GFSP durchführt. Switzerland shall ensure that staff seconded to the EUPM carry out their duties in accordance with the provisions of Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP.
( 3) Die Schweiz unterrichtet die EUPM und das Generalsekretariat des Rates der Europäischen Union rechtzeitig über jede Änderung ihres Beitrags zur EUPM. Switzerland shall inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union in good time of any amendment to its contribution to the EUPM.
( 4) Das zur EUPM seconded Personal wird einer umfassende ärztlichen Untersuchung unterzogen und erhält die erforderlichen Immunfungen; seine Tauglichkeit ist von einer hierzu befugten Behörde von der Schweiz zu bescheinigen. The staff seconded to the EUPM shall undergo a comprehensive medical examination and shall receive the necessary vaccinations and shall be certified by a competent authority from Switzerland.
The staff seconded to the EUPM shall carry with them a copy of the certificate of medical fitness.
( 5) Die Schweiz trägt die Kosten für die posting der von ihr seconded PolizeiOfficers und / oder des von ihr seconded internationalen Zivilpersonals, einschließlich der Gehälter, Vergütungen, Krankenkosten, Versicherungen und Kosten der Reisen nach und aus Bosnia und Herzegovina. Switzerland shall bear the costs of seconded police officers and / or seconded international civilian personnel, including salaries, remuneration, medical expenses, insurance and travel expenses to and from Bosnia and Herzegovina.
( 1) Das von der Schweiz zur EUPM Delegation Personal fällt bis zum 31. Dezember 2002 unter das für das EUPM-Planungsteam geltende Abkommen und ab 1. Januar 2003 unter das Abkommen zwischen der Europäischen Union und Bosnia und Herzegovina vom 4. Oktober 2002 über die Tätigkeiten der EUPM in Bosnia und Herzegovina. The staff seconded by Switzerland to EUPM shall fall by 31 December 2002 under the Agreement applicable to the EUPM Planning Team and from 1 January 2003 under the Agreement between the European Union and Bosnia and Herzegovina of 4 October 2002 on the activities of EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina.
( 2) Die Schweiz ist für Ansprüche im Zusammenhang mit der Abordnung eines Mitglieds des EUPM -Personals zuständig, die von einem Mitglied des Personals oder bezüglich eines Mitglieds des Personals erhoben werden. Switzerland shall be competent in respect of claims made by a member of the staff or relating to a member of the staff in connection with the secondment of a member of the EUPM staff.
Switzerland shall be responsible for bringing legal proceedings against the seconded person.
( 3) Die EUPM ist eine unbewaffnete Mission und hat als solche keine Einsatzregeln. The EUPM shall be an unarmed mission and shall have as such no rules of engagement.
( 4) Die delegated Polizeiamte tragen im Dienst ihre nationalen Polizeiuniformen. The seconded police officers shall wear their national police uniforms on duty.
Berets and badges shall be provided by the EUPM.
( 1) Der Beitrag der Schweiz zur EUPM erfolgt Without prejudice to the decision-making autonomy of the Union.
In the performance of its functions and in its conduct, the staff seconded from Switzerland shall be guided by the interests of the EUPM.
( 2) Alle Mitglieder des EUPM-Personals unterstehen weiterhin der jeweiligen nationalen Behörde. All members of EUPM staff shall continue to be subject to the respective national authority.
( 3) Die nationalen Behörden übertragen dem Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM die Einsatzleitung (OPCOM), der diese Leitung über eine hierarchische Struktur ausübt. The national authorities shall assign operational command and control (OPCOM) to the head of the mission / police chief of EUPM, who shall exercise such command and control through a hierarchical structure.
( 4) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef leitet die EUPM und führt die laufenden Geschäfte. The head of the mission / police chief shall head the EUPM and shall conduct the current operations.
( 5) Die Schweiz hat gemäß Artikel 8 Absatz 2 der Gemeinsamen Aktion 2002/ 210/ GFSP hinsichtlich der laufenden Durchführung des Einsatzes dieselben Rechte und Pflichten wie die an dem Einsatz beteiligten EU-Mitgliedstaaten. Switzerland shall, in accordance with Article 8 (2) of Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP, have the same rights and obligations with respect to the ongoing implementation of the operation as the Member States of the EU participating in the operation.
This shall apply to the performance of normal operational tasks on the ground, including at the headquarters of the police mission.
( 6) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM übt die disziplinargewalt über das EUPM -Personal aus. The head of the mission / police chief of the EUPM shall exercise disciplinary authority over the EUPM staff.
Where appropriate, the competence for disciplinary action shall lie with the relevant national authority.
( 7) Zur Vertretung ihres nationalen Kontingents im Rahmen der Mission ernennt die Schweiz einen nationalen Kontingsleiter (NPC). Switzerland shall appoint a national contingent leader (NPC) to represent its national contingent within the framework of the mission.
The NPC shall report to the Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM on national matters and shall be responsible for the ongoing maintenance of discipline in their contingent.
( 8) Die Europäische Union beschließt die Beendigung des Einsatzes erst nach Hearing der Schweiz, sofern dieser Staat zum Zeitpunkt der Beendigung der Mission noch immer einen Beitrag zur EUPM leistet. The European Union shall decide on the termination of the mission only after consultation with Switzerland, provided that that State, at the time of the termination of the mission, still contributes consistently to the EUPM.
Switzerland shall take appropriate measures to ensure that staff seconded to EUPM, when handling classified information in the EU, comply with the safety requirements of the Council of the European Union as laid down in Council Decision 2001 / 264 / EC (3).
( 1) Die Schweiz stellt jedes Jahr 25000 EUR zur Deckung der laufenden Ausgaben der EUPM bereit. Switzerland shall provide EUR 25,000 each year to cover EUPM <unk> s current expenditure.
Switzerland shall consider the voluntary provision of additional contributions, taking into account its resources and its level of participation.
( 2) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM und die zuständigen Verwaltungsdienststellen der Schweiz unterzeichnen eine Vereinbarung über die Beiträge der Schweiz zu den laufenden Ausgaben der EUPM. The head of the mission / police chief of the EUPM and the relevant administrative services of Switzerland shall sign an agreement on Switzerland <unk> s contributions to the current expenditure of the EUPM.
This Arrangement shall establish that:
( a) the amount of the contribution in question, including any voluntary contributions;
( b) the arrangements for the payment and management of the amount concerned;
( c) where appropriate, the agreed control and verification procedures for the amount concerned.
( 3) Die Schweiz unterrichtet die EUPM und das Generalsekretariat des Rates der Europäischen Union zum 15. November 2002 und in den Folgejahre zum 1. November förmlich über den Gesamtbetrag ihrer Beteiligung an den laufenden Ausgaben und schließt die finanzielle Vereinbarung zum 15. Dezember jedes Jahres ab. Switzerland shall inform EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union by 15 November 2002 and in the years thereafter by 1 November formally of the total amount of its participation in current expenditure and shall conclude the financial arrangement by 15 December of each year.
( 4) Die Beiträge der Schweiz zu den laufenden Kosten der EUPM werden zum 31. März jedes Jahres auf ein diesem Staat mitzuteilendes Bankkonto eingezahlt. Switzerland <unk> s contributions to the running costs of the EUPM shall be deposited by 31 March of each year in a bank account of that State.
If one of the participating Parties fails to fulfil any of the obligations incumbent upon it under the preceding Articles, the other Party may denounce the Agreement in writing with a period of notice of two months.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon its signature.
It shall remain in force as long as Switzerland contributes to the EUPM.
between the European Union and Romania on the participation of Romania in the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
hereinafter referred to as <unk> Participating Parties
- the United Nations International Police Intervention Force (IPTF) has been present in Bosnia and Herzegovina since 1996 and the European Union has offered to provide the follow-up mission to the IPTF mission in Bosnia and Herzegovina as from 1 January 2003,
- Bosnia and Herzegovina, by exchange of letters dated 2 and 4 March 2002, has accepted this offer, which provides, inter alia, for the EUPM planning team to enjoy the same status currently enjoyed by members of the European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina,
- the Council of the European Union, on 11 March 2002, adopted Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP on the Police Mission of the European Union (1), inviting non-EU European members of NATO and other States applying for accession to the Union, as well as other non-EU OSCE Member States currently providing staff to IPTF, to contribute to the EUPM,
- an Agreement between the EU and Bosnia and Herzegovina on the activities of the EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina (2) was concluded on 4 October 2002, including the status of EUPM staff;
Romania aligns itself with Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP on the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina, including the Annex concerning the mandate for EUPM, adopted by the Council of the European Union on 11 March 2002, in accordance with the following Articles.
( 1) Romania leisten einen Beitrag zur EUPM durch die AbDelegation von sechs Polizeiamte. Romania shall contribute to the EUPM by the secondment of six police officers.
Such staff should be seconded for at least one year, with due regard to rotation.
( 2) Rumänien sorgt dafür, daß das zur EUPM Delegation Personal seinen Auftrag im Einklang mit den Bestimmungen der Gemeinsamen Aktion 2002/ 210/ GFSP durchführt. Romania shall ensure that staff seconded to the EUPM carry out their duties in accordance with the provisions of Joint Action 2002 / 210 / GFSP.
( 3) Rumänien unterrichtet die EUPM und das Generalsekretariat des Rates der Europäischen Union rechtzeitig über jede Änderung seines Beitrags zur EUPM. Romania shall promptly inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union of any amendment to its contribution to the EUPM.
( 4) Das zur EUPM seconded Personal wird einer umfassende ärztlichen Untersuchung unterzogen und erhält die erforderlichen Immunfungen; seine Tauglichkeit ist von einer hierzu befugten Behörde von Rumänien zu bescheinigen. The staff seconded to the EUPM shall undergo a comprehensive medical examination and shall receive the necessary vaccinations; its suitability shall be certified by a competent authority from Romania.
The staff seconded to the EUPM shall carry with them a copy of the certificate of medical fitness.
( 5) Rumänien trägt die Kosten für die posting der von ihm seconded PolizeiOfficers und / oder des von ihm seconded internationalen Zivilpersonals, einschließlich der Gehälter, Vergütungen, Krankenkosten, Versicherungen und Kosten der Reisen nach und aus Bosnia und Herzegovina. Romania shall bear the costs of seconded police officers and / or seconded international civilian personnel, including salaries, remuneration, medical expenses, insurance and travel costs to and from Bosnia and Herzegovina.
( 1) Das von Rumänien zur EUPM Delegation Personal fällt bis zum 31. Dezember 2002 unter das für das EUPM -Planungsteam geltende Abkommen und ab 1. Januar 2003 unter das Abkommen zwischen der Europäischen Union und Bosnia und Herzegovina vom 4. Oktober 2002 über die Tätigkeiten der EUPM in Bosnia und Herzegovina. The staff seconded by Romania to EUPM shall fall by 31 December 2002 under the Agreement applicable to the EUPM Planning Team and from 1 January 2003 under the Agreement between the European Union and Bosnia and Herzegovina of 4 October 2002 on EUPM activities in Bosnia and Herzegovina.
( 2) Rumänien ist für Ansprüche im Zusammenhang mit der AbDelegation eines Mitglieds des EUPM -Personals zuständig, die von einem Mitglied des Personals oder bezüglich eines Mitglieds des Personals erhoben werden. Romania shall be responsible for claims relating to the secondment of a member of the staff of the EUPM raised by a member of the staff or relating to a member of the staff.
Romania shall be competent to take legal action against the delegated person.
( 3) Die EUPM ist eine unbewaffnete Mission und hat als solche keine Einsatzregeln. The EUPM shall be an unarmed mission and shall have as such no rules of engagement.
( 4) Die delegated Polizeiamte tragen im Dienst ihre nationalen Polizeiuniformen. The seconded police officers shall wear their national police uniforms on duty.
Berets and badges shall be provided by the EUPM.
( 1) Der Beitrag von Rumänien zur EUPM erfolgt unbeschadet der Beschlussfassungsautonomie der Union. Romania <unk> s contribution to the EUPM shall be without prejudice to the decision-making autonomy of the Union.
In the performance of its functions and in its conduct, the staff seconded from Romania shall be guided by the interests of the EUPM.
( 2) Alle Mitglieder des EUPM-Personals unterstehen weiterhin der jeweiligen nationalen Behörde. All members of EUPM staff shall continue to be subject to the respective national authority.
( 3) Die nationalen Behörden übertragen dem Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM die Einsatzleitung (OPCOM), der diese Leitung über eine hierarchische Struktur ausübt. The national authorities shall assign operational command and control (OPCOM) to the head of the mission / police chief of EUPM, who shall exercise such command and control through a hierarchical structure.
( 4) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef leitet die EUPM und führt die laufenden Geschäfte. The head of the mission / police chief shall head the EUPM and shall conduct the current operations.
( 5) Rumänien hat gemäß Artikel 8 Absatz 2 der Gemeinsamen Aktion 2002/ 210/ GFSP hinsichtlich der laufenden Durchführung des Einsatzes dieselben Rechte und Pflichten wie die an dem Einsatz beteiligten EU-Mitgliedstaaten. Romania shall, in accordance with Article 8 (2) of Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP, enjoy the same rights and obligations with respect to the ongoing implementation of the operation as the Member States of the EU participating in the operation.
This shall apply to the performance of normal operational tasks on the ground, including at the headquarters of the police mission.
( 6) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM übt die disziplinargewalt über das EUPM -Personal aus. The head of the mission / police chief of the EUPM shall exercise disciplinary authority over the EUPM staff.
Where appropriate, the competence for disciplinary action shall lie with the relevant national authority.
( 7) Zur Vertretung seines nationalen Kontingents im Rahmen der Mission ernennt Rumänien einen nationalen Kontingentsleiter (NPC). Romania shall appoint a national contingent leader (NPC) to represent its national contingent within the framework of the mission.
The NPC shall report to the Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM on national matters and shall be responsible for the ongoing maintenance of discipline in their contingent.
( 8) Die Europäische Union beschließt die Beendigung des Einsatzes erst nach Hearing von Rumänien, sofern dieser Staat zum Zeitpunkt der Beendigung der Mission noch immer einen Beitrag zur EUPM leistet. The European Union shall decide on the termination of the mission only after consultation by Romania, provided that that State, at the time of the termination of the mission, is still making a contribution to the EUPM.
Romania shall take appropriate measures to ensure that staff seconded to EUPM, when handling classified EU information, comply with the safety requirements of the Council of the European Union as laid down in Council Decision 2001 / 264 / EC (3).
( 1) Romania stellt jedes Jahr 25000 EUR zur Deckung der laufenden Ausgaben der EUPM bereit. Romania shall provide EUR 25000 each year to cover EUPM <unk> s current expenditure.
Romania is considering the voluntary provision of additional contributions, taking into account its resources and its level of participation.
( 2) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM und die zuständigen Verwaltungsdienststellen von Rumänien unterzeichnen eine Vereinbarung über die Beiträge von Rumänien zu den laufenden Ausgaben der EUPM. The head of the mission / police chief of EUPM and the relevant administrative services of Romania shall sign an agreement on the contributions of Romania to the current expenditure of EUPM.
This Arrangement shall establish that:
( a) the amount of the contribution in question, including any voluntary contributions;
( b) the arrangements for the payment and management of the amount concerned;
( c) where appropriate, the agreed control and verification procedures for the amount concerned.
( 3) Rumänien unterrichtet die EUPM und das Generalsekretariat des Rates der Europäischen Union zum 15. November 2002 und in den Folgejahre zum 1. November förmlich über den Gesamtbetrag seiner Beteiligung an den laufenden Ausgaben und schließt die finanzielle Vereinbarung zum 15. Dezember jedes Jahres ab. Romania shall inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union by 15 November 2002 and in the following years by 1 November formally of the total amount of its participation in current expenditure and shall conclude the financial agreement by 15 December of each year.
( 4) Die Beiträge von Rumänien zu den laufenden Kosten der EUPM werden zum 31. März jedes Jahres auf ein diesem Staat mitzuteilendes Bankkonto eingezahlt. The contributions of Romania to the running costs of the EUPM shall be deposited by 31 March of each year into a bank account of that State.
If one of the participating Parties fails to fulfil any of the obligations incumbent upon it under the preceding Articles, the other Party may denounce the Agreement in writing with a period of notice of two months.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon its signature.
It shall remain in force as long as Romania contributes to the EUPM.
between the European Union and the Kingdom of Norway on the participation of the Kingdom of Norway in the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
hereinafter referred to as <unk> Participating Parties
- the United Nations International Police Intervention Force (IPTF) has been present in Bosnia and Herzegovina since 1996 and the European Union has offered to provide the follow-up mission to the IPTF mission in Bosnia and Herzegovina as from 1 January 2003,
- Bosnia and Herzegovina, by exchange of letters dated 2 and 4 March 2002, has accepted this offer, which provides, inter alia, for the EUPM planning team to enjoy the same status currently enjoyed by members of the European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina,
- the Council of the European Union, on 11 March 2002, adopted Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP on the Police Mission of the European Union (1), inviting non-EU European members of NATO and other States applying for accession to the Union, as well as other non-EU OSCE Member States currently providing staff to IPTF, to contribute to the EUPM,
- an Agreement between the EU and Bosnia and Herzegovina on the activities of the EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina (2) was concluded on 4 October 2002, including the status of EUPM staff;
The Kingdom of Norway aligns itself with Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP on the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina, including the Annex concerning the mandate for EUPM, adopted by the Council of the European Union on 11 March 2002, in accordance with the following Articles.
( 1) Das Königreich Norwegen leistet einen Beitrag zur EUPM durch die AbDelegation von sechs Polizeiamte und von internationalem Zivilpersonal im Umfang von zwei Personen. The Kingdom of Norway shall contribute to the EUPM by seconding six police officers and two international civilian personnel.
Such staff should be seconded for at least one year, with due regard to rotation.
( 2) Das Königreich Norwegen sorgt dafür, daß das zur EUPM Delegation Personal seinen Auftrag im Einklang mit den Bestimmungen der Gemeinsamen Aktion 2002/ 210 / GFSP durchführt. The Kingdom of Norway shall ensure that staff seconded to the EUPM carry out their duties in accordance with the provisions of Joint Action 2002 / 210 / GFSP.
( 3) Das Königreich Norwegen unterrichtet die EUPM und das Generalsekretariat des Rates der Europäischen Union rechtzeitig über jede Änderung seines Beitrags zur EUPM. The Kingdom of Norway shall inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union in good time of any amendment to its contribution to the EUPM.
( 4) Das zur EUPM seconded Personal wird einer umfassende ärztlichen Untersuchung unterzogen und erhält die erforderlichen Immunfungen; seine Tauglichkeit ist von einer hierzu befugten Behörde des Königreichs Norwegen zu bescheinigen. The staff seconded to the EUPM shall undergo a comprehensive medical examination and shall receive the necessary vaccinations; its suitability shall be certified by a competent authority of the Kingdom of Norway.
The staff seconded to the EUPM shall carry with them a copy of the certificate of medical fitness.
( 5) Das Königreich Norwegen trägt die Kosten für die posting der von ihm seconded PolizeiOfficers und / oder des von ihm seconded internationalen Zivilpersonals, einschließlich der Gehälter, Vergütungen, Krankenkosten, Versicherungen und Kosten der Reisen nach und aus Bosnia und Herzegovina. The Kingdom of Norway shall bear the costs of seconded police officers and / or seconded international civilian personnel, including salaries, remuneration, medical expenses, insurance and travel expenses to and from Bosnia and Herzegovina.
( 1) Das von dem Königreich Norwegen zur EUPM Delegation Personal fällt bis zum 31. Dezember 2002 unter das für das EUPM -Planungsteam geltende Abkommen und ab 1. Januar 2003 unter das Abkommen zwischen der Europäischen Union und Bosnia und Herzegovina vom 4. Oktober 2002 über die Tätigkeiten der EUPM in Bosnia und Herzegovina. The staff seconded by the Kingdom of Norway to EUPM shall fall by 31 December 2002 under the Agreement applicable to the EUPM Planning Team and from 1 January 2003 under the Agreement between the European Union and Bosnia and Herzegovina of 4 October 2002 on EUPM activities in Bosnia and Herzegovina.
( 2) Das Königreich Norwegen ist für Ansprüche im Zusammenhang mit der AbDelegation eines Mitglieds des EUPM -Personals zuständig, die von einem Mitglied des Personals oder bezüglich eines Mitglieds des Personals erhoben werden. The Kingdom of Norway shall be competent in respect of claims relating to the delegation of a member of the EUPM staff raised by a member of the staff or relating to a member of the staff.
The Kingdom of Norway shall be competent to bring legal proceedings against the seconded person.
( 3) Die EUPM ist eine unbewaffnete Mission und hat als solche keine Einsatzregeln. The EUPM shall be an unarmed mission and shall have as such no rules of engagement.
( 4) Die delegated Polizeiamte tragen im Dienst ihre nationalen Polizeiuniformen. The seconded police officers shall wear their national police uniforms on duty.
Berets and badges shall be provided by the EUPM.
( 1) Der Beitrag des Königreichs Norwegen zur EUPM erfolgt unbeschadet der Beschlussfassungsautonomie der Union. The contribution of the Kingdom of Norway to the EUPM shall be made without prejudice to the decision making autonomy of the Union.
In the performance of its functions and in its conduct, the staff seconded by the Kingdom of Norway shall be guided by the interests of EUPM.
( 2) Alle Mitglieder des EUPM-Personals unterstehen weiterhin der jeweiligen nationalen Behörde. All members of EUPM staff shall continue to be subject to the respective national authority.
( 3) Die nationalen Behörden übertragen dem Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM die Einsatzleitung (OPCOM), der diese Leitung über eine hierarchische Struktur ausübt. The national authorities shall assign operational command and control (OPCOM) to the head of the mission / police chief of EUPM, who shall exercise such command and control through a hierarchical structure.
( 4) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef leitet die EUPM und führt die laufenden Geschäfte. The head of the mission / police chief shall head the EUPM and shall conduct the current operations.
( 5) Das Königreich Norwegen hat gemäß Artikel 8 Absatz 2 der Gemeinsamen Aktion 2002/ 210/ GFSP hinsichtlich der laufenden Durchführung des Einsatzes dieselben Rechte und Pflichten wie die an dem Einsatz beteiligten EU-Mitgliedstaaten. Pursuant to Article 8 (2) of Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP, the Kingdom of Norway shall have the same rights and obligations with respect to the ongoing implementation of the deployment as the Member States of the EU participating in the deployment.
This shall apply to the performance of normal operational tasks on the ground, including at the headquarters of the police mission.
( 6) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM übt die disziplinargewalt über das EUPM -Personal aus. The head of the mission / police chief of the EUPM shall exercise disciplinary authority over the EUPM staff.
Where appropriate, the competence for disciplinary action shall lie with the relevant national authority.
( 7) Zur Vertretung seines nationalen Kontingents im Rahmen der Mission ernennt das Königreich Norwegen einen nationalen Kontingsleiter (NPC). For the representation of its national contingent within the framework of the mission, the Kingdom of Norway shall appoint a national contingent leader (NPC).
The NPC shall report to the Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM on national matters and shall be responsible for the ongoing maintenance of discipline in their contingent.
( 8) Die Europäische Union beschließt die Beendigung des Einsatzes erst nach Hearing des Königreichs Norwegen, sofern dieser Staat zum Zeitpunkt der Beendigung der Mission noch immer einen Beitrag zur EUPM leistet. The European Union shall decide on the termination of the mission only after consultation with the Kingdom of Norway, provided that that State, at the time of the termination of the mission, is still making a contribution to the EUPM.
The Kingdom of Norway shall take appropriate measures to ensure that staff seconded to EUPM, when handling EU classified information, comply with the safety requirements of the Council of the European Union as laid down in Council Decision 2001 / 264 / EC (3).
( 1) Das Königreich Norwegen stellt jedes Jahr 25000 EUR zur Deckung der laufenden Ausgaben der EUPM bereit. The Kingdom of Norway shall provide EUR 25000 each year to cover EUPM <unk> s current expenditure.
The Kingdom of Norway shall consider the voluntary provision of additional contributions, taking into account its resources and its level of participation.
( 2) Der Leiter der Mission/ Polizeizeichef der EUPM und die zuständigen Verwaltungsdienststellen des Königreichs Norwegen unterzeichnen eine Vereinbarung über die Beiträge von Norwegen zu den laufenden Ausgaben der EUPM. The head of the mission / police chief of the EUPM and the relevant administrative services of the Kingdom of Norway shall sign an agreement on the contributions of Norway to the current expenditure of the EUPM.
This Arrangement shall establish that:
( a) the amount of the contribution in question, including any voluntary contributions;
( b) the arrangements for the payment and management of the amount concerned;
( c) where appropriate, the agreed control and verification procedures for the amount concerned.
( 3) Das Königreich Norwegen unterrichtet die EUPM und das Generalsekretariat des Rates der Europäischen Union zum 15. November 2002 und in den Folgejahre zum 1. November förmlich über den Gesamtbetrag seiner Beteiligung an den laufenden Ausgaben und schließt die finanzielle Vereinbarung zum 15. Dezember jedes Jahres ab. The Kingdom of Norway shall inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union by 15 November 2002 and in the following years by 1 November formally of the total amount of its participation in current expenditure and shall conclude the financial arrangement by 15 December of each year.
( 4) Die Beiträge des Königreichs Norwegen zu den laufenden Kosten der EUPM werden zum 31. März jedes Jahres auf ein diesem Staat mitzuteilendes Bankkonto eingezahlt. The contributions of the Kingdom of Norway to the running costs of the EUPM shall be deposited by 31 March of each year into a bank account of that State.
If one of the participating Parties fails to fulfil any of the obligations incumbent upon it under the preceding Articles, the other Party may denounce the Agreement in writing with a period of notice of two months.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon its signature.
It shall remain in force as long as the Kingdom of Norway contributes to the EUPM.
between the European Union and the Republic of Turkey on the participation of the Republic of Turkey in the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
hereinafter referred to as <unk> Participating Parties
